Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE OREGON
PUBLIC DEFENSE COMMISSION
(Appointment and Duties)
SECTION 1.  ORS 151.211 is amended to read:
151.211. For purposes of ORS 151.211 to 151.221:
[(1) “Bar member” means an individual who is an active member of the Oregon State Bar. ]
[(2)] (1) “Chief Justice” means the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
[(3)] (2) “Commission” means the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense
Commission.
[(4) “Director”  means the public defense services executive director appointed under ORS
151.216.]
[(5) “Office of public defense services” means  the office established by the commission under the
director to handle the cases assigned and to carry  out the administrative policies and procedures for
the public defense system. ]
SECTION 2.  ORS 151.213 is amended to read:
151.213. (1) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon  Public Defense Commission  is
established in the judicial branch  of state government. Except for the appointment or removal of
commission members, the  commission and employees of the commission are not subject to the exer-
cise of administrative authority and supervision by  the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court as the
administrative head of the Judicial Department.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 1
(2)(a) [ The commission consists of ] Nine  voting  members  and four nonvoting members  shall
be appointed  to the commission by order of the Chief Justice[ . In addition to the nine appointed
members, the Chief Justice serves as a nonvoting, ex officio  member. The Chief Justice shall appoint
at least three persons who are not bar members, at least one person who was formerly engaged in the
provision of public defense services and at least one person who has been formerly represented  by a
public defense provider in this state.  All members must have a demonstrated record of commitment to
public defense. Except for the Chief Justice or a senior judge under ORS  1.300, a member may not
serve concurrently  as a judge, a prosecuting attorney or an employee of a law enforcement agency. A
person who is primarily engaged in providing public defense services may not serve as  a member of
the commission. ] as follows:
(A) The Chief Justice shall appoint:
(i) One voting member who is a retired judge.
(ii) Two additional voting members,  one of whom has experience as a public defense
provider in criminal cases.
(B) The Chief Justice shall appoint, from among persons recommended by the  Governor:
(i) One voting member who has been represented by a public defense provider.
(ii) Two additional voting members, one of whom has experience  as a public defense
provider in juvenile delinquency or dependency cases.
(iii) Two nonvoting members who are currently employed as public  defense providers in
this state, one of whom is from an urban area and one of whom is from a rural area.
(C) The Chief Justice shall appoint, from among persons recommended  by the President
of the Senate:
(i) One voting member who is a  current dean or faculty member of an Oregon law school.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the Senate at the time of appointment.
(D) The Chief Justice shall appoint, from  among persons recommended by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives:
(i) One voting member who has expertise in juvenile law and criminal defense, or who is
a juvenile justice or criminal justice reform advocate.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the House of Representatives at the time
of appointment.
(E) The Chief Justice shall appoint one voting  member from among persons jointly re-
commended by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b) When recommending and appointing  members of the commission, the Chief Justice,
Governor, President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall:
(A) Consider input from individuals  and organizations with an interest in the delivery of
public defense services.
(B) Consider geographic, racial, ethnic and gender diversity.
(C) Ensure that members appointed to the commission have  significant experience with
issues related to public defense or  in the case types subject to representation by public de-
fense providers.
(D) Ensure  that members appointed to the commission have demonstrated a strong
commitment to quality public defense representation.
(c) The following persons may not be appointed to and may not serve  as members of the
commission:
(A) A prosecuting attorney.
(B) A judge, magistrate or other person who performs judicial functions.
(C) An employee of a law enforcement agency or the Department of Human Services.
(d) A person who is  primarily engaged in providing public defense services and who has
a financial interest  in the delivery of public defense services at the state level may not serve
as a voting member of the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 2
(e) As used in this subsection, “law enforcement agency” means an entity that employs
corrections officers, parole and probation officers, police officers,  certified reserve officers
or reserve officers, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(3) The term of a member is four years  beginning on the effective date of the order of the Chief
Justice appointing the member. A member is eligible for reappointment if qualified for  membership
at the time of reappointment , but may serve no more than two  consecutive four-year terms .
[A member  may be removed from the commission by order of the Chief Justice. ] The Chief Justice
may remove any member of the commission at any time for cause.  If a vacancy occurs for any
cause before the expiration of the term of a member, the Chief Justice shall make an  appointment
to fill the  vacancy, in the same manner as an appointment to a full term,  to become imme-
diately effective for the unexpired term. If the Chief Justice has not filled a  vacancy within 45
days after the vacancy  occurs, the remaining voting members of the commission shall, by a
majority vote, select a member to fill the  vacancy for the remainder of the term. The se-
lected member must meet the requirements for membership described in this section.
(4) A chairperson and a vice chairperson shall be [ appointed by order  of the Chief Justice ]
elected by the  voting members of the commission  every two years with such functions as the
commission may determine. A member is  eligible for [ reappointment] reelection  as chairperson or
vice chairperson.
(5) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(6)(a) All members of the commission shall:
(A) Review the  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required by ORS 151.216 and
provide input before the approval vote described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(B) Review the budget of the commission and provide  input before the approval vote de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) Meet as needed to carry out the duties described in this subsection.
(b) The voting members of the commission shall:
(A) Appoint, by a two-thirds vote, an executive  director for a term of office of four years.
The term may be terminated for cause by  a majority vote of the voting members after notice
and a hearing. When the term of an executive director  ends without termination, the voting
members of the commission  may reappoint the person currently in the position by a majority
vote.
(B) Upon the vacancy of the  executive director position, immediately designate an acting
executive director by a majority vote.
(C) Approve by majority vote the  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required
by ORS 151.216 before those policies, procedures, standards and guidelines may take effect.
(D) Approve by majority vote the budget of the  commission before submission to the
Legislative Assembly.
(7) The members of the commission may not:
(a) Make any decision regarding the handling of any individual case;
(b) Have access to any case file; or
(c) Interfere with the executive director or  any member of the staff of the executive di-
rector in carrying out professional duties involving the legal representation of public defense
clients.
[(6)] (8) A member  of the commission is [ not] entitled to compensation for services as a member,
[but is entitled ] and to expenses , as provided in ORS 292.495 [ (2)].
SECTION 3.
 ORS 151.216 is amended to read:
151.216. (1) The [ Public Defense Services  Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission
shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense  system that ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon  Constitution, the United States Constitution and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 3
[(b) Establish an office of public defense services and appoint a public  defense services executive
director who serves at the pleasure of the commission. ]
[(c)] (b)  Adopt policies for [ contracting for ] public  defense providers [ not employed by the office
of public defense services ] that:
(A) Ensure compensation,  resources and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) [ Promote policies for public defense  provider compensation and resources that are comparable
to prosecution compensation and resources ] Ensure all public defense  provider contracts provide
for compensation that is commensurate with the character of service performed ;
(C) Ensure  funding and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider overhead costs that account for the  cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or jurisdiction, including  but not limited to rent, professional
membership dues,  malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual oper-
ating costs.
[(d)] (c)  Establish operational and contracting systems that allow for oversight,  ensure trans-
parency and stakeholder engagement  and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific repre-
sentation.
[(e)] (d)  Review the caseload policies described in  paragraph [ (c)(A) ] (b)(A)  of this subsection
annually, and revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
[(f)] (e)  Adopt a statewide workload  plan, based on the caseload policies described in paragraph
[(c)(A) ] (b)(A)  of this subsection, that takes into account  the needs of each county or jurisdiction,
practice structure and  type of practice overseen by the [office of public defense services ]
commission.
[(g)] (f)  Submit the budget of the commission [ and the office of public defense services ] to the
Legislative Assembly after the budget is submitted to the commission by the  executive director and
approved by the  voting members of the  commission. The Chief  Justice of the Supreme Court and
the chairperson of the commission shall present the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
[(h) Review and approve any public defense services contract negotiated  by the director before the
contract can become effective. ]
[(i)] (g)  Adopt a compensation plan, classification system and [ personnel] affirmative action
plan for the [ office of public defense services ] commission  that  are commensurate with other state
agencies.
[(j)] (h)  Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination  of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be represented by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including the appointment of  counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair compensation of counsel appointed to represent a person  financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) [ Any other ] The  costs associated with the representation of a person  by appointed counsel
in the state courts that are required  to be paid by the state [ under ORS 34.355, 135.055, 138.500,
138.590, 161.346, 161.348, 161.365, 419A.211, 419B.201, 419B.208, 419B.518, 419B.908, 419C.206,
419C.209, 419C.408, 419C.535, 426.100, 426.135, 426.250, 426.307, 427.265, 427.295, 436.265 or 436.315
or any other provision of law that expressly  provides for payment of such compensation, costs or ex-
penses by the commission ]; and
[(F) Professional qualifications for counsel appointed to represent public defense clients; ]
[(G) Performance for legal representation; ]
[(H) The contracting of public defense services; ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 4
[(I) Contracting with expert witnesses to allow contracting with out-of-state  expert witnesses only
if in-state expert witnesses are not available or  are more expensive than out-of-state expert witnesses;
and]
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
[(J) Any other matters necessary to carry out the duties of the commission. ]
[(k) Establish a peer review system for the approval of nonroutine  fees and expenses incurred in
cases involving aggravated murder and the crimes listed in  ORS 137.700 and 137.707. The review shall
be conducted by a panel of attorneys who practice in the area of criminal defense. ]
[(L) Establish a complaint process  that allows district attorneys, criminal defense counsel and the
public to file  complaints concerning the payment from public funds of nonroutine fees and expenses
incurred in cases. ]
[(m)] (i)  Reimburse the State Court Administrator  from funds deposited in the Public Defense
Services Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs of personnel and other costs  associated
with location of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to ORS 151.489 by the State
Court Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee the implementation, enforcement  and modification of pol-
icies, procedures, minimum standards and guidelines to ensure  that public defense providers
are providing effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible  persons in this state
as required by statute  and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, proce-
dures, standards and guidelines described  in this paragraph apply to employees of the com-
mission and to  any person or entity that contracts with the commission to provide public
defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of  data
concerning the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring  the delivery of public defense ser-
vices into and maintain  compliance with the minimum policies, procedures, standards and
guidelines described in this subsection. All contracts for the provision  of public defense ser-
vices to which the commission is a party must include a requirement for collection by  the
commission of data determined by the commission to be qualitatively necessary for any  re-
port required to be submitted to the Legislative Assembly.
(n) At least once every two years, report to  the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, and to  the Gov-
ernor and Chief Justice, concerning compliance metrics for the  minimum standards de-
scribed in this subsection and recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public de-
fense services.
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department, ensure the existence of policies  that
create a standardized process for determining  and verifying financial eligibility for appointed
counsel under ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and comprehensive training programs for  attorneys for
the purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
(r) Enter into  contracts or interagency agreements with the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services for the purpose of supporting state public  defense population forecasts
and other related forecasts.
(s) Pay invoices submitted to the commission within 45  days of receipt or in accordance
with statewide accounting policies established by the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services.
(t) Establish any other policies, procedures, standards and guidelines for the conduct of
the commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out  all powers and du-
ties of the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 5
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines de-
scribed in this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed counsel shall be provided sufficient  time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of  appointed counsel must be controlled to permit effective represen-
tation. Economic disincentives or  incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to
provide effective assistance of counsel must  be avoided. The commission may develop work-
load controls to enhance appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match  the nature and
complexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously represent a client  throughout the
pendency of the case and shall  appear at every court appearance other than ministerial
hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for  public
defense providers who are employed by or contract with the commission that are  specific to
the subject matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically  review appointed
counsel for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be  organized in a manner for the effective delivery of public
defense services as prescribed by the policies and procedures created pursuant to statute  to
financially eligible persons and consistent  with the budgetary structure established for the
commission by the Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall  hire attorneys to serve as appointed counsel, including at the
trial level in Oregon circuit courts, and may establish a trial  division within the commission
consisting of  attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense pro-
viders.
(5) The policies, procedures, standards  and guidelines adopted by the commission must
be made available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
[(2)] (6) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures  of the Public Defender Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and the  Psychiatric Security Review
Board related to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this  section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
[(3)] (7)  The commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any  source, whether
public or private. However, the commission may  not accept a gift, grant or contribution if accept-
ance would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this subsection shall be deposited
in the Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 and expended for the  purposes
for which given or granted.
[(4) The commission may not: ]
[(a) Make any decision regarding the handling of any individual case; ]
[(b) Have access to any case file; or ]
[(c) Interfere with the director or any member of the staff of the director in carrying  out profes-
sional duties involving the legal representation of public defense clients. ]
SECTION 4.
 ORS 151.219 is amended to read:
151.219. (1) The [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense
Commission shall:
(a) Designate a deputy director  of the commission who serves at the pleasure of the
executive director.
(b) Hire necessary staff for the commission.
[(a)] (c)  Recommend to the [ Public Defense Services ] commission how to establish and maintain,
in a cost-effective manner, the delivery of legal services to  persons entitled to, and, where applica-
ble, financially eligible for,  appointed counsel at state expense under Oregon statutes, the Oregon
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 6
Constitution, the United States  Constitution and consistent with Oregon and national standards of
justice.
[(b)] (d)  Implement and ensure compliance with contracts, policies, procedures,  standards and
guidelines adopted by the commission or required by statute.
[(c)] (e)  Prepare and submit  to the commission for its approval the biennial budget of the com-
mission [ and the office of public defense services ].
[(d)] (f)  Negotiate contracts, as appropriate, for providing legal services to persons eligible  for
appointed counsel at state expense. [ No contract so negotiated is binding or  enforceable until the
contract has been reviewed and approved by the commission as provided in ORS 151.216. ]
[(e)] (g)  Employ personnel or  contract for services as necessary to carry out the responsibilities
of the  executive director and the [ office of public defense services ] commission .
[(f)] (h)  Supervise the personnel, operation and activities of the [ office of public defense
services ] commission.
[(g)] (i)  Provide services, facilities and  materials necessary for the performance of the duties,
functions and powers of the [ Public Defense Services ] commission.
[(h)] (j)  Pay the expenses of the commission [ and the office of public defense services ].
[(i)] (k)  Prepare and submit to the  members of the  commission an annual report  of the activ-
ities of the [ office of public defense services ] commission .
[(j) Prepare and submit to the Legislative Assembly a biennial report on the activities of  the office
of public defense services. ]
[(k)] (L)  Provide  for legal representation, advice and consultation for the commission, its mem-
bers, the executive director and staff of the [ office of public defense services ] commission  who re-
quire such services or who are named as defendants in lawsuits arising from their duties,  functions
and responsibilities. If requested by the executive director, the Attorney General may also  provide
for legal representation, advice and consultation for the  commission, its members, the  executive
director and staff of the [ office of public defense services ] commission  in litigation.
(2) The  executive director may :
(a) Designate persons as representatives of the executive director for the purposes of deter-
mining and paying bills submitted to the [ office of  public defense services ] commission  and deter-
mining preauthorization for incurring fees and expenses under ORS 135.055.
(b) Establish an external advisory group  to assist in developing the standard operating
expectations for persons and entities providing public defense services.
SECTION 5.  ORS 151.221 is amended to read:
151.221. Officers and employees of the [ office of public defense services, who are appointed under
a personnel  plan adopted by the Public Defense Services Commission, ] Oregon Public Defense
Commission are state officers or employees in the  exempt service and are not subject to ORS
chapter 240.
SECTION 6.  ORS 151.225 is amended to read:
151.225. (1) The Public Defense  Services Account is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Public Defense Services Account is continuously  appro-
priated to the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  for:
(a) Administration and support of the public defense system;
(b) Reimbursement of the State Court Administrator under ORS 151.216 [ (1)(m)] (1)(i); and
(c) Legal representation of parents and children involved in  foster care for which matching
funds under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c) may be used.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited in the Public Defense Services Account:
(a) Moneys received by the commission  from the State Court Administrator under ORS 151.216
[(1)(m)] (1)(i);
(b) Moneys received by the Judicial Department under ORS 135.050 (8), 151.487 (1),  419A.211 or
419B.198 (1);
(c) Federal matching funds received under 45 C.F.R. 1356.60(c); and
(d) Miscellaneous revenues and receipts of the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 7
(3) All gifts,  grants or contributions accepted by the commission under ORS 151.216 shall be
deposited in a separate  subaccount created in the Public Defense Services Account to be used by
the commission for the purpose for which the gift, grant or contribution was given or granted.
SECTION 7.  ORS 135.055 is amended to read:
135.055. (1) Counsel appointed pursuant to ORS 135.045 or 135.050 shall be paid fair compen-
sation for representation in the case:
(a) By the county, subject to the approval of the governing body of the county, in a  proceeding
in a county or justice court.
(b) By the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public  Defense Commis-
sion from funds available for the purpose, in a proceeding in a circuit court.
(2) Except for counsel appointed pursuant to contracts or counsel employed by the  [ public de-
fense services executive director ] Oregon Public Defense Commission , compensation  payable to
appointed counsel under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) In a proceeding in a county or justice court may not be less than $30 per hour.
(b) In a proceeding in  a circuit court is subject to the applicable compensation established under
ORS 151.216.
(3)(a) A person determined to be eligible for appointed counsel is  entitled to necessary and
reasonable fees and expenses for investigation, preparation and presentation  of the case for trial,
negotiation and sentencing. The person  or the counsel for the person shall upon written request
secure preauthorization to incur fees and expenses that  [ are not routine to representation but ] are
necessary and reasonable in the  investigation, preparation and presentation of the case  and that
require preauthorization under a policy of the Oregon Public Defense Commission , including
but not limited to [ nonroutine] travel, photocopying or other reproduction of [ nonroutine] documents,
necessary costs associated with obtaining the attendance of witnesses for the defense, investigator
fees and expenses, expert witness  fees and expenses and fees for interpreters and assistive commu-
nication devices necessary for the purpose of communication  between counsel and a client or wit-
ness in the case. Preauthorization to incur a fee or expense  does not guarantee that a fee or
expense incurred pursuant to  the preauthorization will be determined to be necessary or reasonable
when the fee or expense is submitted for payment.
(b) In a county or justice court, the request must be in the  form of a motion to the court. The
motion must be accompanied by a supporting affidavit that sets out in detail the  purpose of the re-
quested expenditure, the name of  the service provider or other recipient of the funds, the dollar
amount of  the requested expenditure that may not be exceeded without additional authorization and
the date or dates during which  the service will be rendered or events will occur for which the ex-
penditure is requested.
(c) In a circuit court, the request must be in the form and contain  the information that is re-
quired by the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines  of the [ Public Defense Services Com-
mission] Oregon Public Defense  Commission. If the [ public defense services ] executive director  of
the commission  denies a request for preauthorization to  incur [ nonroutine] fees and expenses
subject to a preauthorization  requirement , the person making the request may appeal the deci-
sion to the presiding judge of the circuit court. The presiding  judge has final authority to preau-
thorize incurring [ nonroutine] fees and expenses under this paragraph.
(d) Entitlement under subsection (7) of this section to payment  for fees and expenses in circuit
court is subject to  the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted under ORS 151.216.
Entitlement to payment of  [ nonroutine] fees and expenses  subject to a preauthorization require-
ment is  dependent upon obtaining preauthorization from the court, if the case is in county or justice
court, or from the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the  Oregon Public Defense
Commission, if the case is in circuit court, except as otherwise provided  in paragraph (c) of this
subsection and in the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted under  ORS 151.216.
Fees and expenses shall be paid:
(A) By the county, in respect to a proceeding in a county or justice court.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 8
(B) By the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the commission  from  funds available
for the purpose, in respect to a proceeding in a circuit court.
(C) By the city, in respect to a proceeding in municipal court.
(4) Upon completion of all services  by the counsel of a person determined to be eligible for ap-
pointed counsel, the counsel shall submit a statement of all necessary and reasonable  fees and ex-
penses of investigation, preparation and presentation and, if counsel was appointed  by the court, a
statement of  all necessary and reasonable fees and expenses for legal representation, supported by
appropriate receipts or vouchers and certified by the counsel to be true and accurate.
(5) In a  county or justice court, the total fees and expenses payable under this section must be
submitted to the court by counsel or other providers and are subject to the review  of the court. The
court shall certify that such amount is fair reimbursement for  fees and expenses for representation
in the case as provided in subsection (6) of this section. Upon certification and  any verification as
provided under subsection (6) of this section, the  amount of the fees and expenses approved by the
court and not already paid shall be paid by the county.
(6) In a county or justice court,  the court shall certify to the administrative authority respon-
sible for paying fees and expenses under this section that the amount for payment is reasonable and
that the amount is properly payable out of public funds.
(7) In a circuit court, the total fees and expenses payable under this section  must be submitted
to and are  subject to review by the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public
Defense Commission . The [ public defense services ] executive director of the commission  shall
determine whether the amount is necessary,  reasonable and properly payable from public funds for
fees and expenses for representation in the case as provided by the  policies, procedures, standards
and guidelines of  the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] commission . The [ public defense
services ] executive director of the commission  shall  pay the amount of the fees and expenses de-
termined necessary, reasonable and properly  payable out of public funds. The court shall provide
any information identified and  requested by the [ public defense services ] executive director of the
commission as needed for audit, statistical or any other purpose pertinent to ensure the proper
disbursement of state funds or pertinent to the provision of appointed  counsel compensated at state
expense.
(8) If the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commis-
sion denies, in whole  or in part, fees and expenses submitted for review and payment, the person
who submitted the payment request may appeal the  decision to the presiding judge of the circuit
court. The presiding judge or the designee of  the presiding judge shall review the [ public defense
services ] executive director’s decision for abuse of discretion. The decision  of the presiding judge
or the designee of the presiding judge is final.
(9) The following  may not be disclosed to the district attorney prior to the conclusion of a case:
(a) Requests and administrative  or court orders for preauthorization to incur [ nonroutine] fees
and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement  in the investigation, preparation and
presentation of the case; and
(b) Billings for such fees and expenses submitted by counsel or other providers.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (9) of this section, the  total amount of moneys determined to
be necessary and reasonable for [ nonroutine] fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization re-
quirement may be disclosed to the district attorney at the conclusion of the trial in the circuit
court.
(11) As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise,  “counsel” includes a legal
advisor appointed under ORS 135.045.
SECTION 7a.
(1) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall issue state
public defense population forecasts including, but not limited to, expected  populations of
adults and juveniles eligible for appointed counsel, to be used by:
(a) The  Oregon Public Defense Commission, in preparing budget requests or for any
other purpose determined necessary by the commission; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 9
(b) Any other state agency concerned with the effect of public defense  populations or
policy developments on budgeting.
(2) The  department shall issue state public defense population forecasts on April 15 and
October 15 of each year.
(3) When the department issues a state public defense  population forecast, the forecast
must:
(a) Discretely identify adult and juvenile  populations that are eligible for appointed
counsel categorized by either circuit or appellate court;
(b) Identify the forecast’s margin of error for adult and juvenile populations; and
(c) Attribute growth or decline in the forecast, relative to previously issued  forecasts,
to specific policies or to specific components of the baseline underlying the forecast.
(4) The Oregon Public Defense Commission, the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, the
Judicial Department and, if requested by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services,
any other state agency, shall provide the Oregon Department of Administrative Services with
any information necessary for  the department to prepare the forecasts described in this
section.
(5) As used in this section, “baseline  underlying the forecast” includes population demo-
graphics and crime trends.
(Transfer of Duties)
SECTION 8.
(1) The Public Defense Services Commission is abolished.  On the operative
date of this section, the tenure of office of the members of the Public Defense  Services
Commission ceases.
(2) All of the duties, functions and powers  of the Public Defense Services Commission,
except as those duties, functions  and powers are modified by the amendments to ORS
151.213, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 2 to 4 of this 2023  Act, are imposed upon, transferred
to and vested in the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
SECTION 9. (1) The chairperson of the Public Defense Services Commission  and the
public defense services executive director shall:
(a) Deliver to the  Oregon Public Defense Commission all records and property within the
jurisdiction of the chairperson and executive director that relate to the duties,  functions and
powers transferred by section 8 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Transfer to the Oregon Public Defense Commission those employees  engaged prima-
rily in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 8 of this 2023
Act.
(2) The executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission shall take possession
of the records and property, and shall take charge of the employees  and employ them in the
exercise of the  duties, functions and powers transferred by section 8 of this 2023 Act, without
reduction of compensation but subject to change or termination of employment or compen-
sation as provided by law.
SECTION 10.
(1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be  expended by the
Public Defense Services Commission for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, from revenues
dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for the pur-
pose of administering and enforcing the duties,  functions and powers transferred by section
8 of this 2023 Act are transferred to and are  available for expenditure by the Oregon Public
Defense Commission for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, for the purpose of administer-
ing and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 8 of this 2023  Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or  limiting
expenditures by the Public Defense Services Commission remain applicable to  expenditures
by the Oregon Public Defense Commission under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 10
SECTION 11. The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Oregon Public Defense
Commission by section 8 of this 2023 Act does not affect any action, proceeding or  prose-
cution involving or with  respect to such duties, functions and powers begun before and
pending at the time of the transfer, except that the  Oregon Public Defense Commission is
substituted for the Public Defense Services Commission in  the action, proceeding or prose-
cution.
SECTION 12. (1) Nothing in this 2023 Act relieves a person of a liability, duty  or obli-
gation accruing under or with respect to the duties, functions and powers  transferred by
section 8 of this 2023 Act. The Oregon Public Defense Commission may  undertake the col-
lection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the Public Defense Services Commission  legally incurred
under contracts, leases and business transactions executed, entered into or begun before  the
operative date of section 8 of this  Act are transferred to the Oregon Public Defense Com-
mission. For the purpose of succession to these  rights and obligations, the Oregon Public
Defense Commission is a continuation  of the Public Defense Services Commission and not a
new authority.
SECTION 13. For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying statutory law, the Legislative
Counsel may substitute  for words designating the “Public Defense Services Commission” or
its officers, or the office of public defense services, wherever  they occur in statutory law,
words designating the “Oregon Public Defense Commission” or its officers.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 7a to 13 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 151.211,
151.213, 151.216, 151.219, 151.221, 151.225 and 135.055 by sections 1 to 7 of this 2023 Act become
operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) No later than November  1, 2023, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall by order
appoint four nonvoting members and nine new voting members to  the Oregon Public Defense
Commission as provided in ORS 151.213 (2). Except as provided  in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, the appointments described in this subsection take effect on January 1, 2024.
(b) The Chief Justice, Governor, President of the  Senate and Speaker of the House of
Representatives may take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of
this section that is necessary to effectuate the  appointment process described in this sub-
section and ORS 151.213 (2).
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 151.213 (6)(b), and subject to the provisions of sections 92 (3)
and 102 (2) of this 2023 Act, on January 1, 2024, the  public defense services executive director
shall begin a four-year term as executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission,
and is subject to termination or reappointment as described in ORS 151.213 (6)(b).
(b) The public defense services executive director and the members of  the commission
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that
is necessary to enable the executive director and the members to exercise, on  and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the executive director and the members by sections 7a to 13 of this  2023 Act
and the amendments to ORS 151.211,  151.213, 151.216, 151.219, 151.221, 151.225 and 135.055 by
sections 1 to 7 of this 2023 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 151.213 (3), and subject to the provisions of sections 92 (3)  and
102 (2) of  this 2023 Act, the initial terms of persons appointed as voting members to the
Oregon Public Defense Commission under this section shall be staggered as follows:
(a) The initial term of one of the voting members described in ORS 151.213  (2)(a)(A), one
of the  voting members described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(B) and the voting member described
in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(E) shall be four years.
(b) The initial term of one of the  voting members described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(A) and
the voting member described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(C) shall be three years.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 11
(c) The initial term of one of  the voting members described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(B) and
the voting member described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(D) shall be two years.
(d) The initial term of one of the  voting members described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(A) and
one of the voting members described in ORS 151.213 (2)(a)(B) shall be one year.
(5) A person  who is a member of the Public Defense Services Commission on November
1, 2023, is eligible for  appointment to the Oregon Public Defense Commission if the person
meets the requirements described in ORS 151.213 (2).
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 15.  ORS 1.009 is amended to read:
1.009. (1) The Judicial Department Operating  Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  account shall be credited to the
account. All moneys in the account are  continuously appropriated to the Judicial Department and
may be used only to pay the operating expenses of the department.
(2) All moneys  received by the department pursuant to ORS 151.216 [ (1)(m)] (1)(i)  shall be de-
posited in the Judicial Department Operating Account.
(3) The department  may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private, for deposit in the Judicial Department Operating Account.
SECTION 16.  ORS 8.105 is amended to read:
8.105. (1) Before making any  change to a compensation plan, an administrative division of the
judicial department must submit the proposed  change to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means
during the period when the Legislative  Assembly is in session, or to the Emergency Board or the
Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means during the interim period between sessions.
(2) This section  applies to all boards, commissions, committees and departments of the judicial
department, as defined in ORS 174.113, including but not limited to the [ Public Defense  Services
Commission] Oregon Public Defense Commission  and the Commission on Judicial Fitness and
Disability.
SECTION 17.  ORS 34.355 is amended to read:
34.355. If counsel is appointed by a court to represent, in an initial  proceeding by habeas corpus
or on appeal as provided in ORS 34.710, a person  who is imprisoned or otherwise restrained of lib-
erty by virtue of a charge or conviction of crime and who is  determined to be financially eligible
for appointed counsel at state expense, the  [ public defense services ] executive director  of the
Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall determine compensation for counsel  and costs and ex-
penses of the person in the proceeding or on appeal. Compensation for counsel and expenses of  the
person in an initial proceeding or in a circuit court on appeal shall be determined and paid as pro-
vided in ORS 135.055. Compensation for  counsel and costs and expenses of the person on appeal to
the Court of Appeals or on review by the Supreme Court shall be  determined and paid as provided
in ORS 138.500. The compensation and expenses so allowed in an  initial proceeding in a county
court shall be paid by the county in which the person was charged or convicted of crime.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 40.225 is amended to read:
40.225. (1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) “Client” means:
(A) A person, public officer, corporation, association or other  organization or entity, either
public or private, who is  rendered professional legal services by a lawyer, or who consults a lawyer
with a view to obtaining professional legal services from the lawyer.
(B) A person, public officer, corporation, association  or other organization or entity, either
public or private, who consults a  lawyer referral service with a view to obtaining professional legal
services from a lawyer.
(b) “Confidential communication” means a  communication not intended to be disclosed to third
persons other than those to whom disclosure is in furtherance of the rendition of professional  legal
services to the client or those reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communication.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 12
(c) “Lawyer” means a person  authorized, or reasonably believed by the client to be authorized,
to practice law in any state or nation.
(d) “Lawyer referral service” means an entity that, as a regular  part of its business, refers po-
tential clients to lawyers, including but not limited to a public nonprofit entity sponsored  or oper-
ated by the Oregon State Bar.
(e) “Representative of the client” means:
(A) A principal, an officer or a director of the client; or
(B) A person who has authority to obtain professional legal services, or to act on  legal advice
rendered, on behalf of the client, or a person who, for the purpose  of effectuating legal represen-
tation for the client, makes or receives a confidential communication while acting in the  person’s
scope of employment for the client.
(f) “Representative of the lawyer”  means one employed to assist the lawyer in the rendition of
professional legal services, but does not include a physician making a physical or mental  examina-
tion under ORCP 44.
(2) A client has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent  any other person from disclosing
confidential communications made for  the purpose of facilitating the rendition of professional legal
services to the client:
(a) Between  the client or the client’s representative and the client’s lawyer or a representative
of the lawyer;
(b) Between the  client’s lawyer and the lawyer’s representative or the client’s lawyer referral
service;
(c) By the client or the client’s lawyer to a  lawyer representing another in a matter of common
interest;
(d) Between representatives of the client or between the client and a representative  of the cli-
ent;
(e) Between lawyers representing the client; or
(f) Between the client or a representative of the client and a lawyer referral service.
(3) The privilege created by this  section may be claimed by the client, a guardian or conservator
of the client, the personal representative of a deceased client, or the successor, trustee, or similar
representative of a corporation, association,  or other organization, whether or not in existence. The
person who was the  lawyer or lawyer referral service or the lawyer’s representative at the time of
the communication is presumed to  have authority to claim the privilege but only on behalf of the
client.
(4) There is no privilege under this section:
(a) If the services of the lawyer or lawyer referral service were sought or obtained to  enable
or aid anyone to commit or plan to commit what the client knew or reasonably should have  known
to be a crime or fraud;
(b) As to a communication relevant  to an issue between parties who claim through the same
deceased client, regardless of whether the claims are  by testate or intestate succession or by inter
vivos transaction;
(c) As to a communication relevant to an  issue of breach of duty by the lawyer or lawyer re-
ferral service to the client or by the client to the lawyer or lawyer referral service;
(d) As to  a communication relevant to an issue concerning an attested document to which the
lawyer or lawyer referral service is an attesting witness; or
(e) As to a communication relevant to a matter of common interest between two or  more clients
if the communication was made by any of them to a lawyer retained or  consulted in common, when
offered in an action between any of the clients.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS  40.280, a privilege is maintained under this section for a communi-
cation made to the [ office of public defense services established under ORS 151.216 ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission  for the purpose of seeking preauthorization for or  payment of [ nonroutine]
fees or expenses under ORS 135.055.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 13
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(c) of this section and ORS 40.280, a privilege is  maintained
under this section for a communication that is made to the [ office of public defense services  estab-
lished under  ORS 151.216 ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  for the purpose of making, or
providing information regarding, a complaint against a lawyer providing public defense services.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 40.280, a privilege is maintained under this section for  a communi-
cation ordered to be disclosed under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 19.  ORS 42.125 is amended to read:
42.125. (1) For the purposes of ORS 40.510 (1)(a) and (d), each state officer  and state agency may
have a seal  which, unless specifically provided otherwise by law, shall consist of an impression,
imprint or likeness of the state seal accompanied by the name of the state officer or state agency.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Seal” has the meaning given that term in ORS 42.110.
(b) “State agency” means every state  officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch
or agency of the state government, except:
(A) The Legislative Assembly and the courts and their officers and committees; and
(B) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
(c) “State officer” includes any appointed state  official who is authorized by the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services to  have a seal and any elected state official, except members
of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 45.275 is amended to read:
45.275. (1)(a) The court shall appoint  a qualified interpreter in a civil or criminal proceeding,
and a hearing officer or the designee of a hearing officer shall appoint a qualified  interpreter in an
adjudicatory proceeding, whenever it is necessary:
(A) To interpret the proceedings to a non-English-speaking party;
(B) To interpret the testimony of a non-English-speaking party or witness; or
(C) To assist the court, agency or hearing officer  in performing the duties and responsibilities
of the court, agency or hearing officer.
(b) The court shall appoint a qualified interpreter in a criminal proceeding  whenever it is nec-
essary to interpret the proceedings to a non-English-speaking  victim who seeks to exercise in open
court a right that is granted by Article I, section 42 or 43, of  the Oregon Constitution, including the
right to be present at a critical stage of the proceeding.
(2) A fee may  not be charged to any person for the appointment of an interpreter to interpret
testimony of a non-English-speaking party  or witness, to interpret the proceedings to a non-
English-speaking party or victim  or to assist the court, agency or hearing officer in performing the
duties and responsibilities of the court, agency or hearing officer. A fee may not be charged  to any
person for the appointment of an interpreter if appointment is made to determine whether the person
is non-English-speaking for the purposes of this section.
(3) Fair compensation for the services of an  interpreter appointed under this section shall be
paid:
(a) By the county, subject to the approval of  the terms of the contract by the governing body
of the county, in a proceeding in a county or justice court.
(b) By the city, subject to the approval of  the terms of the contract by the governing body of
the city, in a proceeding in a municipal court.
(c) By the state in a  proceeding in a circuit court. Amounts payable by the state are not payable
from the Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 or from moneys  appropriated
to the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon  Public Defense Commission . Fees of an in-
terpreter necessary for the purpose of communication between appointed counsel and a client  or
witness in a criminal case are payable from the Public Defense Services Account  or from moneys
appropriated to the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
(d) By the agency in an adjudicatory proceeding.
(4) If a party, victim or witness is dissatisfied with the interpreter appointed by the court, the
hearing officer or the designee of the hearing officer, the party, victim  or witness may request the
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 14
appointment of a different interpreter. A request under this subsection  must be made in a manner
consistent with the policies and notice requirements of the court or agency relating to  the ap-
pointment and scheduling of  interpreters. If the substitution of another interpreter will delay the
proceeding, the person making the request must show good cause  for the substitution. Any party
may object to use of any interpreter for good cause. Unless the court, hearing officer or the designee
of the hearing officer has appointed a different interpreter  for cause, the party using any interpreter
other than  the interpreter originally appointed by the court, hearing officer or the designee of the
hearing officer shall bear any additional costs beyond the amount required to  pay the original in-
terpreter.
(5) A judge or hearing officer, on the  judge’s or hearing officer’s own motion, may substitute a
different interpreter for the interpreter initially  appointed in a proceeding. A judge or hearing offi-
cer may make a substitution under this subsection at any time and for any reason.
(6) A court may allow as costs reasonable  expenses incurred by a party in employing the ser-
vices of an interpreter in civil proceedings in the manner provided by ORCP 68.
(7) A court, a hearing officer or the designee of a hearing officer  shall require any person
serving as an interpreter for  the court or agency to state the person’s name on the record and
whether the person is certified under ORS 45.291. If the  person is certified under ORS 45.291, the
interpreter need not  make the oath or affirmation required by ORS 40.325 or submit the interpreter’s
qualifications on the record. If the person is not certified under ORS 45.291, the  interpreter must
make the oath or affirmation required by  ORS 40.325 and submit the interpreter’s qualifications on
the record.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Hearing officer” includes an administrative law judge.
(b) “Non-English-speaking person” means a person who, by reason of place of birth  or culture,
speaks a language other than English and does not speak English with  adequate ability to commu-
nicate effectively in the proceedings.
(c) “Qualified  interpreter” means a person who is readily able to communicate with the non-
English-speaking person and who  can orally transfer the meaning of statements to and from English
and the language spoken by the non-English-speaking person. A qualified interpreter  must be able
to interpret in a manner that conserves the meaning, tone, level, style and register of the original
statement, without additions or omissions. “Qualified interpreter”  does not include any person who
is unable to interpret the  dialect, slang or specialized vocabulary used by the party, victim or wit-
ness.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 45.285 is amended to read:
45.285. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Assistive communication device” means  any equipment designed to facilitate communication
by a person with a disability.
(b) “Hearing officer” includes an administrative law judge.
(c) “Person with  a disability” means a person who cannot readily understand the proceedings
because of deafness or a physical hearing  impairment, or cannot communicate in the proceedings
because of a physical speaking impairment.
(d) “Qualified interpreter” means a person  who is readily able to communicate with the person
with a disability,  interpret the proceedings and accurately repeat and interpret the statements of the
person with a disability to the court.
(2) In any civil action,  adjudicatory proceeding or criminal proceeding, including a court-ordered
deposition if no other person is responsible for providing an interpreter, in which  a person with a
disability is a party or witness, the court, hearing officer or the designee of  the hearing officer shall
appoint a qualified interpreter and  make available appropriate assistive communication devices
whenever  it  is necessary to interpret the proceedings to the person with a disability, or to interpret
the testimony of the person with a disability.
(3) In any criminal proceeding, the court shall appoint a qualified interpreter and make available
appropriate assistive communication devices whenever it is  necessary to interpret the proceedings
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 15
to a victim who is a person with a disability and who seeks to exercise in  open court a right that
is granted by Article I,  section 42 or 43, of the Oregon Constitution, including the right to be
present at a critical stage of the proceeding.
(4) A  fee may not be charged to the person with a disability for the appointment of an inter-
preter or use of an assistive communication device under this section. A fee may  not be charged to
any person for the  appointment of an interpreter or the use of an assistive communication device
if appointment or use is made to determine whether the person is a person with  a disability for the
purposes of this section.
(5) Fair  compensation for the services of an interpreter or the cost of an assistive communi-
cation device under this section shall be paid:
(a) By the county, subject to the approval of the  terms of the contract by the governing body
of the county, in a proceeding in a county or justice court.
(b) By the city, subject to the approval of the terms  of the contract by the governing body of
the city, in a proceeding in a municipal court.
(c) By the state in a  proceeding in a circuit court. Amounts payable by the state are not payable
from the Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 or from moneys  appropriated
to the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public  Defense Commission . Fees of an in-
terpreter  necessary  for the purpose of communication between appointed counsel and a client or
witness in a criminal  case are payable from the Public Defense Services Account or from moneys
appropriated to the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
(d) By the agency in an adjudicatory proceeding.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 84.064 is amended to read:
84.064. (1) For purposes of ORS 84.049, 84.052 and 84.055,  the State Chief Information Officer
shall make determinations and adopt standards for state agencies.
(2) The  State Chief Information Officer shall adopt rules to govern state agency use of electronic
signatures. The rules  must include control processes and procedures to ensure adequate integrity,
security and confidentiality for business  transactions that state agencies conduct using electronic
commerce and to ensure that the transactions can  be audited as is necessary for the normal conduct
of business.
(3) As used in this section,  “state agency” means every state officer and board, commission,
department, institution, branch and agency of the state government, the  costs of which are paid
wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the  courts, the district attorney for each county and the officers
and committees of the Legislative Assembly, the courts and the district attorney; and
(b) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
SECTION 23.  ORS 125.035 is amended to read:
125.035. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Case subtype” means guardianship, conservatorship or guardianship and conservatorship.
(b) “Case type” means adult protective proceeding or minor protective proceeding.
(2) No later  than September 15 of each year, the Judicial Department shall submit, to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  the judiciary, a report on county-level data
concerning protective proceedings in Multnomah, Lane and Columbia Counties during the two cal-
endar years immediately preceding the year of the report, including:
(a) The number of protective proceedings initiated, broken out by case type and case subtype;
(b) The number of protective proceedings where the respondent was 65 years of  age or older at
the time the petition was filed;
(c) The number of protective proceedings  granted, broken out by case type and case subtype;
and
(d) The number of respondents or protected  persons for whom the court appointed counsel under
ORS 125.080, broken out by case subtype.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 16
(3) The department, in consultation with the [ office of public defense services ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission, shall also include in the report  described in subsection (2) of this section, to
the extent the data is available:
(a) The number of cases with court-appointed  counsel where payment for court-appointed coun-
sel was from the assets of the respondent or protected person, broken out by case subtype; and
(b) The aggregate number of hours court-appointed  counsel spent representing respondents or
protected persons and the average number of hours court-appointed counsel spent per case.
SECTION 24.  ORS 125.080 is amended to read:
125.080. (1) The court may require that a hearing be held on any petition  or motion in a pro-
tective  proceeding.
(2) A hearing must be held on a petition or  motion if the respondent or protected person makes
or files an objection to the petition or  motion and the objection is not withdrawn before the time
scheduled for the hearing.
(3) A hearing must be held on a motion to modify a guardian’s powers under ORS 125.323.
(4) The respondent or protected person may appear at a hearing in person or by counsel.
(5) If the hearing  is regarding a petition for appointment of a guardian for a vulnerable youth
or a petition involving a vulnerable youth guardianship, the court:
(a) May allow the respondent or protected person, proposed guardian, guardian or  any other
witness to appear by telephone, video or other remote technology;
(b)(A) May take  testimony from or confer with the respondent or protected person and may ex-
clude from the conference others if the court finds that doing so would be in  the best interests of
the respondent or protected person; and
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, shall permit any attorney for the re-
spondent or protected person to attend the conference and the conference must be reported;
(c) May  not inquire into the nationality or current immigration status of the proposed guardian,
guardian or any other witness; and
(d) May not inquire about any  prior immigration status of the respondent or protected person
or about the manner or place  in which the respondent or protected person entered the United States
of America.
(6)(a) If the court requires that a hearing be held or a hearing is otherwise required under  this
section, the court shall appoint counsel for the respondent or protected person when:
(A) The respondent or protected person requests that counsel be appointed;
(B) An objection is made or filed to the petition or motion by any person;
(C) The court has appointed a visitor under ORS 125.150, 125.160 or 125.605, and the visitor re-
commends appointment of counsel for the respondent or protected person; or
(D) The court determines that the respondent or protected person is in need of legal counsel.
(b) The court  is not required to appoint counsel under this subsection if the respondent or pro-
tected person is already represented by counsel or otherwise objects to appointment of counsel.
(7) If the court appoints counsel under subsection (6) of this section:
(a) The court  shall order payment of attorney fees and costs from the guardianship or
conservatorship estate of the respondent or protected person  if sufficient funds exist to pay all or
a portion of the attorney fees and costs due; or
(b) The court may determine that a respondent or protected person is financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense and, if so,  the compensation for legal counsel and costs and ex-
penses necessary for representation  of the respondent or protected person shall be determined and
paid by the [ public defense  services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission
as provided under ORS 135.055.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 135.050 is amended to read:
135.050. (1) Suitable counsel for a defendant shall be appointed by a municipal,  county or justice
court if:
(a) The defendant is before a court on a matter described in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) The defendant requests aid of counsel;
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 17
(c) The defendant provides to the court a written and verified financial statement; and
(d) It  appears to the court that the defendant is financially unable to retain adequate represen-
tation without substantial hardship in providing basic economic  necessities to the defendant or the
defendant’s dependent family.
(2) Suitable counsel for a defendant shall be appointed by a circuit court if:
(a) The defendant is before the court on a matter described in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) The defendant requests aid of counsel;
(c) The defendant provides to the court a written and verified financial statement; and
(d)(A) The defendant is determined to  be financially eligible under ORS 151.485 and the stand-
ards established by the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission
under ORS 151.216; or
(B) The court finds, on the record, substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant is fi-
nancially unable to retain adequate representation without  substantial hardship in providing basic
economic necessities to the defendant or the  defendant’s dependent family despite the fact that the
defendant does not meet the financial eligibility standards established by the commission.
(3) Appointed counsel may not be denied to any defendant merely  because the defendant’s
friends or relatives have resources adequate to retain counsel or  because the defendant has depos-
ited or is capable of depositing security for release. However, appointed counsel may  be denied to
a defendant if  the defendant’s spouse has adequate resources which the court determines should be
made available to retain counsel.
(4) The defendant’s financial  statement under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall include,
but not be limited to:
(a) A list of bank accounts in the name of defendant or defendant’s spouse,  and the balance in
each;
(b) A list of defendant’s interests in real property and those of defendant’s spouse;
(c) A list  of automobiles and other personal property of significant value belonging to defendant
or defendant’s spouse;
(d) A list of debts in the name of defendant or defendant’s spouse, and the total of each; and
(e) A record of earnings and  other sources of income in the name of defendant or defendant’s
spouse, and the total of each.
(5) Counsel must be appointed for a defendant  who meets the requirements of subsection (1) or
(2) of this section and who is before a court on any of the following matters:
(a) Charged with a crime.
(b) For a hearing to determine whether an  enhanced sentence should be imposed when such
proceedings may result in the imposition of a felony sentence.
(c) For extradition proceedings under the provisions of the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.
(d) For any proceeding concerning an order of probation,  including but not limited to the re-
voking or amending thereof.
(6) Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the appointment of counsel under  this section shall
continue during all criminal proceedings resulting from the defendant’s arrest through  acquittal or
the imposition  of punishment. The court having jurisdiction of the case may not substitute one ap-
pointed counsel for another except pursuant to the policies, procedures, standards  and guidelines
of the [ Public Defense  Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  under ORS
151.216.
(7) If, at any time after the appointment of counsel,  the court having jurisdiction of the case
finds that the defendant is  financially able to obtain counsel, the court may terminate the appoint-
ment of counsel. If, at any time during criminal proceedings, the court having  jurisdiction of the
case finds that the defendant is financially unable to pay counsel whom  the defendant has retained,
the court may appoint counsel as provided in this section.
(8) The court may order the defendant in a circuit court  to pay to the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225, through the clerk of the court, in full or in  part the adminis-
trative costs of determining the eligibility  of the defendant for appointed counsel and the costs of
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 18
the legal and other services that are  related to the provision of appointed counsel under ORS
151.487.
(9) In addition to any criminal prosecution,  a civil proceeding may be initiated by any public
body which has expended moneys for the defendant’s legal assistance within two years  of judgment
if the  defendant was not qualified in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section for legal
assistance.
(10) The civil proceeding shall be subject to the exemptions from execution as provided  for by
law.
(11) As used in this section unless the context requires otherwise,  “counsel” includes a legal
advisor appointed under ORS 135.045.
SECTION 26.  ORS 136.603 is amended to read:
136.603. (1)(a) Whenever any person  attends any court, grand jury or committing magistrate as
a witness on behalf of the prosecution  or of any person accused of a crime upon request of the
district attorney or city attorney or pursuant to subpoena, or by virtue of a  recognizance for that
purpose, and it appears that the witness has come from outside the  state or that the witness is in-
digent, the court may, by an order entered in its records, direct payment to the witness of such  sum
of money as the court considers reasonable for the expenses of the witness. The order  of the court,
so entered, is sufficient authority for the payment.
(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided by  law, if a witness who is to be paid expenses
pursuant to this subsection:
(A) Attends a grand jury, a circuit court or judge thereof, a judge of a county court or a  justice
of the peace, on behalf of the prosecution, payment shall be made by the county.
(B) Attends a municipal court or judge thereof on behalf of  the prosecution, payment shall be
made by the city.
(C) Attends a circuit court or judge thereof on behalf of a financially eligible defendant, payment
shall be made by the  [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense
Commission.
(D) Attends a judge of the county court or a  justice of the peace on behalf of a financially eli-
gible defendant, payment shall be made by the county.
(E) Attends a municipal court or judge thereof on behalf of  a financially eligible defendant,
payment shall be made by the city.
(F) Attends any court on behalf of a defendant who is not financially eligible, payment shall be
made by the defendant, and the court shall so order.
(2) In the case of a prisoner of a jurisdiction outside  of this state who is required to attend as
a witness in this state, whether for the prosecution or the defense, the sheriff shall be responsible
for transporting the witness to the  proper court of this state, and the sheriff shall assume any costs
incurred in connection with the witness while the witness is  in the custody of the sheriff. However,
the sheriff  and not the witness shall be entitled to the witness fees, mileage and expenses to which
the witness would otherwise be entitled under this section and ORS 136.627 or other applicable law.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 137.020 is amended to read:
137.020. (1) After a plea or verdict of guilty, or  after a verdict against the defendant on a plea
of former conviction or acquittal, if the judgment is not arrested or a new trial granted,  the court
shall appoint a time for pronouncing judgment.
(2)(a) The time  appointed shall be at least two calendar days after the plea or verdict if the
court intends to remain  in session so long. If the court does not intend to remain in session at least
two calendar days, the time appointed may be  sooner than two calendar days, but shall be as remote
a time  as can reasonably be allowed. However, in the latter case, the judgment shall not be given
less than six hours after the plea or verdict, except with the consent of the defendant.
(b) Except for good cause shown or as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a court shall  not
delay for more than 31 calendar days after the plea  or verdict the sentencing of a defendant held
in custody on account of the pending proceedings. Except for good cause shown or as  otherwise
provided in this paragraph, a court shall not delay for more than 56 calendar days after the  plea
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 19
or verdict the sentencing of a defendant  not held in custody on account of the pending proceedings.
If the defendant is not in custody and the court does not pronounce judgment within 56  calendar
days after the plea or verdict, any period  of probation imposed as a part of a subsequent judgment
shall begin to run from the date of the plea or verdict.
(3) If the defendant is in  custody following the verdict, the court shall pronounce judgment as
soon as practicable, but in  any case within seven calendar days following the verdict if no presen-
tence investigation is ordered,  and within seven calendar days after delivery of the presentence re-
port to the court if a presentence investigation has been ordered;  however, the court may delay
pronouncement of judgment beyond the limits of this subsection for good cause shown.
(4) If  the final calendar day a defendant must be sentenced is not a judicial day then sentencing
may be delayed until the next judicial day.
(5)(a) At the time a  court pronounces judgment the defendant, if present, shall be advised of the
right to appeal and of the procedure for protecting  that right. If the defendant is not present, the
court shall advise the defendant in writing of the  right to appeal and of the procedure for protecting
that right.
(b) If the trial court sentences the defendant subsequent to a plea of guilty or no contest or upon
probation revocation or  sentence suspension, or if the trial court sentences the defendant after
judgment of an appellate court or a post-conviction relief court, the court shall  advise the defendant
of the limitations on reviewability imposed by ORS 138.105 in person or,  if the defendant is not
present, in writing.
(6) If the defendant is financially eligible for appointment of counsel at state  expense on appeal
under ORS 138.500, trial  counsel shall determine whether the defendant wishes to pursue an appeal.
If the  defendant wishes to pursue an appeal, trial counsel shall transmit to the [ office of public de-
fense services established under ORS  151.216] Oregon Public Defense Commission , on a form pre-
pared by the office, information necessary to perfect the appeal.
SECTION 28.  ORS 138.310 is amended to read:
138.310. When  the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense
Commission pays costs, expenses or compensation under ORS 138.500 (5) on  appeal in a criminal
action, the [ public defense services ] executive director shall notify the court below of the costs, ex-
penses and compensation  paid in order that the court below may exercise its discretion under ORS
151.505 or 161.665 (2).
SECTION 29.  ORS 138.480 is amended to read:
138.480. The Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals may, in its discretion,  at the request of an
individual who is deprived of liberty by a judgment, is without means to retain an attorney and is
without the  aid of an attorney, direct the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public De-
fense Commission  to provide representation  for the individual in a proceeding before it to test the
validity of that judgment.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 138.500 is amended to read:
138.500. (1) If a defendant in a criminal action or a petitioner in a proceeding pursuant to  ORS
138.510 to 138.680  wishes to appeal from an appealable adverse final order or judgment of a circuit
court and if the person is without funds  to employ suitable counsel possessing skills and experience
commensurate  with  the nature and complexity of the case for the appeal, the person may request
the circuit court from which the appeal is or would be taken to appoint counsel to represent the
person on appeal. The following apply to a request under this subsection:
(a) The request shall be in writing and shall be  made within the time during which an appeal
may be taken or, if the notice  of appeal has been filed, at any time thereafter. The request shall
include a brief statement of the assets, liabilities and income in the previous  year of the person
unless the court already determined  the person to be financially eligible for appointed counsel at
state expense for purposes of the specific case, in which instance, the written request  need only so
indicate. However, if a  request relies on a court’s previous determination that the person is finan-
cially eligible, the court, in its discretion, may require the person to submit a new  statement of as-
sets, liabilities and income.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 20
(b) If, based  upon a request under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court finds that
petitioner or defendant previously received the services of appointed counsel  or currently is without
funds to employ suitable counsel for an appeal, the court shall appoint counsel to  represent
petitioner or defendant on the appeal.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, when a  defendant has been sentenced to
death, the request for appointed counsel shall be  made to the Supreme Court. The Supreme Court
shall appoint suitable counsel to represent the defendant on the appeal.
(b) After the notice of appeal has been filed, the Court of Appeals  has concurrent authority to
appoint or substitute counsel  or appoint or substitute a legal advisor for the defendant under ORS
138.504.
(c) The Supreme Court has concurrent authority  to appoint or substitute counsel or appoint or
substitute a legal advisor for the defendant under ORS 138.504 in connection with review of  a Court
of Appeals decision under ORS 2.520.
(d) Neither  the Court of Appeals nor the Supreme Court may substitute one appointed counsel
for another under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection except pursuant  to the policies, procedures,
standards and guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services  Commission ] Oregon Public Defense
Commission.
(3) Whenever a defendant in a criminal action or a petitioner in a proceeding  pursuant to ORS
138.510 to 138.680 has filed a notice  of appeal from an appealable adverse final order or judgment
of a circuit court and the person is without funds  to pay for a transcript, or portion thereof, nec-
essary to  present adequately the case upon appeal, the person may request the [ public defense ser-
vices] executive director  of the Oregon Public  Defense Commission  to have the transcript, or
portion thereof, prepared for purposes of appeal. The following apply to a request under this sub-
section:
(a) The [ public defense services ] executive director shall authorize the preparation of a transcript
after a court has determined that the  person is eligible for court-appointed counsel or, if the person
has not applied for court-appointed counsel, the person submits a statement of the  person’s assets,
liabilities and income in the previous year and the director determines that the person is eligible
for preparation of a transcript at state expense.
(b) The cost of the transcript preparation under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall  be in the
amount prescribed in ORS 21.345 and paid for as provided  by the policies, procedures, standards and
guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
(4) After  submission of the original brief by counsel, the [ public defense services ] executive di-
rector  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall determine the cost of briefs  and any other
expenses of appellant, except transcripts, necessary to appellate review and a  reasonable amount
of compensation for counsel appointed under this section. Compensation payable to  appointed
counsel shall be as established under ORS 151.216. On any review  by the Supreme Court of the
judgment of the Court  of Appeals the [ public defense services ] executive director shall similarly de-
termine the costs of briefs and any other expenses necessary for  review and a reasonable amount
of compensation for counsel appointed under this section.
(5) Costs, expenses and compensation determined  by the [ public defense services ] executive di-
rector  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  under subsection (4) of this section shall be paid
by the [ public defense services ] executive director from funds available for that purpose.
(6) If the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commis-
sion denies, in whole or in part, costs, expenses and compensation submitted for  review and pay-
ment, the person who submitted the  payment request may appeal the decision to the Chief Judge
of the Court of Appeals, if the appeal is in the Court of Appeals, or  to the Chief Justice of the Su-
preme Court, if  the appeal is in the Supreme Court. The Chief Judge, Chief Justice or the designee
of the Chief Judge or Chief Justice, as appropriate, shall review the  [ public defense services ] execu-
tive director’s  decision for abuse of discretion. The decision of the Chief Judge, the Chief Justice
or the designee of the Chief Judge or Chief Justice is final.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 21
(7) The provisions of this section shall apply in favor  of the defendant in a criminal action or
the petitioner in a proceeding pursuant to ORS 138.510 to  138.680 when the person is respondent in
an appeal taken by the state in a criminal action or by the defendant in a proceeding pursuant  to
ORS 138.510 to 138.680.
(8) As used in this  section, “criminal action” does not include an action that involves only vio-
lations.
(9) As used in subsection (4) of this section, “counsel” includes a legal advisor appointed under
ORS 138.504.
SECTION 31.  ORS 138.590 is amended to read:
138.590. (1) Any petitioner who is unable to pay the expenses  of a proceeding pursuant to ORS
138.510 to 138.680 or to employ suitable counsel  possessing skills and experience commensurate with
the nature of  the conviction and complexity of the case for the proceeding may proceed as a finan-
cially eligible person pursuant to this section upon  order of the circuit court in which the petition
is filed.
(2) If the petitioner wishes to proceed as a financially eligible person,  the person shall file with
the petition an affidavit stating inability to pay the expenses of a proceeding pursuant  to ORS
138.510 to 138.680, including, but not limited to, the filing fee required by ORS 138.560, or to employ
suitable counsel for such a proceeding. The affidavit  shall contain a brief statement of the
petitioner’s  assets  and liabilities and income during the previous year. If the circuit court is satisfied
that the petitioner is unable to pay such expenses or to employ suitable counsel,  it shall order that
the petitioner proceed as  a financially eligible person. If the court finds that a petitioner who has
been sentenced to death is not competent to decide whether to accept or reject  the appointment of
counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to  represent the petitioner. However, when a circuit court
orders petitioner’s case transferred to another circuit court as provided in  ORS 138.560 (4), the
matter of petitioner’s proceeding as a financially eligible person shall be determined  by the latter
court.
(3) If a petitioner who  has been sentenced to death qualifies for the appointment of counsel
under this section but  rejects the appointment, the court shall determine, after a hearing if neces-
sary, whether the petitioner rejected the offer of counsel and made the decision with an  under-
standing of its legal consequences. The court shall make appropriate findings on the record.
(4) In the order to proceed as a financially eligible person,  the circuit court shall appoint suit-
able counsel to represent petitioner. Counsel so appointed shall  represent petitioner throughout the
proceedings in the circuit court. The court may  not substitute one appointed counsel for another
except pursuant to the policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services
Commission] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
(5) If counsel appointed  by the circuit court determines that the petition as filed by petitioner
is defective, either in form or in  substance, or both, counsel may move to amend the petition within
15 days following counsel’s appointment, or within a further period as the  court may allow. The
amendment shall  be permitted as of right at any time during this period. If appointed counsel be-
lieves that the original petition cannot be construed to state a ground for relief under ORS  138.510
to 138.680, and cannot be amended to state a ground for relief, counsel  shall, in lieu of moving to
amend the petition, inform the petitioner and notify the circuit court  of counsel’s belief by filing an
affidavit stating the belief and the reasons therefor with the clerk of the  circuit court. This affidavit
does not constitute a ground for denying the petition prior to a hearing upon its sufficiency, but  the
circuit court may consider the affidavit in deciding upon the  sufficiency of the petition at the
hearing.
(6) When a petitioner has been ordered to proceed  as a financially eligible person, the expenses
which are necessary for the proceedings upon the petition in the  circuit court and the compensation
to appointed counsel for petitioner as provided in this subsection shall  be paid by the [ public defense
services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  from funds available for
the purpose. At the conclusion of proceedings on a petition  pursuant to ORS 138.510 to 138.680, the
[public defense services ] executive director shall determine and pay,  as provided by the policies,
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 22
procedures, standards and guidelines  of the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission , the amount of expenses  of petitioner and compensation for the services of
appointed counsel in the proceedings in the circuit court.
(7) If the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commis-
sion denies, in whole or in part, expenses and compensation submitted for review  and payment, the
person who submitted the payment request may appeal the  decision to the presiding judge of the
circuit court. The presiding judge or the designee of the presiding judge shall review the  [ public
defense services ] executive director’s decision for abuse of discretion. The decision of the presiding
judge or the designee of the presiding judge is final.
(8)(a) When a petitioner has  been authorized to proceed as a financially eligible person, all court
fees in the circuit court, except for the filing fee required by ORS 138.560, are waived.
(b) When a petitioner is allowed to file a petition without payment of the  fee required by ORS
138.560 due to inability to pay, the  fee is not waived but may be drawn from, or charged against,
the petitioner’s trust account if the petitioner is an adult in custody in a correctional facility.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a court may not  appoint as counsel for
a petitioner who has been  sentenced to death a counsel who previously represented the petitioner
at trial or on automatic and direct review in the case resulting  in the death sentence unless the
petitioner and the counsel expressly request continued representation.
SECTION 32.  ORS 144.335 is amended to read:
144.335. (1) A  person over whom the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision exercises
its jurisdiction may seek judicial review of a final order of the board as provided in this section if:
(a) The person is adversely affected or aggrieved by a final order of the board; and
(b) The person has exhausted administrative review as provided by board rule.
(2) A person requesting administrative review shall provide the  person’s current mailing address
in the request. The board shall mail its order disposing of  the request for administrative review to
the person at that address, unless the  person has otherwise notified the board in writing of a change
of address.
(3) The order of the  board need not be in any special form, and the order is sufficient for pur-
poses of judicial review if it appears that the  board acted within the scope of the board’s authority.
The Court of Appeals may affirm, reverse  or remand the order on the same basis as provided in ORS
183.482 (8). The filing of the petition shall not stay the board’s order, but the board may do so, or
the court may order a stay upon application on such terms as it deems proper.
(4) If a person described in subsection (1) of this section seeks judicial review of  a final order
of the board,  the person shall file a petition for judicial review with the Court of Appeals within
60 days after the  date the board mails the order disposing of the person’s request for administrative
review. The person shall serve a copy of the petition for judicial review on the board.
(5) Within 30 days after being served with a copy  of the petition for judicial review, or such
further time as the court may allow, the board shall:
(a) Submit to the court the record of the proceeding or, if  the petitioner agrees, a shortened
record; and
(b) Deliver a copy of the record to the petitioner or the petitioner’s attorney,  if the petitioner
is represented by an attorney.
(6) At any time after submission of the petitioner’s brief, the court, on its  own motion or on
motion of the board, without submission of the board’s brief and  without oral argument, may sum-
marily affirm the  board’s order if the court determines that the judicial review does not present a
substantial question of law. Notwithstanding ORS  2.570, the Chief Judge, or other judge of the Court
of Appeals designated by the Chief  Judge, may, on behalf of the Court of Appeals, deny or, if the
petitioner does not oppose the motion, grant the board’s  motion for summary affirmance. A summary
affirmance under this subsection  constitutes a decision on the merits of the petitioner’s issues on
judicial review.
(7) During the pendency of judicial review of an  order, if the board withdraws the order for the
purpose of reconsideration and thereafter issues an order on  reconsideration, and the petitioner
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 23
wishes to proceed with the judicial review, the petitioner  need not seek administrative review of the
order on reconsideration and need not file a new petition for judicial  review. The petitioner shall
file, within a time established by the court, a notice of intent to proceed with judicial review.
(8) In the case of disputed allegations of irregularities in procedure  before the board not shown
in the record  that, if proved, would warrant reversal or remand, the Court of Appeals may refer the
allegations  to  a master appointed by the court to take evidence and make findings of fact upon them.
(9) If the court determines that a brief filed by the petitioner, when liberally construed, fails  to
state a colorable claim for  review, the court may order the petitioner to pay, in addition to the
board’s recoverable costs, attorney fees incurred by  the board not to exceed $100. If the petitioner
moves to dismiss  the petition prior to a summary affirmance described in subsection (6) of this sec-
tion, the court may not award costs or attorney fees to the board.
(10) Upon request by the board, the  Department of Corrections may draw from or charge to the
petitioner’s trust account and pay to the  board the amount of any costs or attorney fees awarded
to the board by the court in any judicial review under this section.
(11) If the petitioner prevails on judicial review and is represented by an  attorney funded by the
[Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public  Defense Commission , any recoverable costs
shall be paid to the commission.
SECTION 33.  ORS 144.337 is amended to read:
144.337. (1)  Pursuant to ORS 151.216 and 151.219, the [ Public Defense Services Commission ]
Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall provide for  the representation of financially eligible
persons petitioning for review under ORS 144.335.
(2) If the commission determines that a person petitioning  for review under ORS 144.335 is not
financially eligible for appointed counsel at state expense, the commission shall promptly  notify the
person of the determination and of the person’s right to request review of the determination  by the
Court of Appeals. The person may request review of the commission’s determination by filing a
motion in the Court of Appeals no later than 60 days after the date of the commission’s notice.
(3) The determination of  the Court of Appeals under subsection (2) of this section as to whether
the person is financially eligible is final.
SECTION 34.  ORS 147.537 is amended to read:
147.537. (1) Appellate review of an order described in ORS  147.535 (4)(a) must be initiated by
filing a notice of interlocutory appeal with the Supreme Court substantially  in the form prescribed
by rule of the Supreme Court. Review of the order is a matter of right.
(2) The person or party filing the notice of interlocutory appeal shall be identified  as the
appellant and the defendant  shall be identified as the respondent. Any other person described in
subsection (6)(a) to (f)  of this section who is a party to the appeal shall be identified as a respondent.
(3) The notice of interlocutory appeal must contain:
(a) A designation of those portions  of the trial court record, including oral proceedings, to be
included in the record on appeal; and
(b) A statement of why the notice is timely.
(4) The appellant shall include with the notice of interlocutory appeal the following materials:
(a) A copy of the order for which appellate review is sought, which must  be attached to the
notice.
(b) Excerpts of the record necessary to determine the question presented  and the relief sought.
An excerpt of record must include a copy of the form described in ORS  147.515 (2)(a), if the form
was completed and provided to the trial court.
(c) A memorandum of law containing:
(A) A concise but complete statement of facts material to a determination of the question  pre-
sented and the relief sought; and
(B) Supporting arguments and citations of authority.
(5) The Supreme Court may:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 24
(a) Direct a party to the appeal to supplement the record with a  copy of additional parts of the
record or a transcript of the parts of the oral proceedings  in the trial court necessary to determine
the question presented and the relief sought; or
(b) Direct the trial court administrator to forward all or part of the trial court record.
(6) The appellant shall serve a copy of  the notice of interlocutory appeal and the accompanying
materials described in subsection (4) of this section on the following other persons:
(a) The victim who asserted the claim that resulted in the order being appealed and any  victim
who asserted a related claim;
(b) Any person who filed a response under ORS 147.517 (4) to the claim that resulted in the
order being appealed or a related claim;
(c) Any person who filed the motion that resulted in the  order being appealed or a related mo-
tion under ORS 147.522;
(d) Any person against whom relief was sought in the hearing that resulted in  the order being
appealed or a related hearing under ORS 147.530;
(e) The prosecuting attorney;
(f) The Attorney General;
(g) The defendant; and
(h) The [ office of public defense services established  under ORS 151.216 ] Oregon Public Defense
Commission, if the defendant is represented by appointed counsel.
(7) The appellant shall serve a copy of the notice of interlocutory appeal on:
(a) The trial court administrator; and
(b) The trial court transcript coordinator,  if the notice of interlocutory appeal contains a des-
ignation of the oral proceedings before the trial court as part of the record on appeal.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the appellant shall serve and file  the
notice of interlocutory appeal and, if applicable, the accompanying  materials described in subsection
(4) of this section within seven days after the  date the trial court entered the order being appealed.
(b) An appellant who seeks to appeal an order issued under ORS 147.530 and who  was not pro-
vided with a copy of the order as required by ORS 147.530 (6)  may serve and file the notice of
interlocutory appeal and, if applicable, the accompanying materials described in subsection (4)  of
this section within seven days after the date of receiving a copy of the order.
(c) The appellant shall serve the prosecuting attorney  and the Attorney General so that the
copy of the notice of interlocutory appeal and accompanying  materials are received on the same day
the notice is filed with the Supreme Court.
(d) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the  appellant shall serve all persons
described in subsections  (6) and (7) of this section so that the copy of the notice of interlocutory
appeal and, if applicable,  accompanying materials are received no later than one judicial day after
the notice is filed.
(9) Within three days after receipt of a notice of interlocutory appeal that contains a designation
of record under subsection  (3) of this section, the trial court administrator shall forward to the Su-
preme Court an audio record of the designated oral proceedings.
(10) If the Supreme Court directs a party to provide  a transcript of oral proceedings under
subsection (5) of this section, the party shall provide the transcript  to the Supreme Court within
seven days after the date of the Supreme Court’s order.
(11)(a) The following requirements are jurisdictional and may not be waived or extended:
(A) The timely filing of the original  notice of interlocutory appeal and accompanying materials
described in subsection (4) of this section with the Supreme Court; and
(B) The  service of the notice of interlocutory appeal within the time limits described in sub-
section (8) of this section on all persons identified in subsection (6) of this section.
(b) Failure to timely serve  a true and complete copy of the accompanying materials described
in subsection (4) of this section is not jurisdictional,  provided that the appellant made a good faith
effort to do so and substantially complied with those requirements.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 25
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the Supreme Court may dismiss the appeal
as to any respondent if the appellant, after receipt of a notice of noncompliance, does not  promptly
cure a deficiency in the materials or if the failure  to timely serve a true and complete copy of the
accompanying materials substantially prejudices the respondent’s ability to respond to the appeal.
(12) A respondent may file a response, which must be filed within seven  days after the date the
notice of interlocutory appeal is filed with the Supreme Court.
(13)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the appellant may not  file a reply.
(b) If the Supreme Court determines that  the case is unusually complex, due to the number of
persons involved or the existence of novel questions of law, and the  court would benefit from addi-
tional briefing, the court may extend the  briefing schedule described in this section and allow the
appellant to file a reply.
(14) The appellant or respondent may request oral argument. The Supreme Court may grant or
deny a request for oral argument or order oral argument on its own motion.
(15) At any time after submission of the  appellant’s memorandum of law, the Supreme Court, on
its own motion or on the motion of the respondent, may summarily  affirm the trial court’s order,
with or without the submission of a response or oral argument, if the Supreme Court determines that
the appeal does not present a substantial question of law. A motion for summary affirmance  has no
effect on the timelines described in this section.
(16)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  Supreme Court shall issue its
decision on appeal under  this section within 21 days after the date the notice of interlocutory appeal
is filed.
(b) The Supreme Court may issue a final decision beyond  the 21-day period if the court deter-
mines that the ends of justice served by issuing a final  decision at a later date outweigh the best
interests of the victim, the prosecuting  attorney, the defendant, any person against whom relief was
ordered and the public.
(c) In making the determination under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Supreme Court shall
consider:
(A) Whether  the case is unusually complex, due to the number of persons involved or the ex-
istence of novel questions of law, and whether  21 days is an unreasonable amount of time for the
court to issue a decision; and
(B) Whether the failure to extend the 21-day  period would be likely to result in a miscarriage
of justice.
(17) Appellate review under this section is confined to the record.  The Supreme Court may not
substitute its judgment  for that of the trial court as to any issue of fact and shall review challenges
to a factual finding for evidence in the record to support the finding. The Supreme Court shall  re-
view for errors of law and, when the law delegates discretion to the trial court, determine  whether
the trial court’s exercise of discretion was outside the  range of discretion delegated to the trial
court.
(18) The Supreme Court may affirm, modify, reverse or remand the trial court’s  order. The court
may reverse or  remand the order only if it finds that the order is unlawful in substance or procedure
and that the substantial rights of the appellant were prejudiced as a result.
(19) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a notice of interlocutory appeal and the  re-
sponse described in subsection (12) of this section are filed  under this section when those documents
are physically received by the Supreme Court or, if the documents  are filed electronically, as pro-
vided by rule of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
(20) In addition to any other method authorized by law, service  under this section may be ac-
complished by electronic mail or facsimile transmission, in a manner  consistent with any applicable
rules of appellate procedure.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 147.560 is amended to read:
147.560. (1) There is created the  Task Force on Victims’ Rights Enforcement consisting of the
Attorney General and at least nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The Attorney General shall appoint:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 26
(A) Two  members employed by or associated with a group advocating for the rights of victims
of crime;
(B) A member who represents the Department of Justice Crime Victims’ Services Division;
(C) A lawyer routinely engaged in  the representation of persons charged with a crime, after
consulting with professional organizations serving such lawyers;
(D) A lawyer routinely engaged in  prosecuting persons charged with person felony crimes, after
consulting with professional organizations serving such lawyers;
(E) A  lawyer routinely engaged in prosecuting persons charged with a crime, after consulting
with professional organizations serving such lawyers; and
(F) Other persons the Attorney General deems appropriate;
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint:
(A) A person employed by the Judicial Department, other than a judge; and
(B) A judge; and
(c) The  executive director of the [ office of public defense services established under ORS
151.216] Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall appoint a person employed  by the [ office of
public defense services ] commission .
(2) The task force shall review the implementation of ORS 147.500 to 147.550.
(3) The Attorney General shall serve  as chair of the task force and may establish a term of of-
fice for the members. The task force shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(4) Members serve  at the pleasure of the appointing authority. If there is a vacancy for any
cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.
(5) The task force may prepare  reports that include recommendations for legislation designed
to improve,  in a cost-efficient manner, the protection of rights granted to victims of crime by the
Oregon Constitution. The task force may submit a report prepared under  this subsection to the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245.
(6) Members of  the task force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses
and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(7) The Department of Justice shall provide staff support to the task force.
(8) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the task
force  in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality,
to furnish such  information and advice as the members of the task force consider necessary to per-
form their duties.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 151.485 is amended to read:
151.485. (1) For purposes of determining the financial eligibility for appointed counsel  of persons
with a constitutional or statutory right to counsel in  matters before the state courts and whose
counsel is authorized to be paid by  the [ public defense services ] executive director [ under ORS
151.219] of the Oregon Public Defense Commission , a person is  financially eligible for appointed
counsel if the person is determined to be financially  unable to retain adequate counsel without
substantial hardship in providing basic economic necessities to the person  or the person’s dependent
family under standards established by the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission under ORS 151.216.
(2) A determination of financial eligibility shall be made upon the  basis of information contained
in a detailed financial statement submitted by the person  for whom counsel is requested or ap-
pointed or, in an appropriate case, by the person’s  parent, guardian or custodian. The financial
statement shall be in the form prescribed by the [ Public Defense  Services Commission ] Oregon
Public Defense Commission . The form  shall contain a full disclosure of all assets, liabilities, cur-
rent income,  dependents and other information required by ORS 135.050 (4) and, in addition, any
information required  by the commission and state courts as necessary to determine eligibility. The
commission shall adopt uniform statewide guidelines and procedures that prescribe how to use the
form and determine financial eligibility for appointed counsel.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 27
(3) If at any time after the appointment of counsel  the court having jurisdiction of the case finds
that the defendant is financially able to obtain counsel, the court may terminate  the appointment
of counsel. If at any time during criminal proceedings the court having jurisdiction of the case finds
that the defendant is financially unable  to pay counsel whom the defendant has retained, the court
may appoint counsel as provided in this section.
(4) In addition to any criminal prosecution,  a civil proceeding may be initiated by any public
body that has expended moneys for the defendant’s legal assistance within two years of  judgment
if the defendant was not qualified  for legal assistance in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section. As  used in this subsection, “legal assistance” includes legal counsel, transcripts, wit-
ness fees and expenses and any other goods or services required by law to be provided  to a finan-
cially eligible person at state expense under ORS 151.216 and 151.219.
(5) The civil proceeding shall be subject to the exemptions from execution as  provided for by
law.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 151.487 is amended to read:
151.487. (1) If in determining that a person is financially  eligible for appointed counsel under
ORS 151.485, the court  finds that the person has financial resources that enable the person to pay
in full or in part the administrative costs of determining the  eligibility of the person and the costs
of the legal and other services to be  provided at state expense that are related to the provision of
appointed counsel, the  court shall enter a limited judgment requiring that the person pay to the
Public Defense  Services Account established by ORS 151.225, through the clerk of the court, the
amount that it finds the person is able to pay without creating  substantial hardship in providing
basic economic necessities to the person or the person’s dependent  family. The amount that a court
may require the person to pay is subject to  the guidelines and procedures issued by the [ Public
Defense Services  Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  as provided in subsection (4)
of this section.
(2) Failure to comply with the requirements of a limited judgment entered under this  section is
not grounds for contempt or grounds for withdrawal by the appointed attorney.
(3) Except  as authorized in this section, a person, organization or governmental agency may not
request or accept a payment or promise of payment for assisting in the representation of a  person
by appointment.
(4) The commission shall promulgate and issue guidelines and procedures:
(a) For the determination of persons provided with appointed counsel who have some financial
resources to pay in full or in part the administrative, legal and  other costs under subsection (1) of
this section; and
(b) Regarding the amounts  persons may be required to pay by a court under subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) The determination  that a person is able to pay or partially able to pay, or that a person no
longer has the ability to pay the amount ordered in subsection (1) of this section, is subject to  re-
view at any time by the court.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 151.493 is amended to read:
151.493. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, any state agency as defined in ORS
192.311 that receives a request for release of  information from the state courts for the purpose of
verifying  the  financial eligibility of a person under ORS 151.485 to 151.497 shall release all requested
information to the state court. The court shall  forward to the state agency a certification signed
by the person about whom the requested information  is sought that authorizes the release of the
information.
(2) Upon  its own motion or motion of the [ public defense services ] executive director of the
Oregon Public Defense Commission , a court that has appointed counsel for a person by reason
of financial eligibility may order the release of any information relating to  the person’s financial
situation held by any other person.
SECTION 39.  ORS 151.505 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 28
151.505. (1) At the conclusion of  a case or matter in which the first accusatory instrument or
petition in the trial court was filed after January 1,  1998, and in which the court appointed counsel
to represent a person, a trial, appellate or post-conviction court may include in  its judgment a
money award requiring that the person repay in full  or in part the administrative costs of deter-
mining the eligibility of the person for appointed counsel, and the costs of  the legal and other ser-
vices that are related to the provision of appointed counsel, that have  not previously been required
to be paid under a limited judgment entered under ORS 151.487. An award  under this section is a
monetary obligation payable to the state.
(2) Costs that may be included in a money award  under this section include a reasonable at-
torney fee for counsel appointed to represent the person and a  reasonable amount for expenses au-
thorized under  ORS 135.055. A reasonable attorney fee is presumed to be a reasonable number of
hours at  the hourly rate authorized by the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission under ORS 151.216. For purposes of this subsection, compensation  of counsel
is determined by reference to a schedule of compensation established by the commission.
(3) The court may not require a person to pay costs under this section  unless the person is or
may be able to pay the costs. In determining the amount and method of payment of costs, the  court
shall take account of the financial resources of the person and the nature of  the burden that pay-
ment of costs will impose.
(4)(a) A person who  has been required to pay costs under this section and who is not in
contumacious default in  the payment of the costs may at any time petition the court for remission
of the payment of costs or any unpaid portion  of the costs. If it appears to the satisfaction of the
court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the person ordered to repay
or on the immediate family of the person, or will interfere with the ability of  the person to complete
an alcohol or drug treatment program, the  court may enter a supplemental judgment that remits all
or part of the amount due or modifies the method of payment.
(b) In accordance  with ORS 144.089, a person may enter into a written agreement to participate
in a community service exchange program as an alternative to paying costs  imposed under this
section.
(5) All moneys collected or paid under a money award made pursuant to this  section shall be
paid into the Criminal Fine Account. If the money award is  part of a criminal judgment of con-
viction, the award is a Type 2, Level II obligation for the purpose of ORS 137.145 to 137.159.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 161.309 is amended to read:
161.309. (1) The defendant may not introduce evidence on the issue  of insanity under ORS
161.295, unless the defendant:
(a) Gives notice of intent to do so in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) Files with the court a report of a psychiatric or psychological evaluation,  conducted by a
certified evaluator, in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The defendant may not introduce  in the case in chief expert testimony regarding partial re-
sponsibility or diminished capacity under ORS 161.300 unless  the defendant gives notice of intent
to do so in the manner provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A defendant who  is required under subsection (1) or (2) of this section to give notice shall
file a written notice of purpose at least 45 days before trial.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the court may, for good cause, permit the
defendant to file the notice within 45 days before trial.
(c) If the defendant fails  to file notice under this subsection, the defendant may not introduce
evidence for the establishment of a  defense under ORS 161.295 or 161.300 unless the court, in its
discretion, permits the evidence  to be introduced where just cause for failure to file the notice is
shown.
(4) A defendant who is required under  subsection (1) of this section to file a report of a psy-
chiatric or psychological evaluation shall file the report before trial. The report must be  based on
an evaluation conducted after the date of the alleged  offense and must address the issue of insanity
under ORS 161.295 and the dispositional determination described in ORS 161.325. If the defendant
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 29
fails to file a complete report before  trial, the defendant may not introduce evidence for the estab-
lishment of a defense under ORS 161.295 unless:
(a) The court, in its discretion, permits  the evidence to be introduced when just cause for failure
to file the report is shown; and
(b) If the defendant is charged with a felony, the defendant is tried by a jury.
(5)(a) A court may not accept  a plea of guilty except for insanity to a felony unless a report
described in subsection (4) of this section is filed with the court. If the  report has not been filed, the
court may order that a psychiatric or  psychological evaluation of the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator and a report of the evaluation be filed with the court.
(b) When the court orders an evaluation  of a financially eligible person under this subsection,
the court shall order the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense
Commission to pay a reasonable fee for the evaluation from funds available for that purpose.
(c) A certified evaluator performing an evaluation of a defendant on the  issue of insanity under
this subsection is not obligated to evaluate the defendant for fitness  to proceed unless, during the
evaluation, the certified  evaluator determines that the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn in
question.
(6) Prior to accepting a plea of guilty except for insanity to  a felony, the court shall inform the
defendant of the possibility that the court may order commitment or conditional discharge after
entry of judgment, and of the maximum total period of commitment or conditional discharge  under
ORS 161.327 (7).
(7) As used in this section,  “certified evaluator” means a psychiatrist or psychologist who holds
a valid certification under the provisions of ORS 161.392.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 161.346 is amended to read:
161.346. (1) When the Psychiatric  Security Review Board conducts a hearing under ORS 161.315
to 161.351, the board shall enter an  order and make findings in support of the order. If the board
finds that a person under the jurisdiction of the board:
(a) Is no longer affected by a qualifying mental disorder, or, if  so affected, no longer presents
a substantial  danger to others, the board shall order the person discharged from commitment and
conditional release.
(b) Is still affected by a qualifying mental disorder and is  a substantial danger to others, but can
be controlled adequately if conditionally  released with treatment as a condition of release, the board
shall order the person conditionally released as provided in ORS 161.336.
(c) Has not recovered from the  qualifying mental disorder, is a substantial danger to others and
cannot adequately be controlled if  conditionally released on supervision, the board shall order the
person committed to, or retained in, a state hospital, or if the person is under 18 years of age,  a
secure intensive community inpatient facility, for care, custody and treatment.
(2) To assist the board in making the determination described in subsection (1) of this section,
the board may, at any time, appoint  a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist to examine the person
and to submit a report to the board. The report must include an opinion as  to the mental condition
of the person, whether the  person presents a substantial danger to others and whether the person
could be adequately controlled with treatment as a condition of release.
(3) The board may make the determination regarding discharge or  conditional release based
upon the written reports submitted pursuant to this  section. If any member of the board desires
further information  from the examining psychiatrist or licensed psychologist who submitted the re-
port, the  board shall summon the person to give testimony. The board shall consider all evidence
available to it that is material, relevant and reliable regarding the issues before the board. The  ev-
idence may include but is not limited to the record of trial, the information supplied  by the attorney
representing the state or by any other interested party, including the person,  and information con-
cerning the person’s mental condition and the entire psychiatric and  criminal history of the person.
All evidence of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent persons in the conduct of  their
serious affairs shall be admissible at hearings. Testimony shall be taken upon  oath or affirmation
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 30
of the witness from whom received. The officer presiding at the hearing  shall administer oaths or
affirmations to witnesses.
(4) The board shall  furnish to the person about whom the hearing is being conducted, the at-
torney representing the person, the Attorney General and the district attorney of  the county from
which the person was committed written  notice of any hearing pending under this section within a
reasonable time prior to the hearing. The notice shall include:
(a) The time, place and location of the hearing.
(b) The nature of the hearing and  the specific action for which a hearing has been requested,
the issues to be considered at the hearing and a reference to  the particular sections of the statutes
and rules involved.
(c) A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held.
(d) A statement of all rights under subsection (6) of this section.
(5) Prior to the commencement of the hearing, the board shall serve personally or by  mail a
written notice to each party as provided in ORS 183.413 (2).
(6) At the hearing, the person about whom the hearing is being held shall have the right:
(a) To appear at all proceedings held pursuant to this section, except for deliberations.
(b) To cross-examine all witnesses appearing to testify at the hearing.
(c) To subpoena witnesses and documents as provided in ORS 161.395.
(d) To be represented by suitable legal counsel possessing skills  and experience commensurate
with the nature and complexity of the case, to consult with counsel prior to the hearing  and, if fi-
nancially eligible, to have suitable counsel appointed at state expense.
(e) To examine  all information, documents and reports that the board considers. If then available
to the board, the information, documents and  reports shall be disclosed to the person so as to allow
examination prior to the hearing.
(7) A record  shall be kept of all hearings conducted under ORS 161.315 to 161.351, except for
deliberations.
(8) Upon request of any party, or on  motion of the board, the hearing may be continued for a
reasonable period not to  exceed 60 days to obtain additional information or testimony or for other
good cause shown.
(9) Within 30 days following  the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall provide to the person,
the attorney representing the person, the Attorney  General or other attorney representing the state,
if any, written notice of the order entered by the board.
(10) The burden of proof on all issues at hearings under  ORS 161.315 to 161.351 shall be by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(11) If the board determines that  the person about whom the hearing is being held is financially
eligible, the board shall appoint suitable counsel to represent the person. Counsel  so appointed shall
be an attorney who satisfies the [ professional qualifications ] minimum standards established by the
[Public Defense Services  Commission] Oregon Public Defense Commission  under ORS 151.216. The
[public defense  services ] executive director  of the commission  shall determine and allow fair com-
pensation for counsel appointed under this subsection and the reasonable expenses of the person  in
respect to the hearing. Compensation payable to appointed  counsel shall not be less than the ap-
plicable compensation level established under ORS 151.216. The compensation and expenses so al-
lowed shall be paid by the [ public defense services ] executive  director from funds available for the
purpose.
(12) The Attorney General may represent the state at contested hearings under ORS 161.315  to
161.351 unless the district  attorney of the county from which the person was committed elects to
represent the state. The district attorney of the county from which the person was committed shall
cooperate with the Attorney General in securing the material  necessary for presenting a contested
hearing. If the  district attorney elects to represent the state, the district attorney shall give timely
written notice of such election to the  Attorney General, the board and the attorney representing the
person.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 161.348 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 31
161.348. (1) When a person over whom the Psychiatric Security Review  Board exercises juris-
diction under ORS 161.315 to  161.351 or 419C.544 is adversely affected or aggrieved by a final order
of the board, the person is entitled to judicial  review of the final order. The person is entitled on
judicial review to suitable counsel possessing skills  and experience commensurate with the nature
and complexity of the case. If the person is financially eligible,  suitable counsel shall be appointed
by the reviewing court in the manner provided in ORS 138.500 (1). If the person is financially eligi-
ble, the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission
shall determine and pay, as provided in  ORS 138.500, the cost of briefs, any other expenses of the
person necessary to the review and compensation for counsel  appointed for the person. The costs,
expenses and compensation so allowed shall be paid as provided in ORS 138.500.
(2) The order and the proceedings underlying the order are subject to  review by the Court of
Appeals upon petition to that court filed within 60 days of  the order for which review is sought.
The board shall submit to the court the record of the proceeding or, if the person agrees, a  short-
ened record. The record may include a certified true copy of a tape recording of  the proceedings
at a hearing in accordance with ORS 161.346.  A copy of the record transmitted shall be delivered
to the person by the board.
(3) The court may affirm, reverse or remand the order on the same basis as provided in  ORS
183.482 (8).
(4) The filing of the petition does not stay the  order of the board, but the board or the Court
of Appeals may order a stay upon application on such terms as are deemed proper.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1)(a) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness  to proceed by reason
of incapacity as described in ORS 161.360, the court may call any  witness to assist it in reaching
its decision and, except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall order that a community
mental health program director, or the director’s  designee, consult with the defendant and with any
local entity that would be responsible for providing community restoration services  to the defendant
if the defendant were to be released in the community,  to determine whether appropriate community
restoration services are present and available  in the community. After the consultation, the program
director or the director’s designee shall provide to the court a copy  of the findings resulting from
the consultation.
(b) If the defendant is charged with one or more of the  following offenses the court is not re-
quired to, but may  in its discretion, order the consultation described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section:
(A) Aggravated murder;
(B) Murder in any degree;
(C) Attempted aggravated murder;
(D) Attempted murder in any degree;
(E) Manslaughter in any degree;
(F) Aggravated vehicular homicide;
(G) Arson in the first degree when classified as crime  category 10 of the sentencing guidelines
grid of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission;
(H) Assault in the first degree;
(I) Assault in the second degree;
(J) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(K) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(L) Rape in the first degree;
(M) Sodomy in the first degree;
(N) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree;
(O) Robbery in the first degree; or
(P) Robbery in the second degree.
(c) If the court determines the assistance of a psychiatrist  or psychologist would be helpful, the
court  may:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 32
(A) Order that a psychiatric or psychological  examination of the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(B) Order the defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination to a state  mental
hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the  defendant is at least 18
years of age, or to a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the  authority if the
defendant is under 18 years of age.  The state mental hospital or other facility may retain custody
of a defendant committed under  this paragraph for the duration necessary to complete the exam-
ination of  the defendant, not to exceed 30 days. The examination may include a period of observa-
tion.
(d) The court shall provide a copy of any order  entered under this subsection to the community
mental health program director or designee  and to the state mental hospital or other facility by the
end of the next judicial day.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under subsection (1)(c)(B) of this section  shall be transported to
the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental  hospital or the
superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform the court  and the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level of care due to
the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental disorder and request that the defendant
remain at the state mental hospital or other facility pending a  hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
(3) The report of an examination described in this section must  include, but is not necessarily
limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion  as to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated within  the description set out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of  treatment and services necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain capacity,
including whether a hospital  level of care is required due to the acuity of symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder.
(4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the contrary, the report may not
contain  any  findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder  was  subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the criminal act
charged.
(5) If the examination by the  certified evaluator cannot be conducted by reason of the unwill-
ingness of the defendant to participate in the examination,  the report must so state and must in-
clude, if possible, an opinion as to whether the unwillingness of  the defendant was the result of a
qualifying mental disorder affecting fitness to proceed.
(6) The report resulting from the examination of a defendant under this section may be filed
electronically and must be filed with the clerk of the court, who  shall cause copies to be delivered
to the district attorney and to counsel for defendant.
(7)(a) When upon motion of the court or a financially eligible defendant,  the court has ordered
a psychiatric  or psychological examination of the defendant, a county or justice court shall order
the county to pay, a municipal court shall order the city to pay, and  a circuit court shall order the
[public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  to pay  from
funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the  examination of the defendant is conducted by a certified evaluator
in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by a
certified evaluator in the employ of the  Oregon Health Authority or a community mental health
program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 33
(b) When an examination is  ordered at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined  not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay  for
the expense of the examination.
(8) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by  rule standards for the consultation described
in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 44.  ORS 161.665 is amended to read:
161.665. (1) Except as provided in ORS 151.505, the court, only in the case of a defendant for
whom it enters  a judgment of conviction, may include in its sentence thereunder a money award for
all costs specially incurred by the  state in prosecuting the defendant. Costs include a reasonable
attorney fee for counsel appointed pursuant to ORS 135.045 or 135.050  and a reasonable amount for
fees and expenses incurred pursuant  to preauthorization under ORS 135.055. A reasonable attorney
fee is presumed to be a reasonable number of hours  at the hourly rate authorized by the [ Public
Defense Services  Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  under ORS 151.216. Costs do
not include  expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally guaranteed jury trial or expenditures
in connection with the maintenance and operation of government  agencies that must be made by the
public irrespective of specific violations of law.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 151.505, the court, after the conclusion of an  appeal of its initial
judgment of conviction, may include in its general judgment, or  enter a supplemental judgment that
includes, a money award that requires a convicted defendant to  pay a reasonable attorney fee for
counsel appointed pursuant to ORS  138.500, including counsel who is appointed under ORS 151.216
or counsel  who is under contract to provide services for the proceeding under ORS 151.219, and
other costs and expenses allowed by  the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon
Public Defense Commission  under ORS 138.500 (4). A reasonable attorney  fee is presumed to be
a reasonable number of hours at the hourly rate authorized by the commission under ORS 151.216.
(3) For purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, compensation of counsel  is determined
by reference to a schedule of compensation established by the commission under ORS 151.216.
(4) The court may not sentence a defendant to pay costs under this section unless the  defendant
is or may be able to pay them. In determining the amount and method of payment of costs, the court
shall take account of the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
payment of costs will impose.
(5) A defendant who has been sentenced to pay  costs under this section and who is not in
contumacious default in the payment of costs may  at any time petition the court that sentenced the
defendant for remission of the payment of costs or of any unpaid  portion of costs. If it appears to
the satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on  the
defendant or the immediate family of the  defendant, the court may enter a supplemental judgment
that remits all or part of the amount due in costs, or modifies  the method of payment under ORS
161.675.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this  section, all moneys collected or paid under this
section shall be paid into the Criminal Fine Account.
(7) The  court may, in the judgment of conviction, include a money award requiring the defendant
to pay the costs of extraditing the defendant to this  state. Any amounts awarded to the state under
this subsection must be listed separately in  the money award portion of the judgment. All moneys
collected or paid under  this subsection shall be deposited into the Arrest and Return Account es-
tablished by ORS 133.865.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 171.133 is amended to read:
171.133. (1) A state  agency shall not cause a bill or measure to be introduced before the Legis-
lative Assembly if the bill or measure has not been approved by the Governor.
(2) As used in ORS 171.130 and this section,  “state agency” means every state agency whose
costs are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees;
(b) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission ; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 34
(c) The Secretary of State, the  State Treasurer, the Attorney General and the Commissioner of
the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
SECTION 46.  ORS 181A.010 is amended to read:
181A.010. As used in ORS 181A.010 to 181A.350, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Criminal justice agency” means:
(a) The Governor;
(b) Courts of criminal jurisdiction;
(c) The Attorney General;
(d) District attorneys, city attorneys with  criminal prosecutorial functions, attorney employees
of the [ office of public defense  services ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  and nonprofit public
defender organizations established under contract with the [ Public Defense Services ] commission;
(e) Law enforcement agencies;
(f) The Department of Corrections;
(g) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(h) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision;
(i) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(j) The enforcement division of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission in performing  du-
ties related to investigating and enforcing the criminal laws of this state that the  commission is
charged to enforce;
(k) Civilian or community oversight  boards, agencies or review bodies designated by a munici-
pality or a law enforcement agency in performing duties related to  investigating allegations of offi-
cer misconduct or reviewing police policies and practices;
(L) Regional information systems that share programs  to track, identify and remove cross-
jurisdictional criminal and terrorist conspiracies; and
(m) Any other state or local agency with law enforcement authority.
(2) “Criminal offender information” includes records and related data as to physical  description
and vital statistics, fingerprints received  and compiled for purposes of identifying criminal offenders
and alleged offenders, records of arrests and the nature and disposition of criminal charges,  includ-
ing sentencing, confinement, parole and release.
(3) “Department” means the Department of State Police established under ORS 181A.015.
(4) “Deputy superintendent”  means the Deputy Superintendent of State Police appointed under
ORS 181A.035.
(5) “Designated  agency” means any state, county or municipal government agency where Oregon
criminal offender information is  required to implement a federal or state statute, executive order
or administrative rule that expressly refers to criminal conduct and  contains requirements or ex-
clusions expressly based on such conduct or for  agency employment purposes, licensing purposes or
other demonstrated and legitimate needs when designated by order of the Governor.
(6) “Disposition report” means a  form or process prescribed or furnished by the department,
containing a description of the ultimate action taken subsequent to an arrest.
(7) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) County sheriffs, municipal police departments, police departments established  by a university
under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and state police;
(b) Other police officers of this state or another state,  including humane special agents as de-
fined in ORS 181A.345;
(c) A tribal government as defined  in ORS 181A.940 that employs authorized tribal police offi-
cers as defined in ORS 181A.940; and
(d) Law enforcement agencies of the federal government.
(8) “State police” means the sworn members of the state police force  appointed under ORS
181A.050.
(9) “Superintendent” means the Superintendent of State Police appointed under ORS 181A.030.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 190.490 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 35
190.490. (1) Every agreement entered into under ORS 190.485 shall be submitted to the Attorney
General before taking effect. The Attorney General shall determine whether  the agreement is in
proper form and compatible with the laws  of this state. If the Attorney General determines that the
agreement is improper in some respect,  the Attorney General shall give written notice to the state
agency concerning the specific  respects in which the agreement fails to comply with law. Failure
of the Attorney General to give such notice to  the state agency within 30 days of submission of the
agreement to the Attorney General’s office shall constitute  approval of the agreement. The Attorney
General may exempt certain agreements, classes of agreements or form agreements from the re-
quirement that the agreement be approved by the Attorney General before taking effect.
(2) The state agency shall file any agreement made  under ORS 190.485 with the Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services within 30 days of the effective date of the agreement. The de-
partment may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this subsection.
(3) This section does not apply  to the Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and
committees, the Secretary of State and the State Treasurer in the performance of the duties of their
constitutional  offices  and the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Com-
mission.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 244.050, as amended by section 1, chapter 66, Oregon Laws  2022, is amended
to read:
244.050. (1) On  or before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required under  this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General,  Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal  judges, except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The  Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director,  the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each  public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 36
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) [ Public defense services ] Executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense
Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of  a city or county who performs the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body  of a metropolitan service district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the  financial officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 37
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to  777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of  the board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or  union high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board of  directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public  official
on a board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with  the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general  election, each candidate
described in subsection (1) of this section who will appear on the  statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a  statement of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3) of this section apply only to persons  who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement  required to be filed under this section has not been received by the commis-
sion within five days after the date the  statement is due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply  with the
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 38
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set  by the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 49.  ORS 283.110 is amended to read:
283.110. (1) Subject to  rules prescribed by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
any state agency shall, as its own facilities permit, furnish to any other state agency  such services
(including labor), facilities  and materials as are requisitioned by the head of another agency. The
expense shall be charged to the  agency served, which shall pay the expense to the agency furnishing
the services,  facilities or materials in the manner other claims are paid. Agencies shall, as far as
practicable, cooperate with one another in the use of services, quarters and equipment.
(2) Except  as provided in ORS 283.076 (3), all moneys received by an agency in payment of ser-
vices, facilities or materials furnished  to another state agency as provided in this section, or in
payment of services,  facilities or materials furnished to other persons may be, or if required by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, shall be paid into the State Treasury  for deposit to
the credit  of the miscellaneous receipts account established pursuant to ORS 279A.290 for the
agency furnishing the services, facilities or materials.
(3) The constitutional state officers and the  Legislative Assembly or any of its statutory,
standing, special or interim committees, unless prohibited by law,  may elect to furnish services, fa-
cilities and materials to one another and to state agencies and officers as  defined in ORS 291.002,
and the courts, constitutional state officers,  the Legislative Assembly or any of its statutory,
standing, special or  interim committees and the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission may elect to requisition services,  facilities and materials as provided in this
section.
SECTION 50.  ORS 291.002 is amended to read:
291.002. As used in ORS 291.001 to 291.034, 291.201 to 291.222, 291.232 to 291.260,  291.261,
291.307 and 291.990, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Classification of expenditures” means the categories of expenses for the purpose of  budget-
making and accounting that are provided in ORS 291.216 (6)(a).
(2) “Dedicated fund” means a fund in the State Treasury, or a  separate account or fund in the
General Fund in the State Treasury, that by law is dedicated, appropriated or  set aside for a limited
object or purpose, but “dedicated fund” does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.
(3) “Department” means the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(4) “Director” means the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(5) “Legislatively adopted budget” means the budget  enacted by the Legislative Assembly during
an odd-numbered year regular session  for the biennium beginning July 1 of the year in which the
regular session begins.
(6) “Legislatively approved budget” means the legislatively adopted budget as modified by the
Emergency Board meeting  in an interim period or by the Legislative Assembly meeting in special
session or in an even-numbered year regular session.
(7) “Revolving fund” means  a fund in the State Treasury, established by law, from which is paid
the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a state  agency, and which is replenished through
charges made for such goods or services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.
(8) “State agency” or “agency” means every state  officer, board, commission, department, insti-
tution, branch or agency of the state government, whose costs are paid wholly or in part  from funds
held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees;
(b) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission ; and
(c) The Secretary  of State and the State Treasurer in the performance of the duties of their
constitutional offices.
(9) “State officer” means any  elected or appointed state officer, including members of boards and
commissions, except the members and officers of the Legislative Assembly, the courts, the Secretary
of State and the State Treasurer in the performance of the duties  of their constitutional offices and
the members of the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 39
(10) “Trust fund” means a fund in the State Treasury in which designated persons or  classes of
persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable ownership, or which was created or  estab-
lished by a gift, grant, contribution, devise or bequest  that limits the use of the fund to designated
objects or purposes.
SECTION 51.  ORS 291.011 is amended to read:
291.011. (1) The Director  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services may require a
fidelity bond of any officer, employee or agent of the department or of any other state officer, em-
ployee or agent who has charge of, handles or has access to any money or property  belonging to
the state or in which the state may have an interest and who is not otherwise required by law  to
give a fidelity bond. The amounts of the bonds shall be fixed  by the director, except as otherwise
provided  by  law, and the sureties shall be approved by the director. The premium on the bond of
any officer, employee  or agent shall be paid by the state agency that employs the officer, employee
or agent.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may procure or provide and  may admin-
ister a blanket bond covering any or all officers and employees  of the state. The bond shall contain
such coverages and shall be in such amounts as the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
deems adequate to protect the interest of the state. Procurement of the bond  to cover any officer
or employee of the state shall constitute compliance with any statute requiring that officer or  em-
ployee to be  bonded up to the monetary limit of the blanket bond which the Oregon Department of
Administrative  Services  purchases or provides. The coverage and insuring amount applicable in such
bond to  any officer or employee of the state shall be at least equal to that required by statute. The
cost of the premium on the bond shall be charged to  the various state agencies employing the state
officers and employees covered by the bond.
(3) The provisions of this section are considered to satisfy any provision of law requiring indi-
vidual fidelity bonds  for elected officers if the level of coverage of the blanket fidelity bond is at
least equal to the individual statutory requirements.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Officers and employees of the state”  includes all elected and appointed officers and em-
ployees of the State of Oregon and all persons  appointed by a state agency on a temporary or in-
termittent basis to act for the state in particular  matters where such persons have charge of, handle
or have access to any money or property belonging to the state or in which the state may have  an
interest.
(b) “State agency” means every state  officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch
or agency of the state government and includes the Legislative  Assembly and any of its statutory
standing, special or interim committees, the  courts and their officers and committees, all constitu-
tional state officers and the  [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Com-
mission.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 291.030 is amended to read:
291.030. As used in ORS 291.032 and 291.034, “state agency” or “agency” includes  the Legisla-
tive Assembly, at its option, or any of  its statutory, standing, special or interim committees, at the
option of such committee, the courts and their officers and  committees and the constitutional state
officers, at their option, and the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public  Defense
Commission, at the option of the commission.
SECTION 53.  ORS 291.045 is amended to read:
291.045. As used in this section and ORS 291.047:
(1) “Information technology”  includes, but is not limited to, all present and future forms of
hardware, software and services for data processing, office automation and telecommunications.
(2) “State agency” includes every state officer, board, commission, department,  institution,
branch or agency  of the state government, whose costs are paid wholly or in part from funds held
in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees; and
(b) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 40
(3) “Public contract” means any acquisition, disposition, purchase, lease, sale or transfer of
rights by a state agency of real or personal property, public improvements or services.
(4) “Public improvement”  means projects for construction, reconstruction or renovation on real
property by or for a state agency.
SECTION 54.  ORS 291.227 is amended to read:
291.227. (1)(a) As part of the development of the  legislatively adopted budget, each state agency
that employs more than 100 employees shall report to the Joint  Committee on Ways and Means the
state agency’s maximum supervisory ratio for the biennium.
(b) Before submitting the report to the committee, a state agency shall provide a  copy of the
report to all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency.
(2) A state agency must  determine its maximum supervisory ratio by starting from a baseline
ratio of one to 11 and adjusting the ratio based on some or all of the following factors:
(a) Safety of the public or of state agency employees;
(b) Geographic location of the agency’s employees;
(c) Complexity of the agency’s duties;
(d) Industry best practices and standards;
(e) Size and hours of operation of the agency;
(f) Unique personnel needs of the agency, including the agency’s use of volunteers  or seasonal
or temporary employees, or the exercise of supervisory authority by agency  supervisory employees
over personnel who are not agency employees; and
(g) Financial scope and responsibility of the agency.
(3) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means shall review the  maximum supervisory ratios re-
ported by state agencies.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, a state agency whose actual  supervisory ratio is
greater than its maximum supervisory ratio may not fill a supervisory position.
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may exempt  a state agency from the
limitations of subsection  (4) of this section if the department determines that an additional supervi-
sory position is reasonably necessary to the state agency. The department must make the  determi-
nation with reference to some or all of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) At least  five business days before granting an exemption under this subsection, the depart-
ment shall notify all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency of its intent
to grant the exemption.
(6)(a) The department shall, once per quarter, produce reports on the  actual supervisory ratio
of each state agency. The reports must include data  on job families within each state agency to the
extent such data is reasonably available.
(b) The department shall make the reports  publicly available on the Internet and shall notify
all labor organizations that represent state employees when the reports are available.
(7) The department  may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules gov-
erning how  temporary, seasonal or part-time employees are accounted for in the calculation of a
supervisory ratio.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Job families” means groups of occupations based upon work performed,  skills, education,
training and credentials.
(b) “Legislatively adopted budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(c)(A) “State agency” means  all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given  to those
entities, that are within the executive branch of government as described  in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
(iii) The [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission ;
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 41
(iv) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer;
(v) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
(vi) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(vii) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
(viii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(ix) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(x) The Travel Information Council;
(xi) Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
(xii) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
(xiii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(xiv) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
(xv) Oregon Community Power;
(xvi) The Citizens’ Utility Board;
(xvii) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
(xviii) Any other  public corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically desig-
nated as a public corporation; and
(xix) Any other  semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as a semi-independent
state agency.
(d) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
(e) “Supervisory ratio” means the ratio of employees  who are supervisory employees to em-
ployees who are not supervisory employees.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 293.300 is amended to read:
293.300. Except for  claims based on obligations incurred or expenditures made by the Legislative
Assembly and its officers and committees, the courts and their  officers and committees, the Secre-
tary of State and State Treasurer in the performance of the functions of their constitutional offices
and the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission , a claim for
payment from any moneys in the State Treasury may not be paid if the claim is  disapproved by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services. The  department shall disapprove a claim if provision
for payment thereof is not made by law and appropriation, the obligation or expenditure on  which
the claim is based is not authorized as provided by law or the  claim does not otherwise satisfy re-
quirements as provided by law.
SECTION 56.
 ORS 293.590 is amended to read:
293.590. (1) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall direct and control the ac-
counting for all the fiscal affairs of the state government and agencies thereof, and  shall provide for
the maintenance of accounting records, including  accounts stated in summary or in detail, for those
fiscal affairs. The department is  responsible for establishing and maintaining systems of accounting
for state government and agencies thereof. The principles, standards and related  requirements of
those systems of accounting shall be as prescribed  by the department and except as otherwise pro-
vided in this section shall be  used by the state agencies thereof, unless otherwise directed by the
department.
(2) In performing its functions under subsection (1) of this section, the  department shall consult
with the Secretary of State, State Treasurer and, to the  extent it considers necessary or desirable,
any other state agency or any federal agency.
(3) The department may, as its own facilities permit, furnish  to any other state agency such
accounting services (including labor), facilities and materials as are necessary, as determined  by the
department, for compliance by the state agency with subsection (1) of this  section. The cost to the
department of furnishing the services, facilities and materials, as determined by  the department,
shall be charged to the state agency and paid to the department  in the same manner as other claims
against the state agency are paid.
(4) This section is applicable to the Legislative Assembly and its officers and committees, the
courts and their officers and committees, the Secretary  of State and State Treasurer in the per-
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 42
formance  of  the functions of their constitutional offices and the [ Public Defense Services
Commission] Oregon Public Defense Commission  only at their option.
SECTION 57.  ORS 293.875 is amended to read:
293.875. (1) The State Treasurer is designated the sole banking and cash management officer for
the state and may review, establish and modify procedures  for the efficient handling of moneys un-
der the control of the State Treasury, the Secretary of State,  the Judicial Department, the Legisla-
tive Assembly, the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon  Public Defense Commission  and
state agencies as defined in ORS 291.002. The State  Treasurer shall perform all activities necessary
or desirable  to fulfill the duties of the treasurer as the banking and cash management officer. The
activities may include, but are not limited  to, entering into contracts for the provision of services
related to the management, deposit and transfer of, or payment from,  moneys deposited with the
State Treasurer through banks and other financial institutions. The  deposit, transfer or payment
may be through physical presentation or drafting of an instrument or  document by electronic or
other means.
(2) The State Treasurer shall continuously review the effectiveness of the cash management  of
state agencies, the  Secretary of State, the Judicial Department and the Legislative Assembly, and
when the State Treasurer considers it appropriate shall report in writing to the subject agency the
findings of this review, along with any  recommendations. A copy of the report shall be provided to
the Legislative Fiscal Officer and to the Secretary of State.
(3) This section controls over any other law that  gives another state agency general responsi-
bility for, or control over, the accounting, fiscal or electronic commerce affairs  of the State Treas-
ury, the Secretary of  State, the Judicial Department, the Legislative Assembly, the [ Public Defense
Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense  Commission  and state agencies as defined in ORS
291.002. State agencies shall employ the  principles, standards and related requirements for cash
management prescribed by the State Treasurer, including:
(a) Practices related to the use of credit, debit or similar cards or devices;
(b) The use of secure disbursing and receiving instruments, documents and systems; and
(c) The use of  secure information resources, information technology and networks that meet the
requirements of the State Treasurer for the  electronic management, deposit or transfer of, or pay-
ment from, moneys deposited with the State Treasurer.
(4) As used in this  section, “information resources” and “information technology” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 276A.206.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 419A.200 is amended to read:
419A.200. (1) Except as provided in ORS 419A.190,  any person or entity, including, but not lim-
ited to, a party to a juvenile court proceeding under  ORS 419B.875 (1) or 419C.285 (1), whose rights
or duties are adversely affected by a judgment of the juvenile court may appeal therefrom.  An ap-
peal from a circuit court must  be taken to the Court of Appeals, and an appeal from a county court
must be taken to the circuit court.
(2) If the proceeding is in  the circuit court and no record of the proceedings was kept, the court,
on motion made not later than 15 days after the entry of the court’s judgment, shall  grant a re-
hearing and shall direct that a record of the proceedings be kept. However, the  court may not grant
a rehearing in a case barred by ORS 419A.190 without the consent of the child,  ward, youth or ad-
judicated youth affected by such case. If a rehearing  is held, the time for taking an appeal runs from
the date of entry of the court’s judgment after the rehearing.
(3)(a) The  appeal may be taken by causing a notice of appeal, in the form prescribed by ORS
19.250, to be served:
(A) On all parties who have appeared in the proceeding;
(B) On the trial court administrator or other person serving as clerk of the juvenile court; and
(C) On the juvenile court transcript coordinator, if a transcript is designated in connection  with
the appeal.
(b) The original of the notice with proof of service must be filed with:
(A) The Court of Appeals if the appeal is from a circuit court; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 43
(B) The circuit court if the appeal is from a county court.
(c) The notice must be filed not later than 30 days after the entry of the  court’s judgment. On
appeal from the county court, the circuit court  shall hear the matter de novo and its judgment is
appealable to the Court of Appeals in the  same manner as if the proceeding had been commenced
in the circuit court.
(4) The counsel in the  proceeding from which the appeal is being taken shall file and serve those
documents necessary to commence an appeal if the counsel is requested to do so by  the party the
counsel represents. If the party requesting an appeal is represented by  court-appointed counsel,
court-appointed counsel may  discharge the duty to commence an appeal under this subsection by
complying with policies and procedures established  by the [ office of public defense services ] Oregon
Public Defense Commission  for appeals of juvenile court judgments.
(5)(a) Upon  motion of a person, other than the state, entitled to appeal under subsection (1) of
this section, the appellate court shall grant the person leave to file a notice of appeal after  the time
limits described in subsection (3) of this section if:
(A) The person  shows a colorable claim of error in the proceeding from which the appeal is
taken; and
(B) The person  shows that the failure to file a timely notice of appeal is not personally attrib-
utable to the person.
(b) A person other than the state is not entitled to relief under this subsection for failure to file
timely notice of cross-appeal when the state appeals pursuant to ORS 419A.208.
(c) The request for leave to file a notice  of appeal after the time limits prescribed in subsection
(3) of  this section must be filed no later than 90 days after entry of the judgment being appealed
and must be accompanied by the notice of appeal sought to be filed. A request for leave under  this
subsection may be filed by mail and is deemed filed on the date of mailing  if the request is mailed
as provided in ORS 19.260.
(d) The court may not grant relief under this subsection unless  the state has notice and oppor-
tunity to respond to the person’s request for relief.
(6) An appeal to  the Court of Appeals must be conducted in the same manner as an appeal under
ORS chapter 19 except that the court shall advance the appeal  on the court’s docket in the same
manner as appeals in criminal cases.
(7)(a) Except as provided in ORS  419A.208 (2), or when otherwise ordered by the appellate court,
the filing of an appeal does not suspend an  order or judgment of the juvenile court nor discharge
the ward  or adjudicated youth from the custody of the person, institution or agency in whose cus-
tody the ward or adjudicated youth may have been placed nor preclude the juvenile court after no-
tice and hearing from entering such further orders relating to the ward or adjudicated  youth’s
custody pending final disposition of  the appeal as it finds necessary by reason only of matters
transpiring subsequent to the  order or judgment appealed from. The trial court administrator shall
immediately file certified copies of any such order or judgment with the Court of Appeals.
(b) Notwithstanding the filing of an appeal from  a jurisdictional or dispositional judgment or an
order entered pursuant to ORS 419B.449 or 419B.476, the  juvenile court may proceed with the ad-
judication of a petition seeking termination of the parental rights of a parent of the ward who is
subject to the judgment from which the appeal is taken.
(c) The  appeal of any judgment entered in a termination of parental rights proceeding under
paragraph (b) of this subsection must be consolidated, if appropriate,  with any pending appeal of an
order  or  judgment entered under ORS 419B.325, 419B.449 or 419B.476. The consolidated appeal must
be conducted and advanced on the court’s  docket in the same manner as termination of parental
rights cases.
(8) On appeal of a judgment or final order, the  appellate court may review any interlocutory
order that:
(a) Involves the merits or necessarily affects the judgment or final order appealed from; and
(b) Was made  after entry of the last appealable judgment or final order preceding entry of the
judgment or final order being appealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 44
(9) The district attorney or Attorney General shall represent the state in the appeal.
(10)(a) The court from which an appeal is taken shall prepare  and transmit a record on appeal
in the manner provided in ORS 19.365, except that, when the appeal is to the circuit court from a
county court, the record on appeal shall be prepared  and transmitted by the county court to the
circuit court.
(b) The court to which an appeal is taken under this section shall keep a record  of the case on
appeal that includes but is not limited to notices of appeal, briefs, motions, orders of  the court and
other papers filed with the court on appeal.
(c) The record on appeal prepared  and transmitted under paragraph (a) of this subsection, when
it is in the custody of the court to which the appeal is taken, and the record of the case on appeal
kept under paragraph  (b) of this subsection are subject to the same limitations on inspection, copy-
ing and disclosure of records, reports and materials as those set forth under ORS 419A.255.
(d) The court on appeal may consent to disclosure of:
(A) Records described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, while in the custody of the  court to
which the appeal is taken, in the same manner and under the  same circumstances as the juvenile
court consents to disclosure under ORS 419A.255;
(B) Records described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(C) An audio or video recording prepared of an oral proceeding on appeal,  in the same manner
as permitted under ORS 419A.256 (1)(b), (3) and (4).
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any decision, as that term is defined  in ORS
19.450, issued by the Court of Appeals  or the Supreme Court, on appeal or review of a juvenile court
decision, is not confidential and is not exempt from disclosure.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 419A.211 is amended to read:
419A.211. (1) If the child,  ward, youth, adjudicated youth, parent or guardian is determined to
be entitled to, and, except as provided  in subsection (4) of this section, financially eligible for, ap-
pointment of counsel at state expense in an  appeal as provided in ORS 419A.200 and 419A.208, the
court, upon request of  the person or upon its own motion, shall appoint suitable counsel to represent
the person. Counsel appointed by the court shall be paid  compensation determined by the [ public
defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon  Public Defense Commission as provided in ORS
135.055 if the circuit court is the appellate court or as provided in ORS 138.500 if the Court  of Ap-
peals or the Supreme Court is the  appellate court. The court may not substitute one appointed
counsel for another except pursuant to the policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines of the
[Public Defense Services Commission ] commission .
(2)(a) When  the court appoints counsel to represent the child or ward, it may order the parent,
if able, or guardian of the estate, if the  estate is able, to pay to the Public Defense Services Account
established by ORS 151.225, through the clerk  of the court, in full or in part the administrative costs
of determining the ability of the parents or estate to pay  for legal services and the costs of the legal
and other services that are related to the provision of appointed counsel.
(b) The test of the parent’s or estate’s ability to pay  costs under paragraph (a) of this subsection
is the same test as applied to  appointment of counsel for defendants under ORS 151.216. If counsel
is provided at state expense, the court shall apply this test in accordance  with the guidelines
adopted by the [ Public Defense  Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  under
ORS 151.485.
(c) If counsel is provided at state expense, the court shall determine the amount the parents  or
estate is required to pay for the costs of administrative, legal and other services  related to the
provision of appointed counsel in the same manner as this amount is determined under  ORS 151.487.
(d) The court’s order of payment is  enforceable in the same manner as an order of support under
ORS 419B.408.
(3) When the court appoints counsel under this section at  state expense, the compensation for
counsel and costs and expenses necessary to the appeal shall be determined and  paid as provided
in ORS 135.055 if the circuit  court is the appellate court or as provided in ORS 138.500 if the Court
of Appeals or the Supreme Court is the appellate court.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 45
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  a youth or adjudicated youth, or the parent
or guardian of the youth or adjudicated youth, is entitled to court-appointed counsel  at state ex-
pense under  this section regardless of the financial circumstances of the youth or adjudicated youth
or the parent or guardian of the youth or adjudicated youth. In addition,  the court may not order
the youth’s or  adjudicated youth’s parent or guardian to pay any part of the administrative costs
of determining the entitlement of the  youth, adjudicated youth, parent or guardian to court-
appointed counsel  at state expense nor any of the costs of the legal and other services that are re-
lated to the provision of appointed counsel.
SECTION 60.  ORS 419A.252 is amended to read:
419A.252. As used in this section and ORS 419A.253, 419A.255 and 419A.256:
(1) “Person” means an individual, a public body as defined in ORS 174.109 or a tribe that  is a
party to a juvenile court proceeding pursuant to ORS 419B.875.
(2) “Prospective appellate attorney” means  an attorney designated by the [ office of public defense
services established under ORS 151.216 ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  to potentially repre-
sent a child, ward, youth, adjudicated youth or  a parent or guardian of a child, ward, youth or ad-
judicated youth, in a juvenile  case when the case has been referred to the [ office of public defense
services ] commission for appeal.
(3) “Public defense provider”  means an attorney or a law firm designated by the [ office of public
defense services established under ORS 151.216 ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  to potentially
represent a child, ward, youth, adjudicated youth or the parent or guardian of  a child, ward, youth
or adjudicated youth in a juvenile court proceeding.
(4) “Record of the  case” or “record of each case,” whether maintained in paper or electronic
form, includes but is not limited to the following and includes records filed in juvenile  court pro-
ceedings commenced before January 1, 2014, when  the records are substantially similar to the fol-
lowing:
(a) The summons and other process;
(b) Petitions;
(c) Papers in the nature of pleadings, answers,  motions, affidavits and other papers that are filed
with the court, including supporting documentation;
(d) Local citizen review board findings and recommendations  submitted under ORS 419A.118 or
419B.367;
(e) Guardianship report summaries filed with the court under ORS 419B.367;
(f) Orders and judgments of the court, including supporting documentation;
(g) Transcripts under ORS 419A.256;
(h) Exhibits and materials offered as exhibits whether or not received in evidence; and
(i) Other documents that become part of the record of the case by operation of law.
(5) “Supplemental confidential file,” whether maintained in paper or electronic form, includes
reports and other material relating to the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth’s history  and
prognosis, including but not limited to reports filed under ORS  419B.440, and includes similar re-
ports and other materials filed in  juvenile court proceedings commenced before January 1, 2014,
that:
(a) Are not or do not become part of the record of the case; and
(b) Are not offered or received as evidence in the case.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 419A.255 is amended to read:
419A.255. (1)(a) The clerk of the court shall maintain a record of each case and a supplemental
confidential file for each case, except as otherwise provided in ORS 7.120.
(b) The record of the case shall be withheld from public inspection but is open  to inspection by
the following:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) The child;
(C) The ward;
(D) The youth;
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 46
(E) The adjudicated youth;
(F) The parent or guardian of the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth;
(G) The guardian ad litem for the parent;
(H) A person allowed to intervene in a proceeding involving the child, ward, youth or adjudi-
cated youth;
(I) The court appointed special advocate, and a representative of a  CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in ORS  184.489, when reasonably necessary for the appointment or supervision of court
appointed special advocates;
(J) The attorneys or prospective appellate  attorneys for any of the persons listed in subpara-
graphs (B) to (I) of this paragraph;
(K) The surrogate;
(L) Service providers in the case;
(M) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(N) The juvenile department;
(O) The Department of Human Services;
(P) The Oregon Youth Authority; and
(Q) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to ORS 419A.258.
(c) The following are entitled to copies of the record of the case:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) A party to the extent permitted under ORS 419B.875 (2) or 419C.285 (2);
(C) A guardian ad litem for a parent  to the same extent the parent is permitted to copies under
ORS 419B.875 (2) or 419C.285 (2);
(D) Persons listed in paragraph (b)(J) to (P) of this subsection; and
(E) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to ORS 419A.258.
(2)(a) Reports and other material relating to  the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth’s his-
tory and prognosis in the record of the case or the supplemental confidential file are  privileged and,
except at the request of  the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth, shall be withheld from public
inspection except that inspection is permitted as set forth in  subsection (1)(b) of this section and
paragraph (b) of this subsection. The offer or admission of reports and other material in the  record
of the case or the supplemental  confidential file as exhibits in a hearing or trial does not waive or
otherwise change the privileged status of the reports and other  material, except for purposes of the
hearing or trial in which the reports and other material are offered or  admitted. Once offered as
an exhibit, reports and other material  relating to the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth’s his-
tory and prognosis that were maintained  in the supplemental confidential file become part of the
record of the case but are subject to paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(b) A supplemental confidential file is open to inspection by the following:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) The parent or guardian of the child or ward in a dependency case;
(C) The guardian ad litem for the parent of a child or ward in a dependency case;
(D) The parent or guardian of the youth or adjudicated youth in a delinquency case if the  youth
or adjudicated youth consents to, or the court authorizes, inspection;
(E) The guardian ad litem for the parent of a youth or adjudicated youth in a  delinquency case
if the youth or adjudicated youth consents to, or the court authorizes, inspection;
(F) A person allowed to intervene  in a proceeding involving the child, ward, youth or adjudi-
cated youth;
(G) The court appointed special advocate, and a representative of  a CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in ORS  184.489, when reasonably necessary for the appointment or supervision of court
appointed special advocates;
(H) The surrogate;
(I) Service providers in the case;
(J) The attorneys or prospective appellate attorneys for:
(i) The child;
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 47
(ii) The ward;
(iii) The youth;
(iv) The adjudicated youth;
(v) The parent or guardian of the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth;
(vi) The guardian ad litem for the parent;
(vii) A person allowed  to intervene in a proceeding involving the child or ward in a dependency
case; or
(viii) The court  appointed special advocate and a representative of a CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in ORS 184.489;
(K) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(L) The juvenile department;
(M) The Department of Human Services;
(N) The Oregon Youth Authority; and
(O) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to ORS 419A.258.
(c) The supplemental confidential file in  cases under ORS 419C.005 may be disclosed to the su-
perintendent of the school district in  which the adjudicated youth resides or the superintendent’s
designee.
(d) The following are entitled to copies of material  maintained in the supplemental confidential
file:
(A) The judge of the juvenile court and those acting under the judge’s direction;
(B) Service providers in the case;
(C) School superintendents and their designees in cases under ORS 419C.005;
(D) Attorneys designated under subsection (2)(b)(J) of this section;
(E) The district attorney or assistant attorney general representing a party in the case;
(F) The juvenile department;
(G) The Department of Human Services;
(H) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(I) The court appointed  special advocate, and a representative of a CASA Volunteer Program
as defined in ORS 184.489, when reasonably necessary for the appointment or  supervision of court
appointed special advocates; and
(J) Any other person or entity allowed by the court pursuant to ORS 419A.258.
(e) A person that obtains copies of material in the supplemental confidential file pursuant  to
paragraph (d) of this subsection is responsible for preserving  the confidentiality of the material in
the supplemental confidential file. A  service provider, school superintendent or superintendent’s
designee who obtains copies of such material shall destroy the copies upon the conclusion  of in-
volvement in the case.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of  this section, no information appearing in
the record of the case or in the supplemental confidential file may  be disclosed to any person not
described in subsections (1)(b) and (2)(b) of this section, respectively, without  the consent of the
court, except for purposes of evaluating the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth’s  eligibility for
special education as provided in ORS chapter 343, and no such information may be used in evidence
in any proceeding  to establish criminal or civil liability against the child, ward, youth or adjudicated
youth, whether such proceeding occurs after the child,  ward, youth or adjudicated youth has
reached 18 years of age or otherwise, except for the following purposes:
(a) In connection with a presentence investigation after guilt has been admitted or established
in a criminal court.
(b) In connection with a proceeding in another juvenile  court concerning the child, ward, youth
or adjudicated youth or an appeal from the juvenile court.
(4)(a) When a person described in subsection (1)(b)(M), (N), (O) or (P)  of this section inspects or
obtains copies of reports, materials or documents under this  subsection or under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, the person may not use or disclose the reports, materials or documents, except:
(A) As provided in this subsection or under subsection (1) or (2) of this section;
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 48
(B) In the juvenile court proceeding for which the reports, materials or documents were  sought
or disclosed;
(C) With the consent of the court; or
(D) As provided in ORS 419A.253.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the  district attorney or assistant attorney general repres-
enting a party in a juvenile court proceeding, the juvenile department, the Department of  Human
Services, the Oregon Youth Authority or other parties in the proceeding or their attorneys  from
disclosing to each other reports, materials or documents described in subsections (1) and (2) of  this
section if the disclosure is reasonably  necessary to perform official duties related to the involvement
of the child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth with the  juvenile court or the juvenile department.
A person to whom reports, materials or documents are disclosed under this subsection  is subject to
subsection (3) of this section.
(5)(a) Information contained in the supplemental confidential file that, in the professional  judg-
ment of the juvenile counselor, caseworker, school superintendent or superintendent’s  designee,
teacher or detention worker to whom the information in  the supplemental confidential file has been
provided, indicates a clear and immediate danger to another person or to society shall be disclosed
to the appropriate authority and the person who is in danger from the  child, ward, youth or adju-
dicated youth.
(b) A person  that discloses information under paragraph (a) of this subsection has immunity from
any liability, civil or criminal, that  might otherwise be incurred or imposed for making the disclo-
sure.
(c) Nothing in this subsection affects the provisions of ORS 146.750, 146.760, 419B.035,  419B.040
and 419B.045. The disclosure of information under this subsection does not make the information
admissible in any court or administrative proceeding if it is not otherwise admissible.
(6) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, and subject to subsection (8) of this section, the
following are not confidential and not exempt from disclosure:
(a) The name and date of birth of the youth or adjudicated youth;
(b) The basis for the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over the youth or adjudicated youth;
(c) The date, time and place of  any juvenile court proceeding in which the youth or adjudicated
youth is involved;
(d) The act  alleged in the petition that if committed by an adult would constitute a crime if ju-
risdiction is based on ORS 419C.005;
(e) That portion of the juvenile court order providing for  the legal disposition of the youth or
adjudicated youth when jurisdiction is based on ORS 419C.005;
(f) The names and addresses of the youth or adjudicated youth’s parents or guardians; and
(g) The register described in ORS 7.020 when jurisdiction is based on ORS 419C.005.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, and subject to subsection (8) of this section,
when a  youth has been taken into custody under ORS 419C.080, the following information shall be
disclosed unless, and only for so long as, there is a clear  need to delay disclosure in the course of
a specific investigation, including the need to protect the complaining party or the victim:
(a) The youth’s name and age and whether the youth is employed or in school;
(b) The youth offense for which the youth was taken into custody;
(c) The name and age of the adult  complaining party and the adult victim, unless the disclosure
of such information is otherwise prohibited or restricted;
(d) The identity of the investigating and arresting agency; and
(e) The time and place that the youth was taken into custody and whether there  was resistance,
pursuit or a weapon used in taking the youth into custody.
(8) Except as provided in ORS 419A.300 and  unless otherwise directed by the court, only the
juvenile court, the county juvenile department and the  Oregon Youth Authority may disclose the
information under subsections (6) and (7) of this section if the information is subject to disclosure.
The youth authority may disclose  only information relating to adjudicated youths committed to the
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 49
youth authority by order of the juvenile court if the information is subject to disclosure under  sub-
section (6) or (7) of this section.
(9) Nothing in  this section limits access to any juvenile court records by an appellate court re-
viewing a juvenile court order or  judgment. Appellate court rules may establish procedures for ap-
pellate court access to juvenile records.
(10) Nothing in this section prohibits the court  from providing to the administrator as defined
in ORS 25.010 the date of entry of a judgment terminating parental rights or the date of entry of  a
judgment terminating wardship following  entry of a judgment of adoption together with the names
and dates of birth of the parents and children subject to the judgment.
(11) In addition to  any other provision in this section, the Judicial Department may permit
county or statewide  access to juvenile court records or information by county juvenile departments,
the Department of  Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority, district attorney offices, the office
of the Attorney General,  the [ office of public defense services ] Oregon Public Defense
Commission, prospective appellate attorneys  or public defense providers subject to the following
restrictions:
(a) A prospective appellate attorney or public defense provider granted  access under this sub-
section must agree, pursuant to a written agreement with the Judicial Department, to access:
(A) Party information only for purposes of conflicts screening procedures; and
(B) Other records  or information about a client only as reasonably necessary for the represen-
tation of that client in any juvenile case in which the client is a party, subject  to applicable state
and federal confidentiality laws.
(b) Any other person or entity granted access under this subsection must agree, pursuant to a
written agreement with the department, to  access records or information only as authorized and
allowed by this section, subject to applicable state and federal confidentiality laws.
(c) The State Court Administrator  shall prescribe standards and procedures to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(d) Any person or entity  granted access to juvenile court records or information under this
subsection must preserve the confidentiality of that information as required under this section.
(12) A petition filed under ORS 419B.851 alleging that a  child who is a foreign national is within
the jurisdiction of the court, or a motion requesting an implementation plan other  than return of a
ward to the ward’s parent, is  subject to disclosure to the consulate for the child or ward’s country
as provided under ORS 419B.851 (3).
(13) Nothing in this section prohibits a guardian appointed under ORS 419B.365 or 419B.366 from
disclosing or providing copies of letters of guardianship when so required  to fulfill the duties of a
guardian.
(14) The court shall cooperate in the sharing of information  with a court in another state to
facilitate an interstate placement of a child or ward.
(15) Nothing in this section prohibits the Chief Justice of  the Supreme Court, the Chief Judge
of the Court of Appeals or a presiding judge from permitting access to juvenile court records,  in-
cluding the record of the case and the supplemental confidential  file in a juvenile court proceeding,
or audio or video recordings of a juvenile  court proceeding, by researchers or evaluators for the
purposes of developing statistics and performing analyses or  audits on the effectiveness, cost and
other areas of public interest regarding juvenile court  programs and activities in accordance with
child welfare and juvenile justice state plans and  programs related to Title IV-B and IV-E of the
Social Security Act and to the Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act (42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq).
The Chief Justice shall, by rule or order, establish standards and guidelines for the release of ju-
venile court information for research and evaluation purposes to  ensure confidentiality consistent
with state and federal law and  to promote consistent statewide application of this subsection. Sta-
tistics and analyses released by researchers and evaluators under this  subsection may not contain
any information that identifies any individual person involved in a juvenile court proceeding.
(16) Subject to subsection (11) of  this section, the [ office of public defense services ] Oregon
Public Defense Commission  shall be  permitted access to juvenile court records for the purposes
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 50
of performing the office’s duties as set  forth in ORS 151.219 to audit or investigate attorney ap-
pointment or representation of a party in a juvenile court proceeding  in order to ensure adequate
representation of parties in juvenile court proceedings consistent with the child welfare state  plan
related to Title IV-E of the Social Security Act.
(17) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, the Oregon State Bar  shall be permitted access
to juvenile  court records maintained in the record of the case for the purpose of performing the
bar’s duties as set forth  in ORS 9.005 to 9.757 to investigate attorney representation of a party in
a juvenile court proceeding and in order  to ensure adequate representation of parties in juvenile
court proceedings consistent with the child welfare state plan related to  Title IV-E of the Social
Security Act.
(18)(a) A child, ward, youth or adjudicated youth, or the parent or guardian  of a child, ward,
youth or adjudicated youth who is a party to the juvenile  court proceeding, who is entitled to in-
spect or copy the record of the case under subsection  (1)(b) and (c) of this section maintains the
right to inspect or copy the record of the case after jurisdiction of the court  over the child, ward,
youth or adjudicated youth terminates and after the child, ward, youth or adjudicated  youth has
reached the age of majority.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 419B.524, a parent of a child, ward, youth  or adjudicated youth whose
parental rights have been terminated maintains the right that existed under subsection (1)(b)  and (c)
of this section to inspect or copy the record of the case as the record of the case  existed up until
the time of entry  of the judgment terminating the parent’s parental rights and may obtain a copy
of the judgment terminating the parent’s parental rights.
(19) When inspection or copying  of the record of the case or of the supplemental confidential file
is allowed pursuant to this section, and  unless otherwise required by law, the court that maintains
the record of the case  or the supplemental confidential file is not required to redact the names of,
or information  about, siblings or other persons contained in the record of the case or the supple-
mental confidential file.
(20) Nothing  in this section prohibits the court, acting as a certifying agency or official as de-
fined in ORS 147.620, from certifying  a request under ORS 147.620 and including in the certification
document any information  obtained from the record of the case or the confidential supplemental file
that is necessary to complete the certification.
(21) Nothing in this section prohibits a court from providing to the Department of State  Police,
pursuant to ORS 163A.030 (11), a copy of an order requiring  a youth or adjudicated youth to report
as a sex offender or a copy of a form that documents  the youth’s or adjudicated youth’s obligation
to report as a sex offender.
SECTION 62.  ORS 419B.112 is amended to read:
419B.112. (1) In every case  under ORS chapter 419B, the court shall appoint a court appointed
special advocate. The court appointed special  advocate is deemed a party in these proceedings and
may be represented by counsel, file pleadings and request hearings  and may subpoena, examine and
cross-examine witnesses. If the court appointed special  advocate is represented by counsel, counsel
shall be paid from funds in the Court Appointed Special  Advocate Fund established under ORS
184.498. Counsel representing a court appointed  special advocate may not be paid from moneys in
the Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225, from moneys appropriated to the
[Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  or from Judicial  De-
partment operating funds.
(2) Subject to the direction of  the court, the duties of the court appointed special advocate are
to:
(a) Investigate all relevant information about the case;
(b) Advocate for the child or ward, ensuring that all relevant  facts are brought before the court;
(c) Facilitate and negotiate to ensure that the  court, the Department of Human Services, if ap-
plicable, and the child or ward’s attorney, if any, fulfill their obligations to the child or ward in a
timely fashion; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 51
(d) Monitor all court orders to ensure compliance and to bring to the court’s attention  any
change in circumstances that may require a modification of an order of the court.
(3) If a juvenile court  does not have a sufficient number of qualified court appointed special
advocates available to it, the court may, in fulfillment of  the requirements of this section, appoint
a juvenile  department employee or other suitable person to represent the child or ward’s interest
in court pursuant to ORS 419A.012 or 419B.195.
(4) Any person appointed as a court appointed special advocate in any judicial proceeding  on
behalf of the child or ward is immune from any liability for defamation or statements made  in good
faith by that person, orally or in writing, in the course of the case review or judicial proceeding.
(5) Any person appointed as a court appointed special advocate, CASA  Volunteer Program di-
rector,  CASA  Volunteer Program employee or member of the board of directors or trustees of any
CASA Volunteer Program is immune from any liability for acts  or omissions or errors in judgment
made in good faith in the course or scope of that person’s duties or employment as  part of a CASA
Volunteer  Program.
(6) Whenever the court appoints a court appointed special advocate or other  person under sub-
sections (1) to (3) of this section to represent the child  or ward, the court may require a parent, if
able, or guardian of the estate, if the estate is able, to pay, in whole or in  part, the reasonable costs
of court appointed special advocate services, including reasonable attorney fees.  The court’s order
of payment is enforceable in the same manner as an order of support under ORS 419B.408.
(7) Upon presentation of the order of appointment by the court appointed special advocate,  any
agency, hospital, school organization, division, office or department of the state, doctor, nurse  or
other health  care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department or mental health clinic shall
permit the court appointed special advocate to inspect and copy, and  may consult with the court
appointed special advocate regarding, any records relating  to the child or ward involved in the case,
without the consent of the child, ward or parents.
(8) All records and information acquired or  reviewed by a court appointed special advocate
during the course of official duties are deemed confidential under ORS 419A.255.
(9) For the purposes of a Child Abuse Prevention  and Treatment Act (42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq.)
grant to this state under P.L. 93-247,  or any related state or federal legislation, a court appointed
special advocate or other person appointed pursuant to subsections (1) to (3) of  this section is
deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the child or  ward in proceedings before the
court.
SECTION 63.  ORS 419B.195 is amended to read:
419B.195. (1) If the child, ward, parent or  guardian requests counsel for the child or ward but
is without sufficient financial means to employ suitable counsel possessing skills and  experience
commensurate with the nature of the petition and the complexity of the case, the court may appoint
suitable counsel to represent the child or ward at state expense  if the child or ward is determined
to be financially eligible under the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines of  the [ Public De-
fense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission . Whenever requested to do so, the
court shall appoint counsel to represent the child or ward in a case filed pursuant to ORS 419B.100.
The court may not substitute one  appointed counsel for another except pursuant to the policies,
procedures, standards and guidelines  of the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public
Defense Commission.
(2) Upon presentation of the order of appointment under this section by the attorney  for the
child or ward, any  agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the state, doctor,
nurse or other health care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department  or mental health
clinic shall permit the attorney to inspect and copy any records of the child or ward  involved in the
case, without  the consent of the child or ward or parents. This subsection does not apply to records
of a police agency relating to an ongoing investigation prior to charging.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 419B.198 is amended to read:
419B.198. (1) When the  court appoints counsel to represent a child or ward, it may order the
parent, if able, or guardian of the estate, if  the estate is able, to pay to the Public Defense Services
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 52
Account established by ORS  151.225, through the clerk of the court, in full or in part the adminis-
trative costs of determining the ability of the parents or  estate to pay for legal services and the
costs of the legal and other services that are related to the provision of appointed counsel.
(2) The test of the parent’s or  estate’s ability to pay costs under subsection (1) of this section
is the same test as applied to appointment of counsel for  defendants under ORS 135.050 or under the
policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted under ORS  151.216. If counsel is provided at
state expense, the court shall apply this test in accordance with the guidelines  adopted by the
[Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  under ORS 151.485.
(3) If counsel is provided at state expense, the court shall determine the amount the parents  or
estate is required to  pay for the costs of administrative, legal and other services related to the
provision of appointed counsel in the same manner as this amount is determined under  ORS 151.487.
(4) The court’s order of payment is enforceable  in the same manner as an order of support under
ORS 419B.408.
SECTION 65.  ORS 419B.237 is amended to read:
419B.237. (1) The appointment of a guardian ad litem under ORS 419B.231 continues until:
(a) The court terminates the appointment;
(b) The juvenile court proceeding is dismissed; or
(c) The parent’s parental rights are terminated, unless the court continues the appointment.
(2) A party to the proceeding or the attorney  for the parent for whom a guardian ad litem has
been appointed may request removal of the guardian ad litem. The court:
(a) Shall remove the  guardian ad litem if the court determines that the parent no longer lacks
substantial capacity either to understand the nature and consequences of the proceeding or to give
direction and assistance to the parent’s attorney on decisions the parent must make in  the pro-
ceeding; or
(b) May remove the guardian ad litem on other grounds as the court determines appropriate.
(3) The [ Public Defense  Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall com-
pensate a guardian ad litem for duties the guardian ad litem performs in the proceeding  from funds
appropriated to the commission.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 419B.532 is amended to read:
419B.532. (1) As used in this section, “former parent”  means a person who was previously the
legal parent of a ward and whose parental rights to the ward have been terminated.
(2)(a) In a proceeding under ORS 419B.500, the Department of Human Services or  a ward may
file a motion to reinstate the parental rights of a former parent if:
(A)(i) The ward has not been adopted; or
(ii) The ward was previously adopted but no longer has a legal parent;
(B) No legal action to achieve the adoption  of the ward has been initiated under ORS 109.276
or 419B.529;
(C) At least 18 months have passed since entry of  the judgment terminating the former parent’s
parental rights to the ward or, in the event  of an appeal, at least six months have passed since is-
suance of an appellate judgment affirming the termination judgment, whichever is later; and
(D) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the ward is at least 12 years of age
at the time the motion to reinstate parental rights is filed.
(b) If the ward is under 12 years of  age at the time the motion to reinstate parental rights is
filed, the court may allow the motion upon a showing of good cause.
(3) A motion to reinstate parental rights under this section must  be in writing and state with
particularity the factual and legal grounds for the motion.
(4) The moving party shall provide a copy of the motion to reinstate  parental rights to the for-
mer parent and shall notify the court, the parties and, if there is reason to know that the ward  is
an Indian child, the tribe that a copy of the motion has been provided.
(5) If a motion to reinstate  parental rights does not state a prima facie case as to the facts that
must be proved under subsection (6) of this section, the court may  deny the motion without a
hearing.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 53
(6)(a) If a motion to reinstate parental rights states  a prima facie case as to the facts that must
be proved under this subsection, the court shall hold  a hearing on the merits of the motion. The
court shall grant the motion if the moving party proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) The former parent’s conduct  and conditions that led to the termination of parental rights
have been ameliorated and the former parent is presently fit;
(B) The former parent wishes to have parental rights reinstated;
(C) The ward consents to the reinstatement of parental rights; and
(D) Reinstatement of parental rights is in the ward’s best interests.
(b) In determining whether reinstatement of parental rights is in the ward’s best interests under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court shall consider:
(A) The  ward’s health, safety, permanency, age, maturity and ability to express the ward’s
preferences;
(B) The reasons that the former parent’s parental rights were terminated;
(C) The former parent’s stated reasons for wishing to have parental rights reinstated; and
(D) The likely impact on the ward of the former parent’s past abuse or neglect.
(c) The moving party  shall provide notice to the former parent of a hearing on the merits under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The department shall establish by rule procedures for investigating the present fitness  of the
former parent and for providing appropriate reunification services.
(7) If the court grants the motion to  reinstate parental rights under subsection (6) of this sec-
tion:
(a) The court shall enter an order reinstating parental rights that shall restore all  parental
rights and duties of the former parent as to the ward;
(b) The ward shall  continue as a ward of the court for at least six months after entry of the
order reinstating parental rights; and
(c) The court shall conduct a permanency  hearing as provided in ORS 419B.470 within 60 days
after entering the order under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(8) An order reinstating parental  rights under this section does not vacate or otherwise affect
the validity of the original judgment terminating the parental rights of the former parent  except to
the extent that the order reinstates parental rights.
(9) In any proceeding  under this section, the ward is entitled to have counsel appointed at state
expense if the ward is determined to be financially eligible under the policies, procedures,  standards
and guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Commission .
SECTION 67.
 ORS 419B.647 is amended to read:
419B.647. (1) If there is reason to know that a child  in a proceeding under ORS chapter 419B
is an Indian child:
(a) The court shall appoint counsel to represent the Indian child.
(b) If the Indian child’s  parent or Indian custodian requests counsel to represent the parent or
Indian custodian but is without sufficient financial means  to employ suitable counsel possessing
skills and experience commensurate with the nature of the petition and the complexity  of the case,
the court shall appoint suitable counsel to represent  the Indian child’s parent or Indian custodian
if the parent or Indian custodian is determined to be  financially eligible under the policies, proce-
dures, standards and guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services  Commission] Oregon Public Defense
Commission.
(2) Upon presentation of the order of appointment under this section by the attorney  for the
Indian child, any agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the state, doctor,
nurse or other health  care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department or mental health
clinic shall permit the attorney for the Indian child to inspect and copy any records  of the Indian
child involved in the case, without the consent of the Indian child or  the Indian child’s parent or
Indian custodian. This subsection does not apply to records of a police agency relating to an ongoing
investigation prior to bringing charges.
SECTION 68.
 ORS 419C.200 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 54
419C.200. (1)(a) When a petition is filed under ORS 419C.005, the court:
(A) Shall appoint counsel to represent the youth at all stages of the proceeding  if the offense
alleged in the petition is classified as a crime.
(B) Shall appoint counsel for the youth at any proceeding concerning an order of probation.
(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph, shall  appoint counsel for the
youth in any case in which the youth would be entitled to appointed counsel if the youth  were an
adult charged with the same offense.
(D) May appoint counsel for the youth in any other proceeding under ORS 419C.005.
(b) The court may not substitute one appointed counsel for another except pursuant  to the pol-
icies, procedures, standards and guidelines of the [ Public Defense Services  Commission ] Oregon
Public Defense Commission .
(2)(a) A court may not accept a waiver of counsel by a youth except under the  following cir-
cumstances:
(A) The youth is at least 16 years of age;
(B) The youth has met with and been advised regarding the right to counsel by  counsel who has
been appointed by the court or retained on behalf of the youth;
(C) A  written waiver, signed by both the youth and the youth’s counsel, is filed with the court;
and
(D) A hearing  is held on the record where the youth’s counsel appears and the court, after
consulting with the youth, finds the waiver was  knowingly, intelligently and voluntarily made and
not unduly influenced by the interests of others, including the  interests of the youth’s parents or
guardians.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a youth  entering into a formal accountability agreement
under ORS 419C.230.
(3) Upon presentation of  the order of appointment under this section by the counsel for the
youth, any  agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the state, doctor, nurse
or other health care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department or  mental health clinic
shall permit the counsel  to inspect and copy any records of the youth or youths involved in the case,
without the consent of  the youth or youths or parents. This subsection does not apply to records
of a police agency relating to an ongoing investigation prior to charging.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 419C.380 is amended to read:
419C.380. (1) An evaluation  ordered under ORS 419C.378 must be conducted by a psychiatrist,
a licensed psychologist or a regulated social worker. If an evaluation is requested, the  party at
whose request the evaluation was ordered shall notify the court and other parties of the date, time
and location of the evaluation and the name of the evaluator chosen by  the party. A party or the
court may submit written  information to the evaluator for consideration. When written information
that has not been  provided to the court or an opposing party is submitted to the evaluator, the party
submitting the written information to the evaluator shall provide the written information to the
court and the opposing party.
(2)(a) A county court or  justice court shall order the county to pay the fees and costs described
in subsection (3) of this section from funds available for that purpose.
(b) A  circuit court shall order the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon
Public Defense  Commission  to pay the fees and costs described in subsection (3) of this section
from funds available for that purpose.
(3) Pursuant  to subsection (2) of this section, the county or the [ public defense services ] executive
director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall pay:
(a) A reasonable fee to a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist or regulated social  worker in pri-
vate practice who conducts the evaluation; and
(b) All costs, including transportation of the youth, if the evaluation is conducted by a  psychi-
atrist, licensed psychologist or regulated social worker employed by the Department of Human Ser-
vices or is conducted by a community mental health program or community developmental
disabilities program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.695.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 55
(4) If an evaluation is ordered under ORS 419C.378, the county shall pay for the expense of  the
evaluation.
(5) After a motion  is made by the court or the youth under ORS 419C.378 (3), the state shall
have the right to seek an independent evaluation at its own expense.
(6) A youth may not be  removed from the youth’s current placement for the purpose of an
evaluation performed under this section unless  the youth has been placed in a detention facility as
defined in ORS 419A.004 or a youth correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005.
SECTION 70.  ORS 419C.535 is amended to read:
419C.535. (1) The juvenile panel  of the Psychiatric Security Review Board shall appoint suitable
counsel to represent  a young person about whom a hearing under ORS 419C.532 is being held.
Counsel appointed must be an  attorney who satisfies the [ professional qualification ] minimum
standards established  by the [ Public Defense Services Commission ] Oregon Public Defense Com-
mission under ORS 151.216.  The [ public defense services ] executive director  of the commission
shall determine and allow fair compensation for counsel appointed under this subsection  and the
reasonable expenses of the young  person in respect to the hearing. Compensation payable to ap-
pointed counsel may not be less than the applicable compensation  level established under ORS
151.216. The [public defense services ] executive director shall pay compensation and expenses allowed
from funds available for that purpose.
(2) The juvenile panel may not order the young person, parent or guardian of the estate to pay
any part of the administrative costs of appointing counsel for the young person or to pay for the
costs of legal and other services that are related to the provision of appointed counsel.
(3) The Attorney General may represent the  state at contested hearings before the juvenile
panel unless the district attorney of the county  in which the young person was adjudicated elects
to represent  the state. The district attorney of the county in which the young person was adjudi-
cated shall cooperate with the Attorney General in securing the material necessary for presenting
a contested hearing before the  juvenile panel. If the district attorney elects to represent the state,
the district attorney shall give timely written notice  to the Attorney General, the juvenile panel and
the attorney representing the young person.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 426.135 is amended to read:
426.135. If a person determined to be a person with mental illness as provided in  ORS 426.130,
or determined to be an extremely dangerous person with mental illness under ORS 426.701  or
426.702, appeals the determination  or the disposition, and is determined to be financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense, upon request of the person or upon  its own motion, the court
shall appoint  suitable legal counsel to represent the person. The compensation for legal counsel and
costs and expenses necessary to the appeal shall be determined and paid by the  [ public defense ser-
vices] executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense  Commission  as provided in ORS 135.055
if the circuit court is the appellate court or as provided  in ORS 138.500 if the Court of Appeals or
Supreme Court is the appellate court. The compensation, costs and expenses shall be  paid as pro-
vided in ORS 138.500.
SECTION 72.  ORS 426.250 is amended to read:
426.250. The following is a nonexclusive  list of responsibilities for payment of various costs re-
lated to commitment proceedings under this chapter as described:
(1) Any physician or qualified professional recommended by  the Oregon Health Authority who
is employed under ORS 426.110 to make an examination as to the mental condition of a person al-
leged to have a mental illness shall be allowed a fee as the court in its discretion determines rea-
sonable for the examination.
(2) Witnesses subpoenaed to  give testimony shall receive the same fees as are paid in criminal
cases, and are subject to compulsory attendance in the same manner as provided  in ORS 136.567 to
136.603. The attendance of out-of-state witnesses may  be secured in the same manner as provided in
ORS 136.623 to 136.637. The party who subpoenas the witness or requests the court to subpoena the
witness is responsible for payment of the cost of the subpoena and  payment for the attendance of
the witness at a hearing. When the witness has  been subpoenaed on behalf of a person alleged to
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 56
have a mental illness who is represented by appointed counsel, the fees and costs  allowed for that
witness shall be paid pursuant to ORS 135.055. If the costs of witnesses subpoenaed by  the person
are paid as provided  under this subsection, the procedure for subpoenaing witnesses shall comply
with ORS 136.570.
(3) If a person with a right to a counsel under ORS 426.100, 426.701  or 426.702 is determined to
be financially eligible for  appointed counsel at state expense, the [ public defense services ] executive
director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall determine and pay, as  provided in ORS
135.055, the reasonable expenses related to the representation of  the person and compensation for
legal counsel. The expenses and compensation so allowed  shall be paid by the [ public defense
services ] executive director from funds available for the purpose.
(4) The authority shall pay the  costs of expenses incurred under ORS 426.100 by the Attorney
General’s office. Any costs for district attorneys or other counsel appointed  to assume responsibility
for presenting the state’s case shall be paid by the county  where the commitment hearing is held,
subject to reimbursement under ORS 426.310.
(5) All costs  incurred in connection with a proceeding under ORS 426.180, 426.701 or 426.702,
including the costs of transportation, commitment and delivery of  the person, shall be paid by the
community mental health program in the county of which the  person is a resident. If the person is
not a resident of this state, then the costs incurred in connection  with the proceeding shall be paid
by the  community mental health program in the county from which the emergency admission was
made.
(6) All costs incurred in connection with a proceeding  under ORS 426.180 for the commitment
of a person  from a reservation, including the cost of transportation, commitment and delivery of the
person, shall be paid by the governing body of the reservation of which the person is a resident.
SECTION 73.  ORS 427.265 is amended to read:
427.265. (1) At the time that a person who is alleged to have an intellectual disability and  to
be in need of commitment  for residential care, treatment and training is brought before the court,
the court shall  advise the person of the reason for being brought before the court, the nature of the
proceedings  and  the possible results of the proceedings. The court shall also advise the person of
the right to subpoena witnesses and  to suitable legal counsel possessing skills and experience
commensurate with the  nature of the allegations and complexity of the case during the proceedings,
and that if the person does not have funds with which to retain  suitable legal counsel, the court
shall appoint such legal counsel  to represent the person. If the person does not request legal coun-
sel, the legal guardian, relative or  friend may request the assistance of legal counsel on behalf of
the person.
(2) If no request for legal counsel is made, the court shall appoint suitable legal counsel.
(3) If the person is unable to afford legal counsel, the court, if the matter is before a  county or
justice court, or the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon Public  Defense
Commission, if the matter  is before the circuit court, shall determine and allow, as provided in ORS
135.055, the reasonable  expenses of the person and compensation for legal counsel. The expenses and
compensation so allowed by a county court  shall be paid by the county of residence of the person.
The expenses and compensation determined by the [ public defense services ] executive director shall
be paid by the  [ public defense services ] executive director from funds available for the purpose. In
all cases  legal counsel shall be present at the hearing and may examine all witnesses offering tes-
timony, and otherwise represent the person.
(4) The court may, for good cause, postpone the hearing for not more than 72 hours  to allow
preparation for the hearing and order  the continuation of detention authorized under ORS 427.255
during a postponement, if requested by the person, the legal counsel, parent or  guardian of the
person, an examiner or on the court’s own motion.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 427.295 is amended to read:
427.295. If a person appeals a commitment order issued under ORS 427.290,  the court, upon re-
quest of the person or upon its  own motion and upon finding that the person is financially eligible
for appointed counsel at state expense, shall appoint suitable legal counsel to represent  the person.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 57
The compensation for legal counsel and costs and expenses necessary to the  appeal shall be deter-
mined and paid by the [ public defense services ] executive director  of the Oregon  Public Defense
Commission as provided in ORS 135.055 if the circuit  court is the appellate court or as provided
in ORS 138.500 if the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court is the appellate court. The  compensation,
costs and expenses so allowed shall be paid as provided in ORS 138.500.
SECTION 75.  ORS 433.466 is amended to read:
433.466. (1) A person or  group of persons subject to isolation or quarantine or other public
health measure pursuant to ORS 433.121  or 433.123 has the right to be represented by legal counsel
if the person or group of persons so elects. If the person or  group of persons requests legal counsel
and cannot afford counsel, the court shall appoint legal  counsel. If no request for legal counsel is
made, the court must appoint legal  counsel unless counsel is expressly, knowingly and intelligently
refused by the person or the group of persons. The person or  the group of persons may request legal
counsel at any time during the period of imposition of the isolation,  quarantine or other public
health measure.
(2) If a person is unable to afford legal counsel, the [ public defense services ] executive  director
of the Oregon Public Defense Commission  shall determine  and pay, as provided in ORS 135.055,
the reasonable expenses of the  person and compensation for legal counsel appointed to represent the
person.
SECTION 76. The amendments to ORS  1.009, 8.105, 34.355, 40.225, 42.125, 45.275, 45.285,
84.064, 125.035,  125.080, 135.050, 136.603, 137.020, 138.310, 138.480, 138.500, 138.590, 144.335,
144.337, 147.537, 147.560, 151.485,  151.487, 151.493, 151.505, 161.309, 161.346, 161.348, 161.365,
161.665, 171.133, 181A.010,  190.490, 244.050, 283.110, 291.002, 291.011, 291.030, 291.045, 291.227,
293.300, 293.590, 293.875, 419A.200,  419A.211, 419A.252, 419A.255, 419B.112, 419B.195, 419B.198,
419B.237, 419B.532, 419B.647, 419C.200, 419C.380, 419C.535, 426.135, 426.250, 427.265, 427.295 and
433.466 by sections 15 to 75 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
TRANSFER OF COMMISSION TO EXECUTIVE BRANCH
(Appointment and Duties)
SECTION 77.  ORS 151.213, as amended by section 2 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
151.213. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission is  established in the [ judicial] executive
branch of state government. Except for  the appointment or removal of commission members, the
commission and employees of the commission are not subject  to the exercise of administrative au-
thority and supervision by the [ Chief Justice of the Supreme Court as the administrative head of the
Judicial Department ] Governor.
(2)(a) Nine voting members and four nonvoting members shall be appointed to  the commission
by [ order of the Chief Justice ] the Governor  as follows:
(A) The Governor shall appoint:
(i) One voting member who has been represented by a public defense provider.
(ii) Two additional voting members,  one of whom has experience as a public defense
provider in juvenile delinquency or dependency cases.
(iii) Two nonvoting members  who are currently employed as public defense providers in
this state, one of whom is from an urban area and one of whom is from a rural area.
[(A)] (B)  The  Governor shall appoint, from among  persons recommended by the  Chief
Justice [ shall appoint ] of the Supreme Court :
(i) One voting member who is a retired judge.
(ii) Two additional voting members, one of  whom has experience as a public defense provider in
criminal cases.
[(B) The Chief Justice shall appoint, from among persons recommended by the Governor: ]
[(i) One voting member who has been represented by a public defense provider. ]
[(ii) Two additional voting members, one of whom has experience as a public defense provider in
juvenile delinquency or dependency cases. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 58
[(iii) Two  nonvoting members who are currently employed as public defense providers in this state,
one of whom is from an urban area and one of whom is from a rural area. ]
(C) The [ Chief Justice ] Governor  shall appoint, from among persons  recommended by the Pres-
ident of the Senate:
(i) One voting member who is a current dean or faculty member of an Oregon law school.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the Senate at the time of appointment.
(D) The [ Chief Justice ] Governor  shall appoint, from among persons recommended by the
Speaker of the House of Representatives:
(i) One  voting member who has expertise in juvenile law and criminal defense, or who is a ju-
venile justice or criminal justice reform advocate.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the House of Representatives at the time  of ap-
pointment.
(E) The [ Chief Justice ] Governor  shall appoint one voting member from among persons jointly
recommended by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b) When recommending and appointing members of the commission, the [ Chief Justice, ] Gover-
nor, Chief Justice,  President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall:
(A) Consider input  from individuals and organizations with an interest in the delivery of public
defense services.
(B) Consider geographic, racial, ethnic and gender diversity.
(C) Ensure that members appointed to the commission have significant experience with  issues
related to public defense or in the case types subject to representation by public  defense providers.
(D) Ensure  that members appointed to the commission have demonstrated a strong commitment
to quality public defense representation.
(c) The following persons may not be appointed to and may not  serve as members of the com-
mission:
(A) A prosecuting attorney.
(B) A judge, magistrate or other person who performs judicial functions.
(C) An employee of a law enforcement agency or the Department of Human Services.
(d) A person who is primarily  engaged in providing public defense services and who has a fi-
nancial interest in the delivery  of public defense services at the state level may not serve as a
voting member of the commission.
(e) As used in this subsection, “law enforcement agency” means an entity that  employs cor-
rections officers, parole and probation  officers, police officers, certified reserve officers or reserve
officers, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(3) The term of a member is four  years beginning on the effective date of the [ order of the Chief
Justice appointing the member ] Governor’s appointment, but members serve  at the pleasure of
the Governor . A member is eligible for reappointment if  qualified for membership at the time of
reappointment, but may serve no more than two consecutive four-year  terms. The [ Chief Justice ]
Governor may remove  any member of the commission at any time [ for cause ]. If a vacancy occurs
for any cause before the expiration  of the term of a member, the [ Chief Justice ] Governor  shall
make an  appointment to fill the vacancy, in the same manner as an appointment to a full term, to
become immediately effective  for the unexpired term. [ If the Chief Justice has not filled a vacancy
within 45 days after the vacancy occurs, the remaining voting members of the commission shall, by a
majority vote,  select a member to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term. The selected member
must meet the requirements for membership described in this section. ]
(4) A chairperson and a vice chairperson shall be elected  by the voting members of the com-
mission every two years with such functions as the commission may determine.  A member is eligible
for reelection as chairperson or vice chairperson.
(5) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(6)(a) All members of the commission shall:
(A) Review the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required by ORS 151.216 and pro-
vide input before the approval vote described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 59
(B) Review the budget of the commission and provide input before the approval  vote described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) Meet as needed to carry out the duties described in this subsection.
(b) The voting members of the commission shall:
[(A) Appoint, by a two-thirds vote, an executive director for a term of office  of four years. The term
may be terminated for cause by a majority vote of the  voting members after notice and a hearing. When
the term  of an executive director ends without termination, the voting members of the commission may
reappoint the person currently in the position by a majority vote. ]
[(B) Upon the vacancy of the executive  director position, immediately designate an acting executive
director by a majority vote. ]
[(C)] (A)  Approve by  majority vote the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required
by ORS 151.216 before those policies, procedures, standards and guidelines may take effect.
[(D)] (B)  Approve by majority vote  the budget of the commission before submission to the Leg-
islative Assembly.
(7) The members of the commission may not:
(a) Make any decision regarding the handling of any individual case;
(b) Have access to any case file; or
(c) Interfere with the executive director or any member of the staff of  the executive director in
carrying out professional duties involving the legal representation of public defense clients.
(8) A member  of the commission is entitled to compensation for services as a member, and to
expenses, as provided in ORS 292.495.
(9)(a) The Governor shall appoint  an executive director of the commission, subject to
confirmation by the Senate  in the manner prescribed by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The person
appointed as executive director must be well qualified by training and  experience to perform
the functions of the office.
(b) The term of office  of the executive director is four years, but the executive director
serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
(c) Before the expiration of the executive director’s  term, the Governor shall appoint a
successor to take office upon the date of the expiration. The executive director is eligible for
reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment
to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
SECTION 78.
 ORS 151.216, as amended by section 3 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
151.216. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense system that  ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon Constitution, the United States  Constitution and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
(b) Adopt policies for public defense providers that:
(A) Ensure compensation,  resources and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) Ensure all public defense  provider contracts provide for compensation that is commensurate
with the character of service performed;
(C) Ensure  funding and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider overhead costs that account for the  cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or jurisdiction, including  but not limited to rent, professional
membership dues,  malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual oper-
ating costs.
(c) Establish operational and  contracting systems that allow for oversight, ensure transparency
and stakeholder engagement and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific representation.
(d) Review the caseload policies described in paragraph (b)(A) of this  subsection annually, and
revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 60
(e) Adopt a statewide workload plan, based on  the caseload policies described in paragraph
(b)(A) of this  subsection, that takes into account the needs of each county or jurisdiction, practice
structure and type of practice overseen by the commission.
(f) Submit the budget of the commission to the Legislative Assembly after the budget is submit-
ted to the commission by the executive director and approved by the voting members of  the com-
mission. The [ Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and the ] chairperson of the commission shall present
the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
(g) Adopt  a compensation plan, classification system and affirmative action plan for the com-
mission that are commensurate with other state agencies.
(h) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination  of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be represented by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including the appointment of  counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair compensation of counsel appointed to represent a person  financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) The  costs associated with the representation of a person by appointed counsel in the state
courts that are required to be paid by the state; and
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
(i) Reimburse the State Court Administrator from funds  deposited in the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs  of personnel and other costs associated with lo-
cation of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to  ORS 151.489 by the State Court
Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee the implementation, enforcement  and modification of policies,
procedures, minimum standards and guidelines to ensure that public defense providers are providing
effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible persons in this  state as required by statute
and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, procedures, standards and guidelines
described in this paragraph apply to employees  of the commission and to any person or entity that
contracts with the commission to provide public defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of  data concerning
the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring  the delivery of public defense services into
and maintain compliance with the minimum  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described
in this subsection. All contracts for  the provision of public defense services to which the commission
is a party must include a requirement  for collection by the commission of data determined by the
commission  to  be qualitatively necessary for any report required to be submitted to the Legislative
Assembly.
(n) At least once every two years, report  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,  and to the Governor and Chief
Justice, concerning compliance  metrics for the minimum standards described in this subsection and
recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public defense
services.
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department,  ensure the existence of policies that create a
standardized process for determining and verifying financial eligibility for appointed counsel under
ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and comprehensive training  programs for attorneys for the
purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 61
(r) Enter into contracts or interagency agreements with the  Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services for the purpose of supporting state public defense population  forecasts and other re-
lated forecasts.
[(s) Pay invoices submitted to the  commission within 45 days of receipt or in accordance with
statewide accounting policies established by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. ]
[(t)] (s)  Establish any other policies, procedures, standards and guidelines for the conduct of the
commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out all powers and  duties of the
commission.
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and guidelines  described in
this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed  counsel shall be provided sufficient time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of appointed counsel must be controlled to permit  effective representation.
Economic  disincentives  or incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to provide effective
assistance of counsel must be avoided. The commission may develop workload controls  to enhance
appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match the nature and com-
plexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously represent  a client throughout the pendency
of the case and shall appear at every court appearance other than ministerial hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for  public defense
providers who are employed by or contract with the commission  that are specific to the subject
matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically  review appointed counsel
for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be organized in a  manner for the effective delivery of public defense
services as prescribed by the policies  and procedures created pursuant to statute to financially eli-
gible persons and consistent with  the budgetary structure established for the commission by the
Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall hire attorneys to serve  as appointed counsel, including at the trial
level in Oregon circuit courts, and may establish a trial division within  the commission consisting
of attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense providers.
(5) The policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission must be made
available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
(6) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted  by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures of the Public Defender  Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the  Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and the Psychiatric Security Review
Board related  to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
(7) The commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private. However, the commission may not accept  a gift, grant or contribution if acceptance
would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this  subsection shall be deposited in the
Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225  and expended for the purposes for
which given or granted.
(8) With the approval  of a majority of the voting members of the commission, the com-
mission may  advocate for or against legislation before the Legislative Assembly or policies
or budgets being considered by the Legislative Assembly.
(9) The commission shall request that the Governor include in the  Governor’s requested
budget, for each fiscal period, at a minimum, the amount  of funds identified by the com-
mission as being necessary to carry out the duties and activities of the commission.
(10) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 62
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 79.  ORS 8.105, as amended by section 16 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
8.105. (1) Before making any change to a compensation plan, an  administrative division of the
judicial department must submit the proposed change to the Joint  Committee on Ways and Means
during the period when the Legislative Assembly is in session, or to  the Emergency Board or the
Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means during the interim period between sessions.
(2) This section applies to all boards, commissions, committees and departments of  the judicial
department, as defined in ORS  174.113, including but not limited to [ the Oregon Public Defense
Commission and] the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability.
SECTION 80.  ORS 42.125, as amended by section 19 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
42.125. (1) For the purposes of ORS 40.510 (1)(a) and (d), each state officer  and state agency may
have a seal  which, unless specifically provided otherwise by law, shall consist of an impression,
imprint or likeness of the state seal accompanied by the name of the state officer or state agency.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Seal” has the meaning given that term in ORS 42.110.
(b) “State agency” means every state  officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch
or agency of the state government, except[ :]
[(A)] the Legislative Assembly and the courts and their officers and committees[ ; and ]
[(B) The Oregon Public Defense Commission ].
(c) “State officer” includes any appointed state  official who is authorized by the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services to  have a seal and any elected state official, except members
of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 81.
 ORS 84.064, as amended by section 22 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
84.064. (1) For purposes of ORS 84.049, 84.052 and 84.055,  the State Chief Information Officer
shall make determinations and adopt standards for state agencies.
(2) The  State Chief Information Officer shall adopt rules to govern state agency use of electronic
signatures. The rules  must include control processes and procedures to ensure adequate integrity,
security and confidentiality for business  transactions that state agencies conduct using electronic
commerce and to ensure that the transactions can  be audited as is necessary for the normal conduct
of business.
(3) As used in this section,  “state agency” means every state officer and board, commission,
department, institution, branch and agency of the state government, the  costs of which are paid
wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury, except[ :]
[(a)] the Legislative Assembly, the courts, the district attorney for each county and the  officers
and committees of the Legislative Assembly, the courts and the district attorney[ ; and ]
[(b) The Oregon Public Defense Commission ].
SECTION 82.  ORS 171.133, as amended by section 45 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
171.133. (1) A state agency shall not cause a bill or measure to be introduced  before the Legis-
lative Assembly if the bill or measure has not been approved by the Governor.
(2) As used in ORS 171.130 and this  section, “state agency” means every state agency whose
costs are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees;  and
[(b) The Oregon Public Defense Commission; and ]
[(c)] (b) The Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General and the Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
SECTION 83.  ORS 190.490, as amended by section 47 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
190.490. (1) Every agreement entered into under ORS 190.485 shall be submitted to the Attorney
General before taking effect. The Attorney General shall determine whether  the agreement is in
proper form and compatible with the laws  of this state. If the Attorney General determines that the
agreement is improper in some respect,  the Attorney General shall give written notice to the state
agency concerning the specific respects in which the agreement fails to comply  with law. Failure
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 63
of the Attorney General to give such notice to  the state agency within 30 days of submission of the
agreement to the Attorney General’s office shall constitute  approval of the agreement. The Attorney
General may exempt certain agreements, classes of agreements or form agreements from the re-
quirement that the agreement be approved by the Attorney General before taking effect.
(2) The state agency shall file any agreement made  under ORS 190.485 with the Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services within 30 days of the effective date of the agreement. The de-
partment may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this subsection.
(3) This section does not apply  to the Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and
committees[ ,] and the Secretary of State and the State Treasurer in the performance  of the duties
of their constitutional offices [ and the Oregon Public Defense Commission ].
SECTION 84.
 ORS 283.110, as amended by section 49 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
283.110. (1) Subject to  rules prescribed by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
any state agency shall, as its own facilities permit, furnish to any other state agency  such services
(including labor), facilities  and materials as are requisitioned by the head of another agency. The
expense shall be charged to the  agency served, which shall pay the expense to the agency furnishing
the services,  facilities or materials in the manner other claims are paid. Agencies shall, as far as
practicable, cooperate with one another in the use of services, quarters and equipment.
(2) Except  as provided in ORS 283.076 (3), all moneys received by an agency in payment of ser-
vices, facilities or materials furnished  to another state agency as provided in this section, or in
payment of services,  facilities or materials furnished to other persons may be, or if required by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, shall be paid into the State Treasury  for deposit to
the credit  of the miscellaneous receipts account established pursuant to ORS 279A.290 for the
agency furnishing the services, facilities or materials.
(3) The constitutional state officers and the  Legislative Assembly or any of its statutory,
standing, special or interim committees, unless prohibited by law,  may elect to furnish services, fa-
cilities and materials to one another and to state agencies and officers as  defined in ORS 291.002,
and the courts, constitutional state officers[ ,] and the  Legislative Assembly or any of its statutory,
standing, special or interim committees [ and the Oregon Public Defense Commission ] may elect to
requisition services, facilities and materials as provided in this section.
SECTION 85.  ORS 291.002, as amended by section 50 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
291.002. As used in ORS 291.001 to 291.034, 291.201 to 291.222, 291.232 to 291.260,  291.261,
291.307 and 291.990, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Classification of expenditures” means the categories of expenses for the purpose of  budget-
making and accounting that are provided in ORS 291.216 (6)(a).
(2) “Dedicated fund” means a fund in the State Treasury, or a  separate account or fund in the
General Fund in the State Treasury, that by law is dedicated, appropriated or  set aside for a limited
object or purpose, but “dedicated fund” does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.
(3) “Department” means the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(4) “Director” means the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(5) “Legislatively adopted budget” means the budget  enacted by the Legislative Assembly during
an odd-numbered year regular session  for the biennium beginning July 1 of the year in which the
regular session begins.
(6) “Legislatively approved budget” means the legislatively adopted budget as modified by the
Emergency Board meeting  in an interim period or by the Legislative Assembly meeting in special
session or in an even-numbered year regular session.
(7) “Revolving fund” means  a fund in the State Treasury, established by law, from which is paid
the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a state  agency, and which is replenished through
charges made for such goods or services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.
(8) “State agency” or “agency” means every state  officer, board, commission, department, insti-
tution, branch or agency of the state government, whose costs are paid wholly or in part  from funds
held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees;  and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 64
[(b) The Oregon Public Defense Commission; and ]
[(c)] (b) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer in the  performance of the duties of their
constitutional offices.
(9) “State officer” means any  elected or appointed state officer, including members of boards and
commissions, except the members and officers of the Legislative Assembly, the courts, the Secretary
of State and the State Treasurer in the performance of the duties of their constitutional offices [ and
the members of the Oregon Public Defense Commission ].
(10) “Trust fund” means a fund in the State Treasury in which designated persons or  classes of
persons have  a vested beneficial interest or equitable ownership, or which was created or estab-
lished by a gift, grant, contribution, devise or bequest that  limits the use of the fund to designated
objects or purposes.
SECTION 86.
 ORS 291.030, as amended by section 52 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
291.030. As used  in ORS 291.032 and 291.034, “state agency” or “agency” includes the Legisla-
tive Assembly, at its option, or any of its statutory,  standing, special or interim committees, at the
option of such committee,  and the courts  and their officers and committees and the constitutional
state officers, at  their option[ , and the Oregon Public Defense Commission, at the option of the com-
mission].
SECTION 87.  ORS 291.045, as amended by section 53 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
291.045. As used in this section and ORS 291.047:
(1) “Information technology” includes, but is not limited to, all present and future  forms of
hardware, software and services for data processing, office automation and telecommunications.
(2) “State  agency” includes every state officer, board, commission, department, institution,
branch or agency of the state government, whose costs are paid wholly or in part from  funds held
in the State Treasury, except[ :]
[(a)] the Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees[ ; and ]
[(b) The Oregon Public Defense Commission ].
(3) “Public contract” means any acquisition, disposition, purchase, lease, sale or transfer of
rights by a state agency of real or personal property, public improvements or services.
(4) “Public improvement”  means projects for construction, reconstruction or renovation on real
property by or for a state agency.
SECTION 88.
 ORS 291.227, as amended by section 54 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
291.227. (1)(a) As part of the development of the  legislatively adopted budget, each state agency
that employs more than 100 employees shall report to the Joint  Committee on Ways and Means the
state agency’s maximum supervisory ratio for the biennium.
(b) Before submitting the report to the committee, a state agency shall provide a  copy of the
report to all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency.
(2) A state agency must  determine its maximum supervisory ratio by starting from a baseline
ratio of one to 11 and adjusting the ratio based on some or all of the following factors:
(a) Safety of the public or of state agency employees;
(b) Geographic location of the agency’s employees;
(c) Complexity of the agency’s duties;
(d) Industry best practices and standards;
(e) Size and hours of operation of the agency;
(f) Unique personnel needs of the agency, including the agency’s use of volunteers  or seasonal
or temporary employees, or the exercise of supervisory authority by agency  supervisory employees
over personnel who are not agency employees; and
(g) Financial scope and responsibility of the agency.
(3) The Joint Committee on Ways and Means shall review the  maximum supervisory ratios re-
ported by state agencies.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, a state agency whose actual  supervisory ratio is
greater than its maximum supervisory ratio may not fill a supervisory position.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 65
(5)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may exempt  a state agency from the
limitations of subsection  (4) of this section if the department determines that an additional supervi-
sory position is reasonably necessary to the state agency. The department must make the  determi-
nation with reference to some or all of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) At least  five business days before granting an exemption under this subsection, the depart-
ment shall notify all labor organizations that represent employees of the state agency of its intent
to grant the exemption.
(6)(a) The department shall, once per quarter, produce reports on the  actual supervisory ratio
of each state agency. The reports must include data  on job families within each state agency to the
extent such data is reasonably available.
(b) The department shall make the reports  publicly available on the Internet and shall notify
all labor organizations that represent state employees when the reports are available.
(7) The department  may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules gov-
erning how  temporary, seasonal or part-time employees are accounted for in the calculation of a
supervisory ratio.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Job families” means groups of occupations based upon work performed,  skills, education,
training and credentials.
(b) “Legislatively adopted budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
(c)(A) “State agency” means  all state officers, boards, commissions, departments, institutions,
branches, agencies, divisions and other entities, without regard to the designation given  to those
entities, that are within the executive branch of government as described  in Article III, section 1,
of the Oregon Constitution.
(B) “State agency” does not include:
(i) The legislative department as defined in ORS 174.114;
(ii) The judicial department as defined in ORS 174.113;
[(iii) The Oregon Public Defense Commission; ]
[(iv)] (iii) The Secretary of State and the State Treasurer;
[(v)] (iv) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454;
[(vi)] (v)  The Oregon Tourism Commission;
[(vii)] (vi) The Oregon Film and Video Office;
[(viii)] (vii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
[(ix)] (viii) The Oregon Health and Science University;
[(x)] (ix) The Travel Information Council;
[(xi)] (x)  Oregon Corrections Enterprises;
[(xii)] (xi) The Oregon State Lottery Commission;
[(xiii)] (xii) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
[(xiv)] (xiii) The Oregon Utility Notification Center;
[(xv)] (xiv) Oregon Community Power;
[(xvi)] (xv)  The Citizens’ Utility Board;
[(xvii)] (xvi) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117;
[(xviii)] (xvii) Any other public corporation created under a statute of this state and  specifically
designated as a public corporation; and
[(xix)] (xviii)  Any other semi-independent state agency denominated by statute as  a semi-
independent state agency.
(d) “Supervisory employee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.650.
(e) “Supervisory ratio” means the ratio of  employees who are supervisory employees to em-
ployees who are not supervisory employees.
SECTION 89.
 ORS 293.300, as amended by section 55 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
293.300. Except for  claims based on obligations incurred or expenditures made by the Legislative
Assembly and its officers  and committees, the courts and their officers and committees[ ,] and the
Secretary of State  and State Treasurer in the performance of the functions of their constitutional
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 66
offices [ and the Oregon Public Defense Commission ], a claim  for payment from any moneys in the
State Treasury may  not be paid if the claim is disapproved by the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services. The department shall disapprove a claim if provision for payment thereof  is not
made by law and appropriation, the obligation or expenditure  on which the claim is based is not
authorized as provided by law or the  claim does not otherwise satisfy requirements as provided by
law.
SECTION 90.  ORS 293.590, as amended by section 56 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
293.590. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall direct  and control the ac-
counting for all the fiscal affairs of the state government and agencies thereof, and  shall provide for
the maintenance of accounting records, including  accounts stated in summary or in detail, for those
fiscal affairs. The department is responsible for establishing and  maintaining systems of accounting
for state government  and agencies thereof. The principles, standards and related requirements of
those systems of accounting shall be as prescribed by  the department and except as otherwise pro-
vided in this section shall be used by the state agencies thereof,  unless otherwise directed by the
department.
(2) In performing its functions under subsection (1) of this section, the  department shall consult
with the Secretary of State, State Treasurer  and, to the extent it considers necessary or desirable,
any other state agency or any federal agency.
(3) The department may, as its own  facilities permit, furnish to any other state agency such
accounting services (including labor), facilities and materials as are necessary, as determined  by the
department, for compliance by the state  agency with subsection (1) of this section. The cost to the
department of furnishing  the services, facilities and materials, as determined by the department,
shall be charged to the state agency and paid to the department  in the same manner as other claims
against the state agency are paid.
(4) This section is applicable to the Legislative Assembly and its officers and committees, the
courts and their  officers and committees[ ,] and the Secretary of State and State Treasurer in the
performance of the functions of their constitutional offices [ and the Oregon Public Defense Commis-
sion] only at their option.
SECTION 91.  ORS 293.875, as amended by section 57 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
293.875. (1) The State Treasurer is designated the sole banking and cash management officer for
the state and may review, establish and modify procedures  for the efficient handling of moneys un-
der the control of the State Treasury, the Secretary of State,  the Judicial Department, the Legisla-
tive Assembly[ , the Oregon Public  Defense Commission ] and state agencies as defined in ORS 291.002.
The State Treasurer shall perform all activities necessary or desirable to  fulfill the duties of the
treasurer as the banking and cash management officer. The activities may include, but  are not lim-
ited to, entering into contracts for the provision  of services related to the management, deposit and
transfer of, or payment from, moneys deposited with  the State Treasurer through banks and other
financial institutions. The deposit, transfer or payment may  be through physical presentation or
drafting of an instrument or document by electronic or other means.
(2) The State Treasurer shall continuously review the effectiveness of the cash management  of
state agencies, the  Secretary of State, the Judicial Department and the Legislative Assembly, and
when the State Treasurer considers it appropriate shall report in writing to the subject agency the
findings of this review, along with any  recommendations. A copy of the report shall be provided to
the Legislative Fiscal Officer and to the Secretary of State.
(3) This section controls over any other law that  gives another state agency general responsi-
bility for, or control over, the accounting, fiscal or electronic commerce affairs  of the State Treas-
ury, the Secretary of State, the Judicial  Department, the Legislative Assembly[ , the Oregon Public
Defense Commission ] and state agencies as defined  in ORS 291.002. State agencies shall employ the
principles, standards and related requirements for cash  management prescribed by the State Treas-
urer, including:
(a) Practices related to the use of credit, debit or similar cards or devices;
(b) The use of secure disbursing and receiving instruments, documents and systems; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 67
(c) The use of  secure information resources, information technology and networks that meet the
requirements of the State Treasurer for the  electronic management, deposit or transfer of, or pay-
ment from, moneys deposited with the State Treasurer.
(4) As used in this section, “information resources” and  “information technology” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 276A.206.
(Operative Dates)
SECTION 92. (1)(a) The Oregon Public Defense Commission is transferred from the judi-
cial branch to the executive branch on January 1, 2025.
(b) The amendments to ORS 8.105, 42.125, 84.064, 151.213, 151.216,  171.133, 190.490, 283.110,
291.002, 291.030, 291.045, 291.227, 293.300, 293.590 and 293.875 by  sections 77 to 91 of this 2023
Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Public Defense Commission, the Judicial Department,  the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services and the Governor may take any action before the op-
erative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to:
(a) Facilitate the transfer of the commission to the executive branch.
(b) Enable those entities to exercise, on and  after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred on those entities
by the  amendments to ORS 8.105, 42.125, 84.064, 151.213, 151.216, 171.133, 190.490, 283.110,
291.002, 291.030, 291.045, 291.227, 293.300, 293.590 and 293.875  by sections 77 to 91 of this 2023
Act.
(3)(a) A person who is a member of the Oregon Public  Defense Commission on January
1, 2025, may finish the person’s term as  a commission member and is eligible for reappoint-
ment if the person meets the requirements described in ORS 151.213 (2), but, beginning  on
January 1, 2025, and continuing until July 1, 2027, serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
(b) The person serving as  executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission
on January 1, 2025, may finish the person’s term as executive director and is eligible for  re-
appointment, but, beginning  on January 1, 2025, and continuing until July 1, 2027, serves at
the pleasure of the Governor.
CHANGE IN SERVICE DELIVERY MODEL
(Statutory Changes)
SECTION 93.
 ORS 151.211, as amended by section 1 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
151.211. For purposes of ORS 151.211 to 151.221:
(1) “Appointed counsel” includes  trial-level and appellate attorneys who are employees
of the Oregon Public Defense Commission, attorneys employed by a nonprofit public defense
organization and attorneys on the panel of qualified counsel described in ORS 151.216 (5) who
contract with the commission to provide public defense services.
[(1)] (2) “Chief Justice” means the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
[(2)] (3) “Commission” means the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(4) “Nonprofit public defense organization”  means a nonprofit organization that employs
attorneys who provide public defense services.
SECTION 94.
 ORS 151.216, as amended by sections 3 and 78 of this 2023 Act, is  amended to
read:
151.216. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense  system that ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon  Constitution, the United States Constitution and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
(b) Adopt policies for public defense providers that:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 68
(A) Ensure compensation,  resources and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) Ensure all public defense  provider contracts provide for compensation that is commensurate
with the character of service performed;
(C) Ensure  funding and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider  overhead costs that account for the cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or  jurisdiction, including but not limited to rent, professional
membership dues, malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual  oper-
ating costs.
(c) Establish operational and contracting systems that allow for  oversight, ensure transparency
and stakeholder engagement and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific representation.
(d) Review the caseload  policies described in paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection annually, and
revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
(e) Adopt a statewide workload plan, based  on the caseload policies described in paragraph
(b)(A) of this subsection, that takes into account the needs of each county or  jurisdiction, practice
structure and type of practice overseen by the commission.
(f) Submit the budget of the commission to the Legislative Assembly after the budget is submit-
ted to the  commission by the executive director and approved by the voting members of the com-
mission. The chairperson of the commission shall present the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
(g) Adopt a compensation plan, classification system and affirmative action plan for the  com-
mission that are commensurate with other state agencies.
(h) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be represented  by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including  the appointment of counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair compensation  of counsel appointed to represent a person financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) The costs associated with the representation of a person by appointed counsel in the  state
courts that are required to be paid by the state; and
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
(i) Reimburse the State Court Administrator from funds  deposited in the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs of  personnel and other costs associated with lo-
cation of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to  ORS 151.489 by the State Court
Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee  the implementation, enforcement and modification of policies,
procedures, minimum standards and guidelines to ensure that public defense providers are providing
effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible persons in this  state as required by statute
and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, procedures, standards and guidelines
described in this paragraph apply to employees of the commission and  to any person or entity that
contracts with the commission to provide public defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of  data concerning
the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring  the delivery of public defense services into
and maintain compliance with the minimum  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described
in this subsection. All contracts for  the provision of public defense services to which the commission
is a party must include a requirement for collection by the  commission of data determined by the
commission to be qualitatively necessary for any report required to be submitted to the  Legislative
Assembly.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 69
(n) At least once every two years, report  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and to the Governor and Chief
Justice, concerning compliance metrics for the minimum standards described in this  subsection and
recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public defense
services.
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department, ensure the  existence of policies that create a
standardized process for determining and verifying financial eligibility for appointed counsel under
ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and  comprehensive training programs for attorneys for the
purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
(r) Enter into contracts or  interagency agreements with the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services for the purpose  of supporting state public defense population forecasts and other re-
lated forecasts.
(s) Establish any other policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines for the conduct of the
commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out all powers and  duties of the
commission.
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and guidelines  described in
this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed  counsel shall be provided sufficient time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of appointed counsel must be controlled to permit  effective representation.
Economic  disincentives  or incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to provide effective
assistance of counsel must be avoided. The commission may develop workload controls  to enhance
appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match the nature and com-
plexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously represent  a client throughout the pendency
of the case and shall appear at every court appearance other than ministerial hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for  public defense
providers who are employed by or contract with the commission  that are specific to the subject
matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically  review appointed counsel
for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be organized in a  manner for the effective delivery of public defense
services as prescribed by the policies  and procedures created pursuant to statute to financially eli-
gible persons and consistent with  the budgetary structure established for the commission by the
Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall hire attorneys to serve  as appointed counsel, including at the trial
level in Oregon circuit courts, and [ may] shall  establish a trial division within the commission
consisting of attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense providers.
(5)(a) The commission shall establish, supervise and maintain a panel of qualified counsel
who contract with the commission  and are directly assigned to cases. The commission shall
develop a process for certification of attorneys to the panel with periodic  eligibility and case
review. Panel attorneys are not employees of the commission.
(b) The payment of panel counsel:
(A) May not be lower than the hourly rate established by the commission.
(B) Shall be adjusted to reflect the same percentage amount of any positive cost of living
adjustment granted to employees in the management service in other  executive branch
agencies.
(C) May not provide a financial conflict  of interest or economic incentives or disincen-
tives that impair an attorney’s ability to provide effective representation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 70
(6)(a) The commission may enter into contracts  for the provision of public defense ser-
vices with nonprofit public defense organizations.
(b) The commission may enter into contracts with entities  that subcontract with other
entities or persons for the provision of public defense services.
(c) The commission may not  enter into a contract or agreement that pays appointed
counsel a flat fee per case.
[(5)] (7)  The  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission must be
made available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
[(6)] (8) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures of the Public Defender  Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the  Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and the Psychiatric Security Review
Board related  to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
[(7)] (9)  The  commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private. However, the commission may not accept a  gift, grant or contribution if accept-
ance would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this subsection shall be deposited
in the  Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 and expended for the purposes
for which given or granted.
[(8)] (10)  With the approval of a majority of the  voting members of the commission, the com-
mission may advocate for or against legislation before the Legislative Assembly  or policies or
budgets being considered by the Legislative Assembly.
[(9)] (11)  The commission shall request that the Governor  include in the Governor’s requested
budget, for each fiscal period, at  a minimum, the amount of funds identified by the commission as
being necessary to carry out the duties and activities of the commission.
[(10)] (12) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 151.219, as amended by section 4 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
151.219. (1) The executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Designate  a deputy director of the commission who serves at the pleasure of the executive
director.
(b) Hire necessary staff for the commission.
(c) Recommend to  the commission how to establish and maintain, in a cost-effective manner, the
delivery of legal  services to persons entitled to, and, where applicable, financially eligible for, ap-
pointed counsel at state expense under Oregon statutes, the  Oregon Constitution, the United States
Constitution and consistent with Oregon and national standards of justice.
(d) Implement and ensure compliance with contracts, policies,  procedures, standards and guide-
lines adopted by the commission or required by statute.
(e) Prepare and submit to the commission  for its approval the biennial budget of the commission.
(f) Negotiate contracts, as appropriate, for  providing legal services to persons eligible for ap-
pointed counsel at state expense  in accordance with ORS 151.216 (5) and (6) .
(g) Employ personnel or contract for services as necessary  to carry out the responsibilities of
the executive director and the commission.
(h) Supervise the personnel, operation and activities of the commission.
(i) Provide  services, facilities and materials necessary for the performance of the duties, func-
tions and powers of the commission.
(j) Pay the expenses of the commission.
(k) Prepare and submit to the members of the commission an annual report of  the activities of
the commission.
(L) Provide for legal representation, advice and consultation for the commission, its  members,
the executive director and staff of the commission who require  such services or who are named as
defendants in lawsuits arising  from their duties, functions and responsibilities. If requested by the
executive director, the Attorney General may also provide for legal representation,  advice and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 71
consultation for the commission, its members, the executive director and staff  of the commission in
litigation.
(2) The executive director may:
(a) Designate  persons as representatives of the executive director for the purposes of determin-
ing and paying  bills submitted to the commission and determining preauthorization for incurring fees
and expenses under ORS 135.055.
(b) Establish  an external advisory group to assist in developing the standard operating expec-
tations for persons and entities providing public defense services.
(Temporary Provisions)
SECTION 96.
(1)(a) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall conduct a survey and
economic analysis to establish a formula for the commission to use to  calculate an hourly
pay rate, taking into account overhead expenses, market rates and regional differences in
the cost of living, for appointed counsel who are  not employees of the commission or a
nonprofit public defense organization.
(b) The  commission may conduct the survey and economic analysis internally or may
contract with an outside entity. The survey and economic analysis  must be completed and
the hourly pay rate calculated no later than July 1, 2025.
(c) After the hourly pay rate described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection has been cal-
culated, and beginning with contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2027, the hourly  pay
for appointed counsel who are not employees of the commission  or a nonprofit public defense
organization may not be lower than that amount.
(d) The commission may conduct another survey and  economic analysis as described in
this subsection to establish a new formula and calculate a new hourly pay rate.
(2)(a) By January 1, 2031, at least 20  percent of all appointed counsel at the trial level
must be attorneys employed by the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(b) By January 1, 2035, at  least 30 percent of all appointed counsel at the trial level must
be attorneys employed by the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
SECTION 97.
Section 96 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2035.
(Reporting to Legislature)
SECTION 98. (1) No later than May 15, 2024, the  Oregon Public Defense Commission shall
provide a comprehensive report on  the commission’s plan for providing public defense ser-
vices in this state to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to the ju-
diciary, in the manner described in ORS  192.245, that includes at least the following
information:
(a) Financial projections for the commission based on anticipated workload;
(b) A  description of the commission’s proposed method for providing public defense ser-
vices based on anticipated workload;
(c) The  establishment of training and supervision requirements for public defense pro-
viders;
(d) Steps taken to determine a reasonable hourly rate for appointed  counsel who are not
employees of the commission or nonprofit public defense organizations that accounts for
overhead expenses; and
(e) Steps taken to improve oversight and enforcement  of statewide objective standards
for the provision of public defense.
(2) No later than December 1, 2025, and no later than December 1,  2026, the commission
shall provide the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary
with an updated version of the report described in subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 72
(3) Beginning no later than December 1, 2027, and biennially thereafter until  December
1, 2035, the commission shall provide the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary with an updated version of the report described in subsection (1)  of
this section.
SECTION 99. Section 98 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
(Statutory Changes Operative July 1, 2027)
SECTION 100.  ORS 151.213,  as amended by sections 2 and 77 of this 2023 Act, is amended to
read:
151.213. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission is established in the executive branch  of
state government. Except for the appointment or removal of commission  members, the commission
and employees of the commission are not subject to the exercise of administrative  authority and
supervision by the Governor.
(2)(a) Nine voting members and four nonvoting members shall be appointed to  the commission
by the Governor as follows:
(A) The Governor shall appoint:
(i) One voting member who has been represented by a public defense provider.
(ii) Two additional voting members, one of  whom has experience as a public defense provider in
juvenile delinquency or dependency cases.
(iii) Two nonvoting members who are  currently employed as public defense providers in this
state, one of whom is from an urban area and one of whom is from a rural area.
(B) The Governor shall appoint, from  among persons recommended by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court:
(i) One voting member who is a retired judge.
(ii) Two additional voting members, one of  whom has experience as a public defense provider in
criminal cases.
(C) The Governor shall appoint, from among persons recommended by the President of the  Sen-
ate:
(i) One voting member who is a current dean or faculty member of an Oregon law school.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the Senate at the time of appointment.
(D) The Governor shall appoint,  from among persons recommended by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives:
(i) One  voting member who has expertise in juvenile law and criminal defense, or who is a ju-
venile justice or criminal justice reform advocate.
(ii) One nonvoting member who is a member of the House of Representatives at the time  of ap-
pointment.
(E) The Governor shall appoint one voting member from among persons jointly recommended
by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b) When recommending  and appointing members of the commission, the Governor, Chief Justice,
President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall:
(A) Consider input from individuals and organizations with an interest in the delivery  of public
defense services.
(B) Consider geographic, racial, ethnic and gender diversity.
(C) Ensure  that members appointed to the commission have significant experience with issues
related to public defense or in the case types subject to representation by public  defense providers.
(D) Ensure that members appointed to the commission have demonstrated a strong  commitment
to quality public defense representation.
(c) The following persons may not be  appointed to and may not serve as members of the com-
mission:
(A) A prosecuting attorney.
(B) A judge, magistrate or other person who performs judicial functions.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 73
(C) An employee of a law enforcement agency or the Department of Human Services.
(d) A person who is primarily  engaged in providing public defense services and who has a fi-
nancial interest in the delivery  of public defense services at the state level may not serve as a
voting member of the commission.
(e) As used in this subsection, “law enforcement agency” means an entity that  employs cor-
rections officers, parole and probation  officers, police officers, certified reserve officers or reserve
officers, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(3) The term of a member is four years beginning on the effective date of the Governor’s
appointment[, but members serve at the pleasure of the Governor ]. A member is eligible  for reap-
pointment if qualified for membership at the time of reappointment, but  may serve no more than two
consecutive four-year terms. The  Governor may remove any member of the commission at any time
for inefficiency, neglect of duty or malfeasance in office . If a vacancy occurs  for any cause be-
fore the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor shall  make an appointment to fill the
vacancy, in the same manner as an appointment to a full term, to become immediately  effective for
the unexpired term.
(4) A chairperson and a vice chairperson shall  be elected by the voting members of the com-
mission every two years with such functions as the commission may determine.  A member is eligible
for reelection as chairperson or vice chairperson.
(5) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(6)(a) All members of the commission shall:
(A) Review the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required by ORS 151.216 and pro-
vide input before the approval vote described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(B) Review the  budget of the commission and provide input before the approval vote described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) Meet as needed to carry out the duties described in this subsection.
(b) The voting members of the commission shall:
(A) Appoint an executive director of the commission. The term of  office of the executive
director is four years, but the executive director serves at the pleasure  of the voting mem-
bers of the commission.
[(A)] (B)  Approve by majority vote  the policies, procedures, standards and guidelines required
by ORS 151.216 before those policies, procedures, standards and guidelines may take effect.
[(B)] (C)  Approve by majority vote the budget of  the commission before submission to the Leg-
islative Assembly.
(7) The members of the commission may not:
(a) Make any decision regarding the handling of any individual case;
(b) Have access to any case file; or
(c) Interfere with the executive director or any member of the staff of  the executive director in
carrying out professional duties involving the legal representation of public defense clients.
(8) A member  of the commission is entitled to compensation for services as a member, and to
expenses, as provided in ORS 292.495.
[(9)(a) The Governor shall appoint an executive director of the  commission, subject to confirmation
by the Senate in the manner prescribed by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The person appointed as executive
director must be well qualified by training and experience to perform the functions of the office. ]
[(b) The term of office of the executive director is four  years, but the executive director serves at
the pleasure of the Governor. ]
[(c) Before the expiration of the executive director’s term,  the Governor shall appoint a successor
to take office upon  the date of the expiration. The executive director is eligible for reappointment. If
there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to become immediately ef-
fective for the unexpired term. ]
SECTION 101.
 ORS 151.216, as amended by sections 3, 78  and 94 of this 2023 Act, is amended
to read:
151.216. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 74
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense system that  ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon Constitution, the United States  Constitution and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
(b) Adopt policies for public defense providers that:
(A) Ensure compensation,  resources and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) Ensure all public defense  provider contracts provide for compensation that is commensurate
with the character of service performed;
(C) Ensure  funding and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider  overhead costs that account for the cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or  jurisdiction, including but not limited to rent, professional
membership dues, malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual  oper-
ating costs.
(c) Establish operational and contracting systems that allow for  oversight, ensure transparency
and stakeholder engagement and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific representation.
(d) Review the caseload  policies described in paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection annually, and
revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
(e) Adopt a statewide workload plan, based  on the caseload policies described in paragraph
(b)(A) of this subsection, that takes into account the needs of each county or  jurisdiction, practice
structure and type of practice overseen by the commission.
(f) Submit the budget of the commission to the Legislative Assembly after the budget is submit-
ted to the  commission by the executive director and approved by the voting members of the com-
mission. The chairperson of the commission shall present the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
(g) Adopt a compensation plan, classification system and affirmative action plan for the  com-
mission that are commensurate with other state agencies.
(h) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be represented  by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including  the appointment of counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair compensation  of counsel appointed to represent a person financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) The costs associated with the representation of a person by appointed counsel in the  state
courts that are required to be paid by the state; and
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
(i) Reimburse the State Court Administrator from funds  deposited in the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs of  personnel and other costs associated with lo-
cation of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to  ORS 151.489 by the State Court
Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee  the implementation, enforcement and modification of policies,
procedures, minimum standards and guidelines to ensure that public defense providers are providing
effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible persons in this  state as required by statute
and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, procedures, standards and guidelines
described in this paragraph apply to employees of the commission and  to any person or entity that
contracts with the commission to provide public defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of  data concerning
the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring  the delivery of public defense services into
and maintain compliance with the minimum  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 75
in this subsection. All contracts for  the provision of public defense services to which the commission
is a party must include a requirement for collection by the  commission of data determined by the
commission to be qualitatively necessary for any report required to be submitted to the  Legislative
Assembly.
(n) At least once every two years, report  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and to the Governor and Chief
Justice, concerning compliance metrics for the minimum standards described in this  subsection and
recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public defense
services.
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department, ensure the  existence of policies that create a
standardized process for determining and verifying financial eligibility for appointed counsel under
ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and  comprehensive training programs for attorneys for the
purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
(r) Enter into contracts or  interagency agreements with the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services for the purpose  of supporting state public defense population forecasts and other re-
lated forecasts.
(s) Establish any other policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines for the conduct of the
commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out all powers and  duties of the
commission.
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and guidelines  described in
this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed  counsel shall be provided sufficient time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of appointed counsel must be controlled to permit  effective representation.
Economic  disincentives  or incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to provide effective
assistance of counsel must be avoided. The commission may develop workload controls  to enhance
appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match the nature and com-
plexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously represent  a client throughout the pendency
of the case and shall appear at every court appearance other than ministerial hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for  public defense
providers who are employed by or contract with the commission  that are specific to the subject
matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically  review appointed counsel
for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be organized in a  manner for the effective delivery of public defense
services as prescribed by the policies  and procedures created pursuant to statute to financially eli-
gible persons and consistent with  the budgetary structure established for the commission by the
Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall hire attorneys to serve  as appointed counsel, including at the trial
level in Oregon circuit courts, and shall establish  a trial division within the commission consisting
of attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense providers.
(5)(a) The commission shall establish, supervise and maintain a  panel of qualified counsel who
contract with the commission and are directly assigned to  cases. The commission shall develop a
process for certification of attorneys  to the panel with periodic eligibility and case review. Panel
attorneys are not employees of the commission.
(b) The payment of panel counsel:
(A) May not be lower than the hourly rate established by the commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 76
(B) Shall be adjusted to reflect the same percentage amount of any positive cost of living  ad-
justment granted to employees in the management service in other executive branch agencies.
(C) May not provide a financial conflict of interest  or economic incentives or disincentives that
impair an attorney’s ability to provide effective representation.
(6)(a) The commission may enter into  contracts for the provision of public defense services with
nonprofit public defense organizations.
[(b) The commission may enter into contracts with entities  that subcontract with other entities or
persons for the provision of public defense services. ]
[(c)] (b) The commission  may not enter into a contract or agreement that pays appointed counsel
a flat fee per case.
(7) The policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission must be made
available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
(8) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines  adopted by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures  of the Public Defender Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and the  Psychiatric Security Review
Board related to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this  section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
(9) The commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private. However, the commission may not accept  a gift, grant or contribution if acceptance
would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this  subsection shall be deposited in the
Public Defense Services Account established by ORS  151.225 and expended for the purposes for
which given or granted.
(10) With the approval of a majority of the voting members of the commission, the  commission
may advocate  for or against legislation before the Legislative Assembly or policies or budgets being
considered by the Legislative Assembly.
(11) The commission  shall request that the Governor include in the Governor’s requested budget,
for each fiscal period, at a minimum, the amount of funds  identified by the commission as being
necessary to carry out the duties and activities of the commission.
(12) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
(Operative Dates)
SECTION 102. (1)(a) The amendments to  ORS 151.211, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 93
to 95 of this 2023 Act become operative on July 1, 2025.
(b) The amendments to ORS 151.213 and 151.216 by sections 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act
become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2)(a) A person who is a member of the Oregon Public Defense  Commission on July 1,
2027, may finish the person’s term as a commission member and  is eligible for reappoint-
ment, but, beginning July 1, 2027, may be removed by the Governor only for  inefficiency,
neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.
(b) The person serving as executive director of the  Oregon Public Defense Commission
on July 1, 2027, may finish the person’s term as executive director  and is eligible for reap-
pointment, but, beginning  on July 1, 2027, serves at the pleasure of the voting members of
the commission.
(3) The Oregon Public Defense Commission,  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services and the Governor may take any action before the operative dates specified in sub-
section (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the commission to exercise, on and
after the operative dates  specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on those entities by the amendments to ORS 151.211, 151.213, 151.216
and 151.219 by sections 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
UNREPRESENTED DEFENDANT CRISIS PLANS
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 77
SECTION 103. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) Oregonians accused of a crime are entitled, under the Sixth  and Fourteenth Amend-
ments of the  United States Constitution, and Article I, section 11, of the Oregon Constitu-
tion, to have an attorney provided at government  expense whenever the person is facing the
potential loss of liberty and is unable to afford an attorney.
(2) The current unrepresented defendant crisis represents  a threat to the constitutional
rights of Oregonians and must be resolved.
SECTION 104. (1)(a) The presiding judge  of each judicial district shall immediately de-
velop and implement  a coordinated public safety unrepresented defendant crisis plan, and
submit the plan to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,  as soon as practicable and no
later than September 1, 2023.
(b) The plan described in this subsection must first prioritize the resolution of the  cases
of unrepresented defendants who are in  custody, and then the cases of unrepresented de-
fendants who are out of custody.
(2) The presiding judge of a judicial district with a total population  of over 100,000 shall
immediately convene a crisis team to assist in the development of the plan  and to coordinate
the implementation of the plan described in subsection (1) of this section. The team  shall be
composed of at least the following persons:
(a) The presiding judge of the judicial district;
(b) District attorneys within the judicial district; and
(c) The public defense services executive director, or the director’s designee.
(3) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may issue orders related to  resolving the
unrepresented defendant crisis.
(4) The presiding judge of a judicial district may enter standing orders related  to resolv-
ing the unrepresented defendant crisis that  are consistent with the orders of the Chief Jus-
tice described in subsection  (3) of this section and the plan of the judicial district described
in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 105.
The Public Defense Services Commission shall:
(1) By no later than August 15, 2023, promulgate and disseminate guidance for the judicial
district coordinated public safety unrepresented defendant crisis  plans described in section
104 of this 2023 Act.
(2) By  no later than September 1, 2023, develop a training plan for public defense pro-
viders specific to the unrepresented defendant crisis, in consultation and cooperation  with
public defense provider associations and organizations.
(3) By no later than October 1, 2023, report to the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and
Means and the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to the judiciary, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the commission’s progress in carrying out  the pro-
visions described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
SECTION 106. The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall conduct a review of each
judicial district’s coordinated public safety unrepresented defendant crisis plan submitted to
the commission under section 104 of this 2023 Act.  The commission shall report the
commission’s findings to the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means and the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to the judiciary, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245, no later than October 1, 2023.
SECTION 107. All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed
to assist the presiding judges of  judicial districts, the Public Defense Services Commission
and the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission in the  performance of their duties under
sections 104 to  106 of this 2023 Act and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice to the judges and commissions  nec-
essary to perform their duties.
SECTION 108. Sections 103 to 107 of this 2023 Act are repealed on June 30, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 78
APPROPRIATIONS
(Commission Changes)
SECTION 109. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill  5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Exec-
utive Division, is increased by $414,792, for the purpose  of carrying out the provisions of
sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102 of this 2023 Act and  the amendments to statutes
by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 110. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Com-
pliance, Audit and Performance Division, is increased by  $801,080, for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92,  96 to 99 and 102 of this 2023 Act and the
amendments to statutes by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93  to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for the Adult
Trial Division, is increased by $7,406,190, for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of
sections 7a to 14, 76,  92, 96 to 99 and 102 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to statutes
by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (5),  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Juve-
nile Trial Division, is increased by $1,234,365, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions
of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102  of this 2023 Act and the amendments to statutes
by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7),  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for Court
Mandated Expenses, is increased by $14,656,343, for the purpose of carrying out the  pro-
visions of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102  of this 2023 Act and the amendments to
statutes by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (8), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Parent
Child Representation Program, is increased by $1,234,365, for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102 of this  2023 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 115.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (9),  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Ad-
ministrative Services Division, is increased by $8,465,430, for  the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102 of this  2023 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  for the Special
Programs, Contracts  and Distributions Division, is increased by $285,508, for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of sections 7a to  14, 76, 92, 96 to 99 and 102 of this 2023 Act and
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 79
the amendments to statutes by sections  1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77 to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and 101 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for Operations, is increased
by $283,504, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 7a to 14, 76, 92, 96  to
99 and 102 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to statutes  by sections 1 to 7, 15 to 75, 77
to 91, 93 to 95, 100 and  101 of this 2023 Act relating to the transfer of the Oregon Public
Defense Commission to the executive branch.
(Unrepresented Defendant Crisis Plans)
SECTION 118.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for the Adult
Trial Division, is increased by $368,316, for an expedited resolution case docket in  the fourth
judicial district.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4),  chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for the Adult
Trial Division, is increased  by $4,588,202, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
sections 103 to 107 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (10), chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5532), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  for the Special
Programs, Contracts  and Distributions Division, is increased by $545,000, for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of sections 103 to 107 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for Operations, is increased
by $1,852,566, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 104 and 105 of  this
2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 122.
The unit captions used  in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 123. This 2023 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 80
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 337 (SB 337-C) Page 81